I've been through FOUR of these expensive units. They work great on my Great Pyrenees dog. At least they work for awhile. Then I end up trying to figure out if the batteries are dead, then if the NEW batteries I put in were dead to begin with, and then I send it back for repair. Once I got back a unit that worked again - for awhile. Then I got back a unit that never worked again.I stopped sending in my broken units after that.So - in desperation, and impending poverty, I switched to a shock collar; it was either that or what my breeder calls a "blue juice special". It also worked - and yes, I tried it on myself and decided that it wasn't cruel at all. But the punchline is this: the shock collars broke at about the same rate as the citronella collar. At least they were cheaper, so I didn't lose as much money</review_text>
Sometimes it sprays when she barks, most of the time it doesn't. So I would say its effectiveness has been rather low. It's not the battery or the fill level - maybe it just depends on the dog. I can bark into it myself and it sprays just fine. (My children found this amusing.</review_text>
Light is beautiful and functional, and so great for traveling, but first LED light failed almost immediately and second after about 2 months.  Too bad.</review_text>
Not only did this product have no effect on the manic barking of our own dogs, but the company also refused to provide a refund/replacement after the product arrived with a broken chunk out of the cheap plastic casing.  After sitting out in a rainstorm, the Super Bark Stop shorted out and is now totally worthless.  Find another product - You'll thank me later</review_text>
Clock is smaller than I thought, and is only intended to take up about a square foot of wall.  Made of cheap materials, definitely not worth $25</review_text>
I set it up for my dogs because they bark whenever they hear a noise or if someone rings bell, I have 3 dogs, I put it on and they went beserk, they started going after each other, I didn't hear anything myself, but I am quite sure the dogs did, like I said they acted very badly towards each other, the tone must have made them lash out like that. I cannot use it anymore.</review_text>
My beagle (13 mo.) cocks her head showing that she hears something with a slight pause in the barking process but does not deter her from barking at a later time.  Does nothing for howling and will only go off for loud barks, not smaller barking or any form of whining (even if extremely loud)</review_text>
I bought 3 of these to monitor my invalid mom and they don't work well. The manual is not thorough, but it does tell you AFTER you bought the product that there is a one-second delay unless you buy an AC adapter.  I just bought 12 batteries for 3 units and wasn't about to buy an AC adapter to see IF that fixed it. It cut off my mom's voice and I rarely heard her message. The units also have annoying beeps that can't be turned off. No real volume control either. A very overpriced and poorly designed unit. Also, the switches to adjust for conference and vox mode are small and need a small object smaller than a pen to change them. The sound is clear if it doesn't cut you off, but the units are far from user-friendly.</review_text>
It appears that the Viatek product (Bark Stop Pro) is related to the Lentek design (PC16 ; ASIN: B0002Q89O6) - they are based on a common design by a Lentek engineer. I have used (tried) the Viatek Bark Stop Pro and it definitely DOES NOT work. My experience was the same as another reviewer of the Lentek PC16 who noted that the unit only works on the "Audible" setting - dogs will at least perk up their ears at the high pitch tone ; they completely ignore whatever is emitted on the "Ultrasonic" setting. Furthermore, it is often activated by extraneous noises like birds, banging doors, wind noise, etc.This really poor functionality is due to either poor design or poor construction / quality. I've tried two different units and they both do NOT work.The negative reenforcement concept could work if only these devices were tuned to the noise environment and could filter out all except the actual barks.</review_text>
I purchased this item thinking it would be great for my 5 yr old's room.  He has a 19 inch TV/VCR/DVD combo that will not fit into the space that was designed to hold a "20 inch" TV.  If you have a modern TV with speakers on the side it will not fit!!!!!  I purchased the item directly from STEP2 and they do not want to refund my shipping fees or pay for me to return the item!!!!</review_text>
Man this item is fantastic. I love wasting $80 on pointless furniture. Getting a great cheap plastic looking set that holds all my games and systems.... Man I must be in heaven. Not only that but it breaks easily, does this thing have no limit? So I bought this great video center around a year ago.... And what happens it breaks. I had it for a couple of weeks and does it look like dog crap. It looks like you're in a baby kids room. Similar to those play centers in day cares or McDonalds. Man that is lame.... I just love having children decor in my house, and it has to be $80. If I were you.... I would just let my systems, TV, and CDs sit in some tubberware. Believe me it would be 50X safer!</review_text>
the neighbor has a yapping mutt that barks night and day...since the police won't do anything about it, i bought this bark free...hahaha...what a joke...the darn dog barked more...anyway...it did zero for my problem and i consider it a waste of money...</review_text>
The one item in your house that you really wish would suck and it certainly doesn't! This thing blows more air than it sucks dirt. What a useless thing. I'm looking for one that will actually pick up the dirt from the recessed areas of my prefinished floor. This thing certainly doesn't do it! If you're looking to buy this thing, look again -- there MUST be something better if not just your regular broom</review_text>
The flip it vacuum was a great idea but little did I know thatI would actually have to put my hand in the bin to pull out the dirt and grime after using the wet mop.  When using the wet mop-it will leave water lines where I stop, therefore I have to wipe up the floor with paper towels. When using the vacuum myliquid cleaner drips onto my hardwood floor leaving water marks!I have not recommended this product to anyone. A waste of $100.00</review_text>
One might imagine that the whole concept of vacuuming-flip-mopping is progressive in some way, but it really does not make the job of cleaning the floor easier.  Especially when the product is heavy and hard to maneuver with poor pickup.  I'd much rather go over the floor with a good vacuum, and then follow with a functional, well-designed good mop (like the old SteamMop they discontinued). These things function better as seperate units, which is why there's no washing machine that's also a dryer.The Flip-It is a very loud machine--so loud, that I didn't hear my phone ring in the same room.  This makes it difficult to listen for my 3 children, too.  It's difficult to push and feels like it's gripping to the floor.  It doesn't fit into any tight places or under any low chairs/cabinets with it's big fat part-vacuum head.  And, when you're finished, it's a pain to clean out the nozzle and the filter(which you're supposed to keep dry somehow) so you can look forward to a second job once you've finished the job of cleaning your floors.  And, because of the "flip it" back and forth design, the thing has no equilibrium...it fell to the floor at least 3 times, even when I was so careful to rest it against something...once when this happened, the "dirty water" recovery tank hit the floor, fell off the machine and spilled the dirty water all over my just-cleaned floor.  A true nightmare.  I bought this product because I could no longer buy replacement filters/pads for my Bissell SteamMop, and I thought I had better give the latest and greatest a try, but, sadly, I was disappointed.  I don't review things often, but I felt a responsibility to warn others out there who are shopping for a good mop to keep their homes clean.  This contraption is not your answer.On a side note, I wrote to Bissell to bring back the SteamMop (what an excellent product), so I'm hoping that they will one day</review_text>
The design for using the DC adapter with LED Booklight is extremely poor. It is possible that I missed the warning that tells you to remove the batteries before using the DC adapter. But, it must not have been very big. I combined the two and ended up with batteries that leaked all over inside the battery case. These were brand new batteries. There does not seem to be anything protecting the batteries from the DC adapter and so the power goes right into them. This is bad. Modern devices are expected to work with either battery or adapter without having to remove the batteries.I had assumed that I could leave the batteries in so that when I was at home I could use the adapter, but traveling I would use the batteries.  Don't make this mistake</review_text>
bought a global knife a few years ago  then bought the water/ ceramic sharpening device. cannot keep this knife sharp. it sits in my block with a bunch of cheap 4 star henckels. I use the cheap sabatiers ($9 for the set and the block)anway it's no worse than any of my other dull knives just cost mor</review_text>
NOT a good light.  The light is already fading and I don't use it very often.  Very disappointed</review_text>
I baked six loaves in this machine.  I have been using various bread machines for the past 12 years and feel comfortable making adjustments when things don't turn out just right.  My big complaint with this machine is the low baking temperatures.  Even on the darkest crust setting and the longest baking time (70 minutes), my loaves were only marginally acceptable - they were not sufficiently baked.  I was using a nearly-whole wheat recipe.  The machine was quiet, strong, and had a lot of bells and whistles, but with only partially baked bread, I had to return it to Amazon.  Amazon shipped it to me in a very poorly packed box which was gaping open when it arrived, but they included return labels which made it a cinch to send back, and were quick enough with the refund</review_text>
If you are looking for something with great sound quality or even great accuracy in measurment, this isn't for you. The radio is hard to use since it doesn't have any indication of what frequency you are on, and every time you move it gets overwhelmed by static. The pedometer function is marginal at best. But its what you would expect for $15.</review_text>
When i first got this item i loved it I used it 4 times and it stopped working</review_text>
One might imagine that the whole concept of vacuuming-flip-mopping is progressive in some way, but it really does not make the job of cleaning the floor easier.  Especially when the product is heavy and hard to maneuver with poor pickup.  I'd much rather go over the floor with a good vacuum, and then follow with a functional, well-designed good mop (like the old SteamMop they discontinued). These things function better as seperate units, which is why there's no washing machine that's also a dryer.The Flip-It is a very loud machine--so loud, that I didn't hear my phone ring in the same room.  This makes it difficult to listen for my 3 children, too.  It's difficult to push and feels like it's gripping to the floor.  It doesn't fit into any tight places or under any low chairs/cabinets with it's big fat part-vacuum head.  And, when you're finished, it's a pain to clean out the nozzle and the filter(which you're supposed to keep dry somehow) so you can look forward to a second job once you've finished the job of cleaning your floors.  And, because of the "flip it" back and forth design, the thing has no equilibrium...it fell to the floor at least 3 times, even when I was so careful to rest it against something...once when this happened, the "dirty water" recovery tank hit the floor, fell off the machine and spilled the dirty water all over my just-cleaned floor.  A true nightmare.  I bought this product because I could no longer buy replacement filters/pads for my Bissell SteamMop, and I thought I had better give the latest and greatest a try, but, sadly, I was disappointed.  I don't review things often, but I felt a responsibility to warn others out there who are shopping for a good mop to keep their homes clean.  This contraption is not your answer.On a side note, I wrote to Bissell to bring back the SteamMop (what an excellent product), so I'm hoping that they will one day</review_text>
I bought this device in the hope of eliminating or significantly reducing the noise emanating from my neighbor's mutt.  The offending dog is often left on the neighbor's porch, where it harasses just about every living thing that passes by.Before ordering, I had read varying accounts of its range in terms of how close the unit must be to the dog in order to attain the desired effect.  In my case, the neighbor's porch is about 35 to 60 feet aware from mine.  Unfortunately, this was not "too close for comfort" as far as the dog was concerned.Having read a number of very mixed reviews of this and similar devices, I was not overly optimistic about the prospect of it actually working.  Alas, it did not.  Some dogs just don't hear them.  In my case, it was probably due at least in part to the distance.My suggestion is to go ahead and pick up one of these devices if and only if you are within 20' of the target.  If it doesn't work, go ahead and return it to the manufacturer for a refund (which is exactly what I did).  By the way, you don't need an RA (AKA RMA) number to return the device.  Just send it to the company along with your receipt, and a note saying that you would like a refund (not an exchange).(...)  I sympathize with anyone having this problem, and wish you all the best of luck.  No one deserves to have their peace and quiet disturbed without good reason, and the argument that "dogs bark" simply does not hold any water</review_text>
I bought this set thinking is was going to look nice for a while due to the name brand and the price.  Wrong... This pots get scratches from anything that goes near them.  After a few months of gentle use, they already have so many scratches on the outside and look awful.  Also, the handles get really hot.</review_text>
I baked six loaves in this machine.  I have been using various bread machines for the past 12 years and feel comfortable making adjustments when things don't turn out just right.  My big complaint with this machine is the low baking temperatures.  Even on the darkest crust setting and the longest baking time (70 minutes), my loaves were only marginally acceptable - they were not sufficiently baked.  I was using a nearly-whole wheat recipe.  The machine was quiet, strong, and had a lot of bells and whistles, but with only partially baked bread, I had to return it to Amazon.  Amazon shipped it to me in a very poorly packed box which was gaping open when it arrived, but they included return labels which made it a cinch to send back, and were quick enough with the refund</review_text>
Within a few weeks of purchase the teflon in the Zojirushi pan started to blister and flake off. This is NOT the result of customer abuse but a manufacturing defect.This is my third (and final) bread machine. The first two were Breadman Ultimates. I should note that I make bread in the machine about 6 times a week on average, pretty much every morning.The first Breadman worked for over a year until the teflon in the pan started to fail. This was probably my fault for allowing the pan to soak for extended periods of time (water can get behind the teflon and ruin the bond).I bought an new Breadman Ultimate because the entire machine was only slightly more than the pan alone and the old machine was starting to have mechanical problems. This time I took extremely good care of the pan (letting it cool down, no soaking) because it's clearly the weak link in the system. Within 8 months the stirring shaft that drives the paddle in the pan simply fell out. Whatever the detente mechanism was that holds the shaft to the pan failed, making the machine useless. Currently it doesn't seem very easy (or even possible) to buy a replacement pan for the Breadman.At this point I was done with the Breadman. Much as I didn't want to spring for the extra money for the Zojirushi, and realizing that my default augmented sourdough recipe probably wouldn't work the same in the new machine, I didn't see an alternative and got one.Within 3 weeks the teflon in the Zoji pan formed two blisters. One is bit smaller than a dime and all the teflon at this spot has flaked off; the other spot is blistering but the teflon is still intact. I have been extremely careful with the pan: I wait for it to cool and then remove the baked-on bread under the paddles with warm water using mostly my fingers. I don't let it soak at all. This is clearly a manufacturing defect.I have further complaints with respect to this machine as compared to the Breadman Ultimate:1) The top of the bread rarely gets brown. I've added more sugar to the recipe which helps slightly but not much.2) I don't understand what the crust control option does. It doesn't seem to increase baking time which it does on the Breadman so it doesn't make much sense.3) The programmability is very weak. On the Breadman you can take any of the existing standard options and modify them as well as make up entirely new programs.4) The programmability options are very limited:- You can't control the knockdown time between risings.- You can't add risings to the default three. They do give you a lot of time control on the risings.- You can't separate the mixing cycle from the kneading cycle: it's all one cycle.- When you turn off the preheat cycle, this only affects the built-in programs and not the custom ones.- And worst of all: you can't bake for more than 70 minutes. This is utterly ridiculous. I'm sure this is a "safety feature" but it means you can't correct for the pathetic lack of crust formation or have larger recipes and so forth. This is almost a killer limitation in my opinion.For those other reviewers that are having issues with rising, I've determined that the machine is very sensitive to the amount, type, and quality of yeast. If you *exactly* follow the manufacturers instuctions with respect to yeast and use fresh yeast, it should work okay. This means you must use rapid rise yeast with the Quick programs and active dry yeast with the longer standard programs. Even using Fleischmann's instead of Red Star made a difference. The Breadman was pretty much indifferent to yeast variations.At this point I'm done with bread machines. They are a failed technology. In fact, teflon is a dangerous and substandard technology.All you have to do is search for teflon (Polytetrafluoroethylene) and toxic to come up with some pretty alarming data on this noxious substance. The manufacturing process results in significant environmental contamination.A direct consumer health risk due to toxic outgassing occurs when teflon is exposed to temperatures above 500 degrees (eg: frying pans). Perhaps bread machines are not that risky given the lower temps involved in baking and the fact that wet dough will keep the average pan temperature pretty low, but if you know anything about toxicity you will realize that it is always a sliding scale: there will be some outgassing at lower temperatures. Imagine low levels of toxic gas released into your homemade bread. I've thought about this, but there's no way to make a bread machine without teflon -- going from mixing dough to baking requires teflon, there is just no other viable solution.I love making bread every day and I'm going to miss this activity but at this point the manufacturing defects and use of teflon mean I have to give up on this technology. It's back to the occasional hand-made loaf -- it's the only rational and healthy solution</review_text>
This item did not work when I got it.  I returned it to Zelco, who informed me that it was my error, they did not do refunds, and returned it to me.I had a previous model Zelco that worked great for 10-15 years.  It had a switch.  This new one does not have a switch and at this time will not turn off.Gr</review_text>
Light is beautiful and functional, and so great for traveling, but first LED light failed almost immediately and second after about 2 months.  Too bad.</review_text>
This item is cheaply made and I sent it back.  The picture looks cool but it's deceiving.  The minute hand was so loose that when it was on the right side, it flopped down to the right and then when it was on the left, it plopped down to the left.  It couldn't keep the right time</review_text>
I have ordered this unit twice this past month, the first one did not work properly in one of the units, the signal was distorted. After returning it to the supplier, I ordered it again from another Amazon supplier and one of the units did not work at all. I will now look for another brand</review_text>
The unit did not recieve or transmit half the distance that was reported across a flat surface.  100ft. would be pushing it</review_text>
If you are looking for something with great sound quality or even great accuracy in measurment, this isn't for you. The radio is hard to use since it doesn't have any indication of what frequency you are on, and every time you move it gets overwhelmed by static. The pedometer function is marginal at best. But its what you would expect for $15.</review_text>
I set it up for my dogs because they bark whenever they hear a noise or if someone rings bell, I have 3 dogs, I put it on and they went beserk, they started going after each other, I didn't hear anything myself, but I am quite sure the dogs did, like I said they acted very badly towards each other, the tone must have made them lash out like that. I cannot use it anymore.</review_text>
The way the brush is situated on the handle makes this brush difficult to use.  I would get the Furminator instead, it has the same deshedding edge but a much easier to use overall design and it comes in larger sizes!  This technology is great and you will be so shocked when you see all the hair you are able to remove</review_text>
Being somewhat of an insomniac I read well into the hours of the night and a book light is essential to me.  I therefore purchased the itty bitty booklight.  If you do use this light it is essential to purchase the power supply for two reasons.  Firstly, there is no auto shut-off so if you fall asleep reading your batteries wear down very quickly.  Secondly, when using batteries, they start dimming rather quickly making it hard on the eyes and difficult to read resulting in the constant need for new batteries.  This light is also extremely fragile.  Over a couple of years I went through 7 of these!  I would not recommend this light - for the amount you spend on the never-ending purchasing of batteries or the expensive power supply, and the constant new purchases after it breaks, you might as well splurge and buy a decent book light. I now have the Tri Lite by Capstone Enterprises (available at Barnes & Nobel - come on and get it in stock Amazon!)  It is terrific!  It has a clock with an alarm and a timer.  You can set it to stay on for any period of time and once it reaches that time the light flashes.  At that time you can extend the minutes.  If you don't do so, for example you're sleeping, it will automatically shut off.  It also produces much more light and is much brighter than the Itty Bitty Book Light</review_text>
Read the description carefully. It states the speaker range is 50' not the microphone. My dog stood 10' away from it and even with the sensitivity on high and her barking right at the thing it wouldn't trigger. Matter of fact I never could get it to trigger with barking. The only time it did go off was when I put the batteries in for the first time and my husband was mowing the lawn on his big riding mower and he knocked into a chicken wire fence which made me run out to get it with the unit in my hand. Even then it didn't go off till I was about 4 feet from the mower.I also couldn't get it to just make the ultrasonic sound. Even when switched from audible to ultrasonic you still hear a noise. Not just me but my husband too so it's not a case of super human hearing on my part :-)Yes the timer option is very nice. This was actually why I purchased this one over the others as we only wanted to stop the night barking. But what good is the timer function if the microphone can't pick up the barking?So read these descriptions carefully when looking at these control units. Unless your dog always barks in the same spot and you can place this unit under 4 feet from them then pick something else.</review_text>
I bought this for my mother-in-law at her request.  She has arthritis and saw it on TV.  She also wanted the free gripper that came with it.  I scoured the listings at Amazon looking for one that included the gripper, even paid a little more for it.  She used the can opener once and it broke.  The "free" gripper required sending away for it and an inflated S&H fee</review_text>
When i first got this item i loved it I used it 4 times and it stopped working</review_text>
Received this as a gift and I must say I'm very disappointed. At its highest setting it takes forever to toast. The other issue is that if you buy any bread with "non-standard" width (like home-made, gourmet breads) it won't fit into the toaster</review_text>
This toaster is more a decoration than anything else. My kids eat a lot of bagels & frozen waffles, and this machine just doesn't do the job without multiple toasting cycles. Even regular bread comes out barely toasted on one cycle. I also had the plastic prongs that hold the crumb tray in place, break off. (How?? it just sits on the counter, no one is playing football with it!) I feel that I wasted $50.00 on this- save your money</review_text>
more thought needs to be put into the design of this produc</review_text>
I wanted to buy something that would remove the taste of chlorine from the kitchen faucet but even with the Brita it still tasted like chlorine. After about 2 weeks it started to drip from the where the Brita screws into the faucet. So now you don't have filtered water. My husband replaced washer and it still dripped. If you accidently put the hot water on while someone in the house just before used the filtered part the filter is ruined</review_text>
First the good news.  This is an extra heavy skillet with durable finish and good handles.  It easily handles two quarts up to the bottoms of the rivets and distributes the heat evenly across the bottom of the pan.  But for the bad news I would give this skillet four or five stars.The bad news is that someone at the Anolon plant damaged the pan BEFORE it was placed in the Anolon carton.  Neither the Anolon box nor the outer UPS shipping carton showed any damage when I received the skillet.  It wasn't until the the following day, after I threw out the packaging, that I noticed the a small sharp blow had been delivered to the rim of the pan which deformed the pan slightly.  True, I should have been more attentive when I received the pan,  but I never suspected Anolon would package damaged goods.I'll live with my mistake but will not purchase anything by Anolon again!</review_text>
Using frozen fruit to make up to 4 smoothies every day, our family is hard on blenders.    After more than a year of daily experience with the Waring Pro (both MBB* & PBB* models) I cannot recommend them for serious smoothing making.  Here's why:Both glass- & stainless-jug models use the same blade assembly.  This blade assembly wears poorly when asked to blend frozen fruit.  It fails often, and must be rebuilt or replaced.  Parts are easily purchased if you're handy and have the correct tools.  DETAILS: The assembly screws together, and is threaded to tighten under use rather than loosen and fall apart.  But this tightening action is so great when the blade contacts frozen fruit, that it bends the metal washer below the blade.  The assembly eventually becomes so tight that the shaft cannot turn.The Waring Pro is all the blender than many people will need, but is not sufficient for the daily maker of multiple smoothies</review_text>
For what this item costs you would think that the pump would last longer than 3 months.  I really like foaming soap because I have three young children who have a tendency of making a huge mess with both bar and liquid soap.  Since there is so little actual soap in foam soap there isn't the big mess to clean.  But I have a fundamental problem with paying for bottles of diluted soap.  I searched high and low for an attractive foaming soap dispenser and Cuisipro was about all I could find.  But within 3 months the pump started to stick and I have to manually move it up and down.  It's cheaper to keep refilling the store bought soap dispensers and just buy a new one when it starts to stick.</review_text>
We bought this model because it had the different grind capabilities. It quit working after 1 year. We also bought one for my mom and her's quit much sooner. :-</review_text>
This can opener is complete garbage.Other reviews have told the story about how this thing does not work. I tried it three times, each time with new batteries, and it grunted to a stop after a millisecond.Had to battle with the thing all three times, twisting and turning the stupid can opener to free it from its grasp on the side of the can. The seam broke and leaked juice all over the counter.The "handy" screw to back the can opener up, was of very little use.You are better off with a cheap electric can opener any time, or a hand crank can opener.With this device, you might as well throw 20-bucks out on the lawn.This piece of garbage ended up in the garbage.Completely worthless.DO NOT WASTE YOUR MONEY</review_text>
Sent it back.  Couldn't see the read-out with a plate or saucer on the scale.  Needs a tilted or canted face</review_text>
The scale does not come with a battery, even though there is a distinct place for it in the internal packaging.  Scale had a 2002 manufacture date on it.  All of this I can live with, the bigger problem was that the scale would not zero itself.  When turned on, it would drift dramatically after a couple of seconds.  I timed it -40g for one minute (and after hours... just keep on going...).  The box had no signs of damage, so I'm guessing the load cell was bad.  Very disappointing.</review_text>
I have had this scale for about 4 months.  It worked fine the few times I used it, but last night I went to use it and it has given up the ghost.  I swapped batteries and still nothing.  The connection for the 9v battery is VERY loose, and even after crimping and holding it tight it didn't get any juice.  Not happy so I will order a different brand and hope it does better.  I do not abuse or heavily use my kitchen gadgets, so maybe I just got a lemon</review_text>
This is a $30 "ice crusher" whose instructions advise inserting just one cube at a time. Even at that ludicrous rate, the machine occasionally jammed. I threw it out, went to Target and bought a $20 Waring blender that has an ice chopping mode. It works beautifully, even with a dozen cubes at once</review_text>
I purchased this opener 12/6/06 and the motor quit 3/5/07.  What really troubles me is that I probably only open five or six cans a week.  Please don't waste your money</review_text>
I saw an ad for Rabbit comparing it to Reidel.  It is no Reidel.Heavier than I expected, and larger than I expected</review_text>
I was originally going to buy ClickClack (made in New Zealand) storage containers.  To save money I bought these (China-made) containers instead and it was a big mistake.  The first bad sign was a long black hair stuck in one of the containers.  The soft plastic parts of the lids that seal the containers had rough edges and were poorly trimmed.  The clear plastic of the containers had all sorts of scuff marks. The final straw came when I dropped one from about 3 feet and 3 inches of the lip broke off, rendering the container useless for airtight storage -- and that's assuming that the somewhat loose-fitting lids actually make the containers airtight.  If you want containers like these, spend the money on ClickClack or some other quality brand.  I'm surprised Target sells these at all</review_text>
I really like the look of this bread bin, but the manufacturer does not package it in a box.  It only has a clear plastic bag around it.  Even though Amazon uses it's own box for shipping, it arrived with dents and cracks.  Amazon quickly replaced it with another one, which had dents, cracks, and the entire bottom was was badly scratched.  I don't have time to keep sending these back hoping to get a replacement which isn't damaged, so I gave up after returning the second one</review_text>
The legs were a bit tricky to put down, and when I did, I busted the mounts. Never even used this thing & threw it away. Coleman makes one that I bought that's better built, and Excalibur Electronics has one available as well that I also bought - I like Excalibur's better, but both are better than this piece of junk. All 3 brands are in the same price range. Interestingly, there aren't a lot of portable ac/dc fan options out there... I bought these for camping in Florida</review_text>
I've owned this sofa for less than a year and it completely fell apart.  The seat of the sofa is supported by a wooden frame with a nylon webbing stretched taught and stapled over it.  We had 4 people of reasonable weight on the sofa (something we've done numerous times before) and it collapsed out from underneath us.  The four parts of the seat frame are held in with small little dowels that rest on a less than one inch lip around the outside of the couch frame.The sofa is designed to look nice  but does not hold up well to average use.  For $400 a sofa should last at least a year of moderate use of people only sitting on it!!! You're better off going to IKEA or some other retailer that spends as much time in the basic structural design as they do in the appearance of the couch.</review_text>
I did not like this product. I'm not aspiring to learn how to be a coffee expert. I tried this out a few times.  It takes 5 mninutes or longer to boil the water. Its also a pain to clean and scrub.  This is a good option for people who want to learn how to make a perfect espresso. A better option is to use the AeroPress coffee and espresso maker. It's real simple to use and worked beautifully the first time and tastes as good or beter than store bought espresso. You can buy this on Amazon.Put in the filter, add some coffee, add some hot water, stir, then press down in just a matter of seconds. Put this device over a coffee cup. Its real easy to clean</review_text>
In the twentieth century, and before, cast iron pans had the size stamped on them which told you the diameter of the cooking surface.  Twenty-five years ago I bought the Lodge 10SK which is a 12" skillet with a 10" inside cooking diameter.  OK.With this skillet marked 14SK the inside cooking surface is only 12" and it should be marked 12SK.  They deceptively flared out the sides to get an overall top diameter of 15 1/4" as a selling point.  This isn't very helpful to my pork chops being 36% less space than I thought I was buying.  I'd watch out for the 10SK too.I guess to get a real #14 cast iron skillet, I need to get a Griswold.HilditchPS: It weighs 10 lbs</review_text>
the electric skillet takes forever to heat up and it does not heat in the corners also it takes longer to cook than an electric  frying pan I would not recommend this product.  thank yo</review_text>
The writeup is incorrect.  This does not fit all cuisinart 12 cup coffee makers, it definitely does not fit the dcc 1200.  While returning it is not difficult through Amazon, it means a trip to UPS and another 2 weeks of waiting for a correct replacement</review_text>
I have two cats both less than 5 months old. I bought CitiKitty training kit hoping it would save me from scooping the litter box. It turned out a piece of flimsy junk that's way over priced. My cats would rather do their business anywhere but on this piece of plastic. Save your money and use it on something more useful</review_text>
The heater that I received was defective. I down loaded a return label from amazon.com and returned the heater. I received my refund very quickly. I have two other DeLonghi heaters of a different model that I am very happy with but are no longer manufactured. This was my first experiance with this particular model</review_text>
If you are looking for a plastic box that rotates, then look no further. If you are looking for a space heater, keep looking</review_text>
I bought these because they matched my dishes.  I really wish I'd kept my old ones, even though they were black.  The size of these is nice for flour, sugar, etc.; however, the rubber seals in them aren't great.  The seal on my flour (biggest one) falls in every single time I take the lid off.  They're pretty, but not very functional</review_text>
mazon. I ordered 4 for xmas dinner, was sent three and they cancelled the 4th one saying the will never get it in.  Thanks Amazon</review_text>
I purchased this book because I have a lot of bundt pans. I was disappointed to see almost half the recipes involved a box cake. I buy cook books to make things home made not via boxed cake mixes. It basicially told you to buy a box of cake mix and add this and that to it. Who can't do that themselves? Not a good cookbook at all. If you want lessons on how to make boxed cakes than you'll like this box. I make all my cakes homemade so this book was useless to me</review_text>
I did not buy the whole set. My review is for an 8" fry pan. It was one of those "try it" deals. I do not like the grooves in the pan because after, for instance, frying an egg, the grooves retain food and if you don't use a brush to scrub the grooves you'll find that after it has dried there are going to be bits of food caught in the grooves. I can't imagine cleaning a whole set of this cookware. Yikes</review_text>
I was very excited with such a inexpensive purchase for high count sheets, but very soon I learned it was not such a great deal.   Beware if using them on an older mattress which is not thick!  After putting on the fitted sheet, it looked like a huge skin on a baby elephant!  Loose material everywhere.  My real complaint is the pills, which appeared only a few days into use.  They snag on rings, watch bracelets, etc.  I would never purchase this material again.</review_text>
While this vacuum is easy to use, it loses suction after only 6 months. Don't buy this to waste money.</review_text>
I loved this vacuum initially.  You can even see how much dirt it's picking up!  However, the shape of the filter severely limits suction almost immediately, to where the vacuum won't pick up a speck of lint.  You ahve to empty the filter every 5-10 minutes.  I do NOT have a terribly messy household, just one with no stairs going to the front & backyard</review_text>
streaks and scratched the front of my dishwasher. Does a very poor job.</review_text>
My Grandmother had one of these in her kitchen and I can remember all the kids fighting over who got to sit on the stool at large family gatherings.  I'm really sorry that I let her's get away from us when she died.  I was so excited to see this stool on Amazon and could not wait to get it. But I returned it within less than 5 minutes of taking it out of the box.  First of all it is a lot smaller than you think.  My daughter's wooden highchair is larger than this stool.  But what really made me dislike it is the color.  To call it red is very misleading. I would say it was closer to orange, which doesn't appeal to me or match my kitchen.</review_text>
I returned them beacause they are nothing like the good old revereware made in the U.S.A.They are very thin and cheap.I do not recommend anyone buying them, you willonly want to return them</review_text>
I can't believe I spent good money on this vacuum.  I've had to open it with a screw driver countless times to try to figure out a myriad of problems: why it won't vacuum without pushing it with all my might, why it makes an awful noise that terrifies my children, why the filter won't stay in place, and why it SMELLS LIKE BURNED RUBBER every time am forced to use it.  I have replaced every filter and belt.  Now I am going to throw it away.  I'd gladly give it to charity, but I can't in good conscience give it to an unsuspecting victim</review_text>
This is the most loathesome appliance I have ever owned. I hate everything about it. Some genius put the power cord at the bottom of the unit, so you have to hold the cord up all the time to keep from backing over it. This may not be such a problem if the stupid "self propelled" function weren't constantly trying to shoot backward, meaning I need both hands just to push the unit forward. It's like I'm dancing with my vacuum and we're fighting for the lead. Ridiculous. I have almost 2000 sf of carpet in my house, and I wake up sore the next day after a round with this monster.Oh--it also came with a free little red DD sweeper--the handle of which broke the first time I tried to use it. I don't know if DD came under new management or what, but I will never buy one of their products again</review_text>
Beware of the five reviews for the mysticmop. Although microfiber mops are relatively new, major department stores have approximately a dozen different mops with different mechanical designs. In order to standout from all the competition, five reviews were concocted for mysticmops in order to deceive buyers about the quality of their mops. Google mysticmop and you will find that all the sites with reviews have the same five identical reviews. Fortunately the "reviews" were fabricated about a month ago so, hopefully, not too many customers have been deceived. My experience has been that most reviewers give, helpful honest reviews.</review_text>
The space between the strands is much greater than shown in the picture.  The cutrain will not hide what is behind it</review_text>
I'm glad some of you received these dishes not broken in a million pieces! Amazon or whoever is packaging these needs to learn how to properly pack.  There was no bubble wrap or popcorn at all - just flimsy sheets of cardboard!!  Duh??  I've sent them back twice now and third time won't be a "charm" for me, 'cause I won't go through this again. NEVER will I ever order breakables from Amazon again. The headache was not worth it - even if the dishes are nice and pretty.</review_text>
This item is not nine inches wide.  It is the same width as the seven stick cornstick pan, but costs ten dollars more.  So you are paying ten dollars to get two extra cornstick molds of the same size.  Hopefully, the item description will be changed soon.  Now, I have to pack up and ship back several of these, but at least Amazon is paying the freight.  Lodge Logic is the greatest for cooking and baking though.  I think this is just a random error.  Just be sure and buy the seven stick pan for 7.99.  The cornsticks will be the same size</review_text>
Just when I thought I was getting used to everything being so much bigger in the US... I should have taken more notice of the other reviews. Beautiful glasses but they are way too small. My set will also be returned, they are a really odd size somewhere in between any use I would have for them</review_text>
The way this Steamer was advertised, I really thought it gave out alot of steam, and lasted a decent amount of time.  I tried it a few times and was very disappointed. I returned the item</review_text>
The design is such that when you pour out liquid, some of it seeps into the space between the outer plastic and the vacuum glass container. Then, when one sets the carafe on a counter, the liquid leaks out.This could be a problem with a particular unit or a marginal design</review_text>
Cat kept peeing on laundry. Tried this product, no change. The only thing that worked was constant cleaning/changing of litter. Maybe this works for other cats, but not mine</review_text>
It looked like such a good idea on TV but that's the thing about TV. They didn't fit well on my stove at all and I couldn't even put my other stock pots on my back burners at the same time. Also the bottom scratched after a couple uses!</review_text>
We bought four sets of the Victoria Collection 600 thread count queen size.   The fitted sheets do not fit on our queen bed.  It seems like that were made for a full size not queen size... list this as a reject.  We are VERY VERY disappointed</review_text>
Pan received wil not be pan pictured.  Pan will look like Kaiser Bakeware Nobless 7-inch springform pan, model#751603.  Pan sent will have correct item#51842 on label from nordicware.</review_text>
I've ordered three. two were broken, as were two replacements they sent. Fragile plastic breaks and can't support the weight of the drawers and spices. They were really nice about sending replacements and refunds, though.</review_text>
We love the Omega Paw litter boxes to death, but when we got our first two we ordered these so we could have cute little matching sets and looking back we really should have spent that money to get a third box.Our cats don't like the paw cleaning side, they refused to walk on it.  So we turned them over to at least collect some of the cat litter, but it still got everywhere so we ended up putting newspapers under the opening for each box and that keeps most of it off the floor.  We leave the mats we have in place for cute value and because sometimes you can get away with just emptying those, but our new boxes are doing fine without them.  The cats even seem to like to pee on the mat once in a while out of spite and then the cat litter melts and cements into the little groves.  You might have better luck if you have less cats who are tidier and have less sensitive paws, but don't buy more than one until you know for sure they can tolerate it</review_text>
If I had to do it over again I would try a different mat (something larger made of soft foam rather than hard plastic)Pros1. reduces tracking somewhat2. more attractive than other litter mats3. doesn't take up too much spaceCons1. my cat doesn't like it--most of the time she races out of her domed box just to avoid stepping on it and ends up flinging litter and other stuff that really should stay in the box onto the carpet2. it's too smal</review_text>
I purchased an Igloo refrigerator and within a few weeks it completely stopped working. Curtis International (Igloo's parent company) has terrible customer service and will not honor customer warranties. After a year of trying to ge this resolved, I have found out that they have an unsatisfactory record with the Better Business Bureau and have many of these types of complaints. STAY AWAY FROM IGLOO PRODUCTS!!</review_text>
I purchased this through Amazon but returned it.  I intended to use this with their 3qt 10-inch saute pan. But it is huge! It is not an elegant design for this size pan. All Clad should have designed a screen that matches this pan instead of a one-size-fits-all from 8 inches to 13 inches.  Furthermore, the unique handle that curves over the screen takes more storage room.  My wife didn't like it.  Back to the drawing boards All-Clad</review_text>
As of today, 3/24 I have not received this product.  Very disappointed with delivery</review_text>
My company bought one of these to replace the similar Capressa 1000 machines which finally broke after N years.After 2 days, the LED readout of the functional information stopped working. The machine continues to operate, but you can't tell what's going on, how much water it will use for your particular cup etc.Very disappointing. We'll see how good the warranty repair is, and report back to you after we experience *that*.</review_text>
When we first bought it, it worked nicely and smoothly. Thought we do not need to buy another opener again. Boy were we wrong! After the third use, it will open only a small gap and the handle will just keep spinning. Reminds me of a car turning it's wheels will all smoke and noise but no results. Glad we still kept our old opener from a much lesser known brand. This opener certainly does damage to the KitchenAid name</review_text>
It looked like it would work,It turned like a high quality itemIt won't open even 1/6 of a can as a newlypurchased item.Go cheap and shop old time stores forcan openers. This is an over-engineeredbenz-lemon of a can opener.I'm taking it back to Nob Hill tomorrowmorning</review_text>
It seemed like it would be a great way to store cereal but it  made more of a mess than it was worth. It spit cereal all over the place. I used Special K and Kashi granola cereal so it may work better if you used it to store something soft like oatmeal or gummy bears! I returned it</review_text>
Bought this item two years ago for power plus price.  The blender ring broke right away and I had to ship it for repair.  The speedometer has never really worked correctly and eventually broke.  The blender, when it does work, is powerful.  The blender ring recently broke again. If you get a good warranty, go for it, otherwise, save your cash for a blender with a good warranty and track record.</review_text>
Corkscrew has a nice heavy duty feel and does a good job of getting the cork out once you get the corkscrew into the cork and that is where the problem lies.  Usually (but not always) Oxo products are good at making things easier to do.  I have yet to figure out what they had in mind when they designed this one.  Getting the screw into a cork is no better than a run of the mill winged corkscrew and probably worse because it is so bulky.  You also have to hold hard onto the body to keep if from turning while you are getting the screw into the cork.  Poor design this time OXO.</review_text>
Yes. I opened immediately when UPS delivered the window fan and it got a severe crack casing!!Got to return to Target minus off my shipping charges! Sad</review_text>
This blender died after 4 months of light use. I never asked it to crush ice or do anything really strenuous. I only used it to blend smoothies and tofu desserts - so the toughest thing it ever had to handle was a couple of half-frozen berries. After two months the motor started to have that burned smell when I used it. After three months the plastic bottom part of the canister started to crack. At four months, the motor started making funny noises, it smelled terrible, and the crack on the canister widened so that liquid started to spill out when in use. All in all, this blender was a total waste of money and ended up in the trash. I will NEVER buy a Hamilton Beach product again</review_text>
I purchased this BonJour frother to replace my old AeroLatte frother.  The difference between the two brands is startling!  The BonJour frothing tip is a solid wavy metal tip which actually OVER-froths the milk.  This causes the bubbles to keep breaking down.  I can only achieve a very thin layer of foam and it won't last long.  On the othe hand, the Aerolatte frothers(also widely available with several models on Amazon) uses more of an open-metal mesh tip on their wand which must be responsible for how thick and dense a foam it will create.  I'm buying another Aerolatte and will use the BonJour wand for things that don't need thick foam (like mixing salad dressing)</review_text>
I received this item - in the description is stated is was 17 inches long when in reallity it was 22 - unable to use still sitting in the box unused - tried to contact the 800 # given by the rep to return - to date no luc</review_text>
This has been a nightmare. When I received the chair I couldn't wait to put it together. However the holes for the screws were too big and therefore I was unable to secure the pieces. I called and asked if the  the right size screws could be sent. I was told that there were no provisions for that, but they would be happy to send me another one.   (I could return the faulty one in that box.) Very nice I thought. Well I got the second one. THE SCREWS ARE TOO SMALL FOR THE HOLES! Now I am stuck with chair parts all over the house and no chair to sit on! I don't recommend this item</review_text>
Do not buy the Shark Portable Steamer under any circumstances.  The trigger mechanism is defective and fails after a few uses, causing all of the steam to leak out uncontrollably, which is also exposes the user to a possible steam burn.  Euro-Pro Operating LLC does not stand behind its products.  They will not sell you a replacement trigger or hose assembly if it fails (and trust me, it will fail).  Instead, Euro-Pro wants you to spend $40 ($12.95 shipping + $27.00 "minimum" repair charge) to even look at it.  Replacement parts are an additional charge!  I can buy a competing product for the cost of Euro-Pro's "minimum repair" charge, shipping charge, + parts charge.  Euro-Pro's service after the sale stinks. I will not buy Shark Products or do business with Euro-Pro Operating LLC ever again.</review_text>
We have used Krups products for years and been highly satisfied with them. This coffee maker has two problems. (1) Its spout is badly engineered. It is impossible to pour out the last 3/4 of an inch of coffee without taking off the lid. (2) It is a thermos; so the machine does not heat up the coffee, but the pot preserves it at the temperature with which it is brewed. I like hot coffee. After the first cup, I find that I have to heat up the remainder in the microwave. This is inconvenient. I would not buy another of this model</review_text>
A year of one time daily use and this coffee maker is already going in the trash.  The swing-out filter "hinges" broke during normal use.  Once broken, the filter now no longer stays in place and falls out when the carafe is removed.  Hence it's ready for the wastebasket.  On closer inspection, the entire filter unit is made of plastic, and the hinges are only a few mm's in diameter. Sturdier design needed!</review_text>
Like everything in the world, this coffee maker is lawyer approved. In other words it does not get hot enough to cause any harm. Unfortunately one minute after poring it is not hot enough to be considered a good cup of coffee.Every day I have to warm my coffee up in the microwave.</review_text>
Evidently the people at Krups didn't try this coffeemaker before they put it on the market. The caraffe is hard to take out and put back in. It scrapes the lid every time. They say it keeps the coffee warm if you preheat the thermos but why then have a timer? You need a microwave handy if you want a hot cup of coffee. You never know how much coffee is left in the caraffe. Also you need to turn the caraffe upside down for the last few cups. I'm sure this is the last Krup's product I will buy.</review_text>
Saucepan made in Indonesia was extremely lightweight and pan was distorted so that the lid did not fit securely.  There was no way to realign the pan so the lid would fit.  It was in the construction of the pan.  As a long time user of Revere Ware, we were very disappointed in this product sent to us.  We will never purchase another Revere Ware product.  Once burned we will not go back to a second treatment</review_text>
Ok well unlike the other reviewers, I hate this ice cream scoop. Yes, it's heavy and seems to be well-engineered. However, I don't like the somewhat square shape of the handle and have a hard time getting a good grip on it. And as another reviewer already mentioned, it has a tendency to collect water in the handle when it is washed. When I'm scooping the ice cream, the water drips out and down the handle, thus making it even harder to grip the handle. It makes the handle slippery and my hand just slides right down to the scoop and I get ice cream all over my hand. I have a cheap $2 plastic scoop that I bought when I was in college, and I prefer it to this one.</review_text>
I bought Cat Sitter1 for my 3 cats, they enjoyed it so much I gave Cat Sitter 2 a go. What a disappointment!!They were bored within 5 minutes of it being on!  The entire dvd is of birds and only birds as compared to Cat Sitter 1 that has a variety of animals that catches the cats attention span in short segments. Trust me, if you have to choose between the two, don't spend your money on on CS2, however, it may appeal to the (human) avid bird watcher...(?)</review_text>
Large burner failed after about 12 months use.  I opened it up the wire between the plug and the resistor had burned.  Not only is it broken, it is a fire hazard.  I lost all the paperwork that came with it and I probably voided the warranty by opening it.  I think I can fix it but I am not going to risk a fire, so I will try another brand</review_text>
I just got this thing 2 hours ago. In the middle of grinding a 16oz bag and it stops working. Made it through about 8oz...try again two hours later thinking motor got too hot, nope. Number one, this is nothing more than a typical small "hand held" grinder with a few lights and a cup dial that does absolutely nothing. DO NOT BUY THIS. The others who wrote a positive review must have been lighting the bottom of a spoon before they tried using this thing</review_text>
This item, affectionately named R2D2, worked like a champ with all the bells and whistles, well, actually lights and dials for about 5 weeks and then just stopped. ... Thus I'm profoundly disappointed - and now without any grinder. In fact, given its short life, the 2 star rating is incredibly generous</review_text>
These 'Vino Grande Chardonnay' glasses are less in volume and shorter in height than the Spiegeleau stemware previously sold under the same name.</review_text>
Was happy with this toaster until I had it for about 4 months.At that time the lever started acting up by not staying down.Sometimes it worked other times we had to prop something heavy on it to keep it down. Not what I expect from a $70 toaster. Well, I have finally given up (2 months later) and am sending it back to Hamilton Beach since too much time has passed to send it to Amazon. They are sending me a new one, which I am not sure I am happy about. Might just exchange it somewhere for a toaster-oven.........</review_text>
I had researched this product for juicing ability and power.  I ended up buying this one and after using it *twice* the motor just shut off.  I returned this product and waited 3 months for the replacement.  I decided to try juicing carrots and celery, and after no more than 5 minutes the motor just shut itself off again.  I might be able to forgive this if it was the only problem with it.  If you are juicing small things, like berries, with larger vegetables/fruit the unit will get off balanced shake the top loose and damage the blade.  I know I read these bad reviews and said, &quot;oh that won't happen to me&quot;... but it did.  I hope you choose a different juicer</review_text>
I did a lot of research and chose this juicer based on reputation, motor power and style.  I exchanged the first one and am now going to have to exchange/return the second one because it automatically turns off after about 90 seconds, even if nothing is being juiced and the motor just runs!  It is not the electricity as I have used several more powerful appliances in the same outlet</review_text>
I bought this blender based on the reviews here, as well as its great-looking design.  When I got the blender, only one of those factors came through.First thing I noticed:  both blender jars leaked badly.  After reseating the seal in the glass jar and tightening it as hard as possible, the leak was slightly reduced.  The metal jar still poured out liquids from the base.Second thing I noticed:  this blender cannot make a good smoothie.  Even after a couple minutes of blending, there are chunks of ice and fruit which have been totally untouched by the blades (regardless of how little ice is put in the smoothie).  For a blender of any price, the DeLonghi does a poor job making smoothies.  For a blender that costs what the DeLonghi does, this performance is totally unjustifiable.But, hey, it does look really good</review_text>
I have owned this vacuum for 2 years. It was great at first. Now, with a 3 level house, it is heavy and awkward to lug around and the hose that serves as the main suction shaft gets clogged at the drop of a hat. I have made mess after mess cleaning out clogs in the hose and now it drops dirt everywhere I move it. The main filter wears out really fast and is expensive to replace. If I had to do it all over again, I'd buy something else. Invest more in a better vacuum- not this one</review_text>
I bought this product on my mom's suggestion, because she was impressed with the suction power.  Not only did the suction power fade over the first few months of ownership, but within 6 months the vacuum was completely broken.  I called in to customer service because it was still under warranty, and they were anything but helpful.  They sent me to a small shop 45 minutes away to have it fixed, which took over a month.  They even lost my paperwork.  One month later it broke again, and customer service suggested I take it out in my backyard, take the vacuum apart, and blow the small holes with an air compressor to clean it out.  For $400, this is ridiculous.  I want my $100 vacuum back</review_text>
I thought this glass would be of better quality than it is. It took 3 shipments (re cieved and returned) to get my complete order without any breakage. These glasses are too fragile and in practice, impractical. Because of the design, one must live with fingerprints all over the body of the glass. Not too appealing when you are observing the "legs" of your wine.Recommend that you pass these by</review_text>
I got a set of 8 a few months ago. First one package arrived with a broken one, then all of them ended up broken. They break if you fill them with water and try to take them by the side. they break if you set them a little too fast on the table. One of them broke by just holding it. Such poor quality I am extremely disapointed. But I loved the design though</review_text>
I have owned this blanket for less than a month so I cannot make any judgment about its longterm durability, but the first (and only) time it was washed it shed like a buffalo in springtime, and the dye used on the "moss" green was not colorfast in warm water and detergent.  I gave it two stars because it is reasonably warm, and has an attractive weave</review_text>
I guess misters are hard to make because most of the ones I have bought in my life don't work out of the box or die shortly after.This one didn't even work out of the box. There was no mist, just air. Oh well, I figured I was taking my chances anyway. If you buy this, hopefully you have better luck.Update: Nowadays, most grocery stores sell pre-packaged, pressurized spray canisters of olive or canola oil. It's like a can of Raid except it sprays oil. I have found that these work perfectly and last a long time</review_text>
I ordered this product 3 months back - as they say "Got into the line". This item was part of an larger order so i could have gotten free shipping. Now I get an email from Amazon stating this item has been cancelled as it was further delayed and as I did not respond to thier email for extending the wait time. I never got an email and now as the remaining items have been delivered - if I need one then I will end up paying shipping too. Amazon is normally good about these things - how can they still have it listed on the site when they are cancelling orders in the pipeline</review_text>
This didn't do as well as an old microwve poper I've used for yers.  It didn't showa great increase in kernals popped,and they were not as light and crispy.  It is absolutely necessary to use the 'power packs', which I couldn't find in local stores.  Since I gave several of the poppers as gifts I shopped on line for replacement 'power packs' for all and found the postage/handling fee for 10 packages was ten times what it cost for one (incredibly light) pack.</review_text>
Pretty, but started rusting on the edges after first wash..Would not buy these again..</review_text>
I read tons and tons of reviews of this product and decided to take a chance on it.  Well that chance did not pay off.  Even in combination with the spray model my cat continued to spray everywhere.  If anyone else has ideas for something that does work i would really appreciate it.</review_text>
Well, its uz hot to the touch and it hasn't really seemed to help my cat with her tension.  Maybe she just doesn't have a problem that Feliway can help.  Anyway, I'm not too thrilled.  Speedy delivery though</review_text>
While the water tasted better, this model didn't last for more than about two months before leaking and eventually spraying water all over the place</review_text>
Makes good coffee but grinder lid breaks very often and has to be replaced. Since the lid is costly to replaced we bought a separate Krups grinder. Cusinart does't answer e-mails about the problem. Look at the number of recondition makers for sale and draw your own conclusions</review_text>
I have to agree with the review about overflowing and basket popping....while this coffee maker does make excellent coffee, if you put a grain too much of ground coffee in it, it will overflow....very frustrating as we like strong coffee. Because ours has overflowed so many times, the metal plate on the bottom has corroded and now it won't hold water....I'll never buy this frogware again</review_text>
Toaster was defective. Had to send it back. Cost me $20 in shipping and I have nothing to show for it</review_text>
the coffe table arrived broken the item where easy to asemble and look good</review_text>
I'm not sure the timer I receib=ved works properly. The timing mechanism dseems accurate, however, the sound it makes when the time is up is more like a "ticking". If you are nor right near it, you'll never hear it</review_text>
I ordered this pan even though i had never heard about this brand before.But the picture on the site and the product review looked good.When i recieved this item the lid that was promised was not shipped.The pan looked worn out and it looked factory refurbished.I returned the pan today and i promised myself that this is the last time i order brands that i have never heard about through the internet.Its better to stick to brands like faberware and calphalon which have not caused me any problems earlier and have lasted for such a long time</review_text>
A drawback of Calphalon's anodized alumninum is that it cannot be cleaned in the dishwasher.  But stainless steel is dishwasher safe, and Amazon's product description claims that Calphalon's stainless steel line is dishwasher safe.  But if you check out www.calphalon.com and look at the description of their stainless line, it explicitly prohibits using dishwasher detergent.  So it is "dishwasher safe" but you can't use dishwasher detergent.</review_text>
Yes, it sits in my drawer and that's all, it's only useful if you have a real dread of trace garlic aroma on your fingers.Instead I cut off the base of the garlic with a widish knife, then put the flat side of the knife on the garlic and whack it with my fist. It's so much quicker and easier, the skin comes off no problem, plus crushing garlic releases more flavour than merely slicing it.</review_text>
These glasses are VERY cheap. I sent everyone of them back. When i recived them 2 were broken. They are very thin</review_text>
The first time I used it I couldn't even boil water in it on my flat surface stove! A notice that came with it said, "This pot may not work on all stoves, refer to the owners manual." (No owners manual was sent with it.) As soon as the water started to heat, the pot danced and wobbled all over and the water was sloshing out of the top! Nothing in the web site ad referred to the pot not working on a flat surface. It would have been nice to have known before ordering, as I am not a pro cook and have no special knowledge of these details</review_text>
more thought needs to be put into the design of this produc</review_text>
Don't waste your money on this. Unless you like your coffee luke warm (I can't imagine it) you will not be satisfied with this product. I am promptly returning mine</review_text>
Worked great for a couple months and then the gears stripped out. Guess you get what you pay for</review_text>
I read the review for this product on Amazon. Lindsey who is one of the 2 reviewers of this product actually had posted a video of the product usage and I was very much convinced by that. I thought the product is good and ordered it immediately. The product arrived in 4-5 days and was in good condition.The most important problem with the roti maker is1. the roti/tortilla is not cooked properly. It remains very much uncooked. Even though you see it puff and everything from the inside it remains uncooked which actually causes a lot of acidity problems.2. Also such an uncooked tortilla when left for a few minutes becomes very dry and difficult to eat. You have to eat the tortilla immediately within 10-15 minutes of the making.Just imagine if you are making 5-7 tortillas the first one will be come dry and difficult to chew.3. The product works as described but the tortillas are not at all good for health since they remain uncooked in the inside</review_text>
After I cracked and ruined my original filter, I purchased a new one that insisted the BioMax inserts were essential to its functionality. Having had my original filter for about 6 years, I decided to follow the instructions about adding BioMax, thinking this was a product upgrade. I was deeply dissapointed. Not only did it create cloudy water, despite my effort to add "clear water" drops to resolve this, but the lifespan of my fish decreased dramatically.  I was losing fish every week.  Once I removed the BioMax insert, the water cleared instantly and my fish started to thrive</review_text>
I bought it some time ago for much less, also  from Amazon. It is not worth $24.00. May be $6.9</review_text>
It's noisy and expensive - you can get that from reading the other reviews on this page. Ours stopped working within 2 weeks of light use. I called the company and when I described the problem they said it was a faulty unit. Thankfully the store let me return it and I got my money back. We have bought the Hamilton Beach TrueAir 04381 Allergen Reducer Air Cleaner which is cheaper, smaller, and very quiet. Most importantly, it works!!!</review_text>
After just a few months of occasional use the lever to lower the bread would not stay down.  I see now that others have had this problem.  Typical "Made in China" junk.  No more T-Fal for us</review_text>
I bought this toaster after reading several reviews, finding a reasonable price, and liking the look of it.  I was looking to upgrade since my old toaster (a toastmaster) was cranked to the highest setting and needed to go through two toast cycles to lightly brown.  I am seriously disappointed with this toaster.  I put my english muffin in and only half the muffin toasts, and that half usually ends up burnt.  The slots are slanted forward, and it seems that when the muffin is in the toaster, it is the upper portion that over toasts, and the lower portion comes out essentially raw.  Though my toastmaster was only 6 years old or so, and had to go through two cycles....it still toasted better then this T-Fal.  I bought it several weeks ago and have only used it a handful of times, I am going to try to clean it up good and return it for some other brand.Hope this helps</review_text>
This toaster lasted for about 8 months before it started to burn toast on one side, even at low settings.  We are very disappointed with this purchase</review_text>
A 1/3 inch split developed in the wood on the spoon's flat edge after about five uses(I hand wash and dry promptly). The same thing happened to the replacement Amazon sent. Amazon-Great!! Mario Batali- not so great</review_text>
I'm looking for a timer.  Simple as can be.  I should have listened to the previous reviews.  This thing simply did not work right out of the box.  It would "catch" at the 20 minute mark and just get stuck there.  Great.I would definitely not recommend this product</review_text>
I bought this hoping to wow my family with some 30 minute meals but this doesn't work great on my electric stove.  If you leave it up too high for longer than a minute on the grill side the griddle coating burns off and stinks up the place.  If you can't leave it up high you don't get good grill marks.  I end up putting on high for a few minutes and then back down.  Doesn't cook thick meat for chicken breast through well.  You are better off finishing them in a real pan in the oven.  The coating chips easily.  I am thinking of going with cast iron as it is more work in the begining but I think it worth it in the long run</review_text>
For the price, you get what you pay for.  They are not the best quality</review_text>
Sleep better?  How could you sleep better when your pillow has a WARNING- FLAMABLE label?  Scary.  The pillows are soft but does not have great neck support.  I'm usually a side or stomach sleeper.  The pillows are better for hugging</review_text>
The pans look very nice and very durable-but they are NOT!!! SAVE YOUR MONEY DO NOT BUY THIS!!! I had to put them through the dishasher a second time to remove some more of the sticky residue on the bottom of the pan from the label. When they came out of the dishwasher there were RUST SPOTS all over them. I am going to try and return mine as soon as I get a chance. I never even got to use the pans before they rusted. It should be noted that a)The pans were NEVER left soaking in water or in the sink b)There was not ANYTHING even the TINIEST bit rusty in the dishwasher with them to have "rubbed off" rust onto them or anything like that. HORRIBLE, HORRIBLE pans-they should be ashamed to make or sell these!!</review_text>
I purchased four of these pillows! I really shouldn't have wasted my money. They fluff up as soon as you take them out of the bags but after you sleep on them they are flat and impossible to fluff up, i'd rather sleep without a pillow at all!!</review_text>
This was a special offer and the price seemed excellent. Description stated "Standard Classic White Goose Down Feather Pillow". A more accurate description would have been "Mostly Feather Pillow with Some Goose Down, Skimpily Filled". I would have purchased better quality had the description been more accurate; i.e. larger quantity is listed first with additional quantities listed in descending order. Vendor should have precisely listed percentage of feather to down content, as they did with other catalog items. I believe they kept description fuzzy leading one to believe it was a fantastic offer rather than what it was. Caveat emptor</review_text>
I am totally unimpressed with this set of bowls.  I received them a few days ago and washed them, and one has already managed to crack after falling of the drying rack and into the sink.  A melamine bowl should be far sturdier than this.  The orange measuring cup/bowls towards the center are nice, but the outer bowls are rather flimsy.</review_text>
I should have followed the advice of most of the reviewers here before I purchased this humidifer.  There was a large mineral buildup but that was the least of it.  Worked fairly good for three months but then it stopped working.  One of the controls literally "froze" in place and the machine was unusable.  No way to fix it - had to throw it away.  What a shame.  Next time I will pay closer attention to what people write.  My advice - by something other than a Honeywell.  I have three packages of filters that I purchased separately - another waste of money</review_text>
The unit features automatic shut off when water is low by using a proximity switch via a float with a magnet in it. It has a shut off by setting humidity level and a shut off by count down timer. After a few weeks of use, the unit started leaking and you can't even tell where the leak is coming from. The pads do not prevent mineral build up on the hot plate. I am getting brownish deposits which I believe to be rust. The only way to remove it, is with white vinegar and old toothbrush which I had to bend into an "L" shape in order to get at and clean the stainless steel hotplate which boils the water. I was happy with the unit and preferred it over an ultrasonic unit I had, until it start leaking</review_text>
This product is markedly inferior to its main competitor, the Pur 2-Stage Dispenser.  Specifically, I found two main flaws:1.  The spigot draws water from at least an inch and a half up from the base of the dispenser.  As a result, quite a lot of water is left inaccessible for drinking, even after tipping over the dispenser.2.  Even more infuriatingly, the spigot's connection to the main housing is so poorly designed that it eventually starts to leak water all over the place.  The first dispenser I purchased started to leak after 1 week.  I dutifully exchanged it for another one, which proceeded to leak after about 2 weeks.  It appears that the "O-ring" that connects the spigot to the main housing shrinks when it gets cold. . . a rather fatal flaw for an item intended for use in a refrigerator.Despite being a lifelong Brita user, I exchanged this product for a Pur 2-stage dispenser.  I am now converted and will never go back.  The dispenser is rock solid, and the water even tastes better</review_text>
This fountain is a piece of junk.  I ordered three of them, and all three had cracks and holes in the top piece.  The top piece is a molded resin that is very thin in places.  The thin regions easily crack, making it unsightly, interfering with the performance, and within days rendering the fountain unusable.  I was very disappointed and ended up buying an entirely different fountain</review_text>
This filter is not, in my estimation, any good. It leaves a sediment , and the end product, the coffee, tastes terrible. Use paper filters insted for a great cup of coffee</review_text>
I bought this coffee maker about 2 years ago. Used 2 x daily and cleaned every month with either vinegar or special cleaner. Unfortunately it began leaking water from outside top of machine. Very poor quality machine .I just threw mine out in the trash bin. Just got tired of constantly having to mop up after it. Don't buy this coffeemaker- a waste of good money( I paid $99.99)</review_text>
This product is a poorly designed piece of crap that is destined to fail from the first day you use it.A friend had purchased this item a few months back and asked me to look at it when it died recently. (I have been repairing electrical and electronic equipment for almost 30yrs). This is a perfect example of a "throw-away" item. If more care had gone into the design and a few more dollars into producing it you might have a product that could last a few years. Neither was done. Look at how many reviews mention the item failing after only a few months... and even the positive reviewers usually have only been using it for a month or so-Do yourself a favor and buy a commercial grade hot plate from a reputable manufacturer. You will pay more but you will likely still be using it many years from now. (Not too mention that the operation will be better also). How much "VALUE" is in a $20 hot plate when it is headed to the landfill a few months from now? It is a shame that so many people are willing to accept low quality products these days and think it is OK if it lasted a few months (note the reviews...)Good Luck-</review_text>
This burner is driving me nuts.  It was okay for the first 2 weeks, took forever to heat up but it would boil water.  Well I am trying to make pasta now, and it won't even boil the water.  I would NEVER by another toastmaster product</review_text>
Don't buy this product.  It was ill-fitting and incompatible with the coffee maker amazon matched it up with.  I returned mine and went with paper filters, which work so much better and are cleaner</review_text>
We had a set of Chicago Cutlery knives for many years and thought they were good quality.  Over time, the wooden handles dried out and the blades didn't sharpen very well.  So we replaced them with this set, but were very disappointed. The blades rust after very brief exposure to water.  We are still using the old ones</review_text>
I own the graphite style of this set.  I was originally very happy with the purchase - the set looked great, didn't chip easily, and was a great size.After a year of use I've come up with a list of problems:The clear glazed surface on the plates and bowls can be scored by utensils which allows water/dirt to penetrate to the porous ceramic below leaving stains that cannot be removed.The semi-matte finish acquires a "powdery", almost bleached, look to it after many washings (says dishwasher safe, guess that means the colors don't wash away immediately)My biggest complaint:  We bought these because they were "microwave safe".  I don't know what microwave safe means to most people, but it means to me that I could put a plate, bowl or cup in the microwave, heat up the contents, and then safely remove the object and use it.  In the case of the set I purchased, it only seems to mean that the item placed in the microwave will not explode.Unfortunately in the case of the Sango Graphite set, it means that the contents of the set are sheilded by the (plate/bowl/cup) and that the contents will emerge warm at best while you burn your hand attempting to extract the (plate/bowl/cup) that has soaked all of the energy up from the microwave.  They get VERY hot!  (Cup of water heated for 2 mins results in water temperature of 120F while cup surface is 170F!) I've only broken 2 items from the set, both times I dropped the items after getting them partly out of the microwave and realizing that my fingers were being burned (first time I thought it was a fluke, second time I learned my lesson) and dropped the item on the hard stove surface below the microwave.I emailed Sango several times and received no response at all.While I liked the set a lot initially, I have been very disappointed over time with its quality. I will never purchase another from Sango again</review_text>
Unsatisfied.  Never received the item.. Waited 8 wks before canceling order. Purchased item at Macy'</review_text>
poor quality, the cover leaks, I had to return it back, DO NOT BUY</review_text>
I've owned one of these for about a month.  It's a total waste of money.  It rarely sprays, just a steady stream of oil.  I'm diabetic and thought this would be a good way to restrict my use of oil on salads, etc.  I am so very disappointed......   I'll try to find another brand that is more reliable and that does what it's advertised</review_text>
I placed an online order of the set at RONCO and cancelled it 5 minutes later.  To confirm my concellation is in time, I called RONCO hours later.  Despite their promise on the phone, they still send the package.  After I refuses to accept the shipment (follow their instruction), they still charge me $35 for the shipping.  These people do business in such disgraceful way.  How can you expect a good quality product from them</review_text>
This wok is heavy and unbalanced - it can tip while on the element.The long handle is thick and uncomfortable, and its solid weight is probably what unbalances the wok.  Lifting it up is difficult with one hand and trying to shift the food to a plate is a dangerous task.The flat bottom isn't wide enough to really be stable or to capture enough heat for the high temperature required for stir-frying.  If I wanted to saut, I'd have gotten a saut pan.The lid is also heavy and difficult to put anywhere.  You need lots of counter space.As well, this wok just isn't large enough for stir-frying for more than two people</review_text>
I paid what I would call a fairly high price for a blanket I could have gotten from a Discount club for half the price.  The photo is very misleading in that only the top and bottom edges are hemmed, the left/right sides are simply cut.  I expect this to disolve within 4 washes.  Will not buy from this manufacturer again</review_text>
It looked okay when I opened it.  Then I washed it before using and my washer and dryer were full of "cranberry" colored lint (wet in the washer and dry in the dryer).  The next time I washed it was better but, still some lint in the washer and normal in the dryer.  It is not warm enough alone.  It might be okay in the warmer months but, not what I expected for winter</review_text>
I have used Wamsutta for years and have always been pleased with their quality and softness.  But I sincerely regret having bought these sheets.  I purchased one set, and, after the 2nd wash, there was enough pilling that they were uncomfortable to sleep on (all the little "balls" felt scratchy).  My husband asked me why we were using the "old" sheets instead of the new ones because they looked so worn!  I was so suprised that I called Wamsutta directly, and the very nice lady there assured me that I must have gotten a defective set, because that simply "doesn't happen with their sheets".  So I exchanged them with an identical pair.  And the end of the story is that I am returning this set for a refund because it is doing the exact same thing.  What a disappointment.  Absolutely do not recommend, and am now very wary of all Wamsutta products</review_text>
Yes, it is pretty. No, it is not a good teapot. I have made tea for over 40 years, in all sorts of pots, and this is right up there with the worst. It drips A LOT! Perhaps those who think it does not drip were just looking at the spout. And no, it does not drip from the spout. Rather, lots of tea runs down the underside of the spout and ends in a big puddle under the pot.  This happens with both fast and slow pouring, with full and near empty pots.  This teapot will most likely have to become a pretty red flowerpot. Just too much mopping up</review_text>
I bought this sheet set, the newest blue comforter with the light saber duel, and the micro bead pillow as a Christmas gift for my 9 year old son.  He, too, loves Star Wars...and as I read the other reviews, Im nodding my head.  THESE SHEETS FEEL LIKE BURLAP!  I have washed them regularly since December...with no improvement.  They dont fade, though..which I suppose was the motivation behind the manufacturer making them with 70% polyester and only 30% cotton. VERY STIFF AND SCRATCHY</review_text>
got it to work once    but can't now   dont buy it!!!!!!!!!!!!!</review_text>
I loved this when we first got it home. I'm handicapped and can't push a big vacuum. So, this was just right to pick up the "top & showing" dirt until the housekeeper could get here once a week.But after two months the AC adapter cord just snapped in half. It was oddly brittle from the very beginning. I contacted Euro Pro who would not replace it under warranty. So, I ordered a new adapter from them (which came to approx. $15) with shipping.  Now six weeks later, they sent me a card saying "due to overwhelming demand....." the adapter is on back order. I wonder why they have such a large demand? Funnily enough, the cleaner has still been working for the whole six weeks on it's last charge. But, no more.  I think it's time to bury it and move onto an old fashioned (no power) push sweeper</review_text>
I decided to return this about 45 seconds after opening it.  The metal is thin and flimsy, and the construction very poor (e.g., little plastic end guards cheap looking and loose).  Also, it was a bit lopsided, so it did not sit squarely on my counter.Maybe it works fine.  Who knows.  The design and manufacture were so poor, I didn't keep it long enough to find out</review_text>
I understand the appeal of having the convenience of a spout on a bottle of oil, but be aware that the spout will allow air into the bottle. You may think air only gets in when you pour oil out, but that's not true. Any time the temperature rises, the air in the bottle expands and some escapes through the spout. When the temperature drops, air enters the spout. This is true of even small changes in temperature such as you experience in a kitchen. If you don't use the oil pretty quickly this constant exchange of air will expose the oil to oxygen and that will cause the oil to go rancid.If you use cheap olive oil (and pretty much all grocery store olive oil is cheap oil -- even the extra virgin) you may not notice as much since cheap oils tend to be more bitter than good olive oils, but it will still happen. I would never put olive oil in a bottle with a spout again. (I learned this lesson the hard way.)A better option, though less elegant, is to use a bottle with a pour spout and cap, or find a pour spout that has a cap to seal it</review_text>
I would not recommend purchasing these sheets.  They are thin, not very soft, and they wrinkle easily</review_text>
The feel of the sheet is good, but the details, such as the elastic are questionable.  Elastic on fitted sheet is loose and slips off easily</review_text>
The bad news about these 300 thread count sheets is that the threads must be so thin as to qualify for supermodel status.  This causes the fabric to be so thin, you can just about see your hand through it.  Also, out of the dryer they are quite wrinkled.  The good news is that the red border color that I chose did not bleed in the washer.  Further, they did not shrink at all.  I don't know how they feel to sleep on, as they are for a guest bed, for occasional use only.  Just by the way they look, if I were to use them daily I would have returned them</review_text>
Not too happy with this small pizza stone--before I ordered this one for a long time I had a set of flat bricks in my oven that were made for pizza baking and bread baking.  I couldnt find these bricks again--I had them for a long time and they were cracked and hard to clean by now BUT they were so much better than this small round stone!  My bricks made my pizza crust so crispy--and this stone is a poor substitute for this!  My bricks were square and made a beautiful large square on my shelf--if anyone knows what I am writing about--PLS email me and let me know where these set of bricks can be found and their name!  I am not happy with this pizza set-the rack is of no use--the pizza cutter is a cheap one--they really should put the money into making a better product than giving extras</review_text>
I could not believe the condition in which this rolling pin arrived.  When I opened the bag around the pin one handle fell off.  When I looked at the pin I noticed huge dark gouges in the wood pieces that make the ravioli.  I thought that was bad enough but when I turned the pin over there was a huge chunk out of one of the wood pieces.  Needless to say, it's useless.  This was my first experience with amazon and it will be my last</review_text>
Unfortunately, I ordered these twice and received rectangular bakers instead.  This was *not* Amazon's fault, but Emile Henry's for mislabling the box as oval bakers when they were not.  In fairness to Amazon, they tried to make it right but had a difficult time doing so since the contents of the box were mislabled.Althought I would have preferred the oval bakers, I kept the rectangular ones and do like them</review_text>
I found it very awkward trying to stabilize the pump with one hand, and pull the pump up  and down to get the air out.Also I can not get the top out of the decanter. It seems stuck there.As a result, I can not say if it does what you claim</review_text>
First one came cracked, second one came chipped.  Gave up</review_text>
Washed them once (before using) and now they look really old. They have loose threads hanging out in several places and have small balls all over them.  I am not impressed. Would not buy again</review_text>
I ordered it on 9/9.  At the beginning it would come middle of October.  It was OK.  However, delivery schedule had been changed.  It is not arrived yet, nor I do not know when it will come.Amazon knows this delay.  However, they asked me to send a review of it.  What does it mean?I rated this item as  1-star; it is not for the item, but for the seller, Amason. Amazon is generally good campany, I think.  However, I cannot accept my situation for this.  Honestly saying, I want to rate 0-star for this order</review_text>
well built, take apart to clean, very noisy and the setting for the width of slicing moves to much and thickness changes</review_text>
I have really enjoyed the quality of all of my other Cuisinart cookware.  Unfortunately, this tea kettle does not belong in the otherwise excellent product line.  The kettle's shape makes it very difficult to pour.  The handle conveys all of the heat of the boiling water, so you are not able to touch the handle without a hot pad.  I have given up using the whistle attachment for two reasons:  first, it is not made of Cuisinart's stainless steel (it appears to be made of plastic with a silver plastic coating), and so it has cracked and peeled from the heat; and second, it is impossible to remove the whistle when the kettle is hot so you are unable to pour your boiling water (often all that comes off when attempting to remove the whistle is the decorative ball on its tip!).  I really wish that I had returned this tea kettle</review_text>
I ordered this table based on the reviews I read and boy I will never do that again.  This table is such poor quality and is NOT worth the money.  I am so disappointed in it that I shoved it in a corner where no one can see it and put a plant on it. It is not a sturdy table so if you are looking for something that holds up this is not one to buy.  I would say this table is worth $20 and no more...........</review_text>
I bought these because I was looking for nice red glass.  I'm almost embarrassed at the size of them.  They are not practical but i paid so little it wasn't worth sending them back.  I recently saw them in Bloomingdale's so maybe this is the new trend but they won't do anything for your wine.</review_text>
A few times it worked great, but mostly it brewed uneven. I'm not being a nitpicker here... Literally one cup would overflow and the other would be 3 inches below the brim. There was no pattern to it, sometimes it was  the left one, sometimes the right one, sometimes neither. Filling the reservoir and seeing where the water level falls is challenging... don't mess up because there are holes in the back and the water will pour right out the back and all over your counter! It only took two days before I realized this was not worth the money or the time</review_text>
I am becoming steadily more disillusioned with the KitchenAid brand. This blender is only one of several KA appliances I have purchased that only lasted about a year. I don't use a blender much, maybe once a month, so when this died after only eleven months, I was shocked. KitchenAid was no help whatsoever. My husband took it apart & discovered that the motor still works, but the on/off switch went bad; however we found that having it repaired would cost as much as a new blender!! After years of brand loyalty, I am sad to say that I will not be buying anymore KitchenAid</review_text>
I was very upset with these sheets and how much lint is STILL coming off. It totally clogged my dryer. I have washed them 3 times and I still come up with a trap full. Should have sent them back.</review_text>
I bought this only because I wanted a pair of stainless shears. You do need your muscles, though. I am using it to remove the fins from fish. Good luck</review_text>
I thought I was getting a SET of forks NOT one fork. The picture and description are deceptive. The picture depicts a set(s) I am sure the ONE fork I got is great but I have 5 other hands that need a fork as well</review_text>
very bad quality, not worth to buy it.it is not as good as the picture. Don't buy it!!</review_text>
I am extremely happy with this product.  It works like a charm for making pancakes and they never ever stick.  It's a superb design and I am very pleased.  I would highly recommend it</review_text>
I was not pleased with this griddle at all.  After reading the positive reviews, I ordered it.  Maybe mine was defective, but every piece of french toast in the front of the griddle was on the verge of burning when I flipped them.  It did not cook evenly for me and the directions were unclear as to what you can actually put in the dishwasher.  Oh well.  Can't win them all</review_text>
Normally things I purchase, have no problem.  This item is now being used to heat water when company comes over for tea.  Has to be the worse item to make coffee yet.Always purchase the whole beans and grind the coffee myself, this item just never got the coffee's true wonderful flavor.  Perhaps because it was a refurbished item, but I just think Hamilton Beach needs to improve this item big time</review_text>
We had previously bought this same coffee maker new and liked it so much that we wore it out.  When I saw the refurbished for $20.00 I thought it was a great deal.  It would have been if it had come with all the parts and didn't leak!!  It didn't come with seals or with the water purifier.  I tried everything including new seals (that I bought separately).  Eventually we just went out and purchased a new one, because we still like the model.</review_text>
I had high hopes for this nightlight after reading other reviews, but it isn't so hot. The light isn't very bright and quite diffused, and the light sensor isn't sensitive enough - it stays on in all but the brightest light. I ordered two, but have only opened one, and the other is likely to stay in its packaging</review_text>
I'm a student in college, and when my first hamper ripped, I decided that it was time to buy a sturdier hamper. My roommate rarely does his laundry, so he has huge loads, but his hamper manages to carry it all. I saw the Whitney Design hamper online, which looked nearly identical to my roommate's hamper, so I bought it.When the hamper arrived, I put my clothes in it, and prepared to do laundry. The shoulder strap ripped right off. I didn't even fill up the hamper all the way, as is shown in the picture. Amazon sent me a replacement, but now I am afraid of using the shoulder strap again, and I have to awkwardly grasp the sides around the metal wires. This hamper may be able to function, but not well. And for a college student, this is definitely not sturdy enough</review_text>
OK, so I thought I was crazy, not being able to make a decent meal with my crockpot. People were making fun of me, "HOW CAN YOU BURN ANYTHING IN A CROCKPOT"??Now, I look at the reviews on this thing and see that I AM NOT ALONE.I always wondered why people liked food out of a crockpot! Now I know that they are not SUPPOSED TO be like this!!!DO NOT EVER BUY THIS THING UNLESS YOU LIKE SCORCHING BURN GUNK!!!!!On the 10 hour setting it starts boiling within only a few hours!!!!I am trashing mine today!!</review_text>
I have used one crock pot or another for many years. I bought this one because I was delighted with the sturdy removable stoneware bowl; I really like this feature. Clean-up is easy.I use this crock pot for soups and beans because it cooks way too hot for anything else. Even so, I need to stir from time to time. Apparently, excessive temperature is the problem most people are having with this pot. This might be a safety issue; I would not keep this pot on and leave the house.I am disappointed that the handle has broken off of the lid, which really should not happen with normal use. I lifted the lid, to stir of course, and off came the handle! Lifting the lid is definately normal use!</review_text>
I took water temperatures at high, low, and keepwarm. I am at 5200 ft altitude so water boils at about 195. All temps reached 203 and the water was in a rapid boil!I have a small Rival I picked up for $12 and it works great low 190, high 199, and Warm 160</review_text>
I received these as a wedding gift.  Not, five of my tall glasses are broken, and two short glasses...none of which were from dropping them.  One broke as I was hand-washing them, and cut up my hand.  Another literally broke as a guest was drinking out of it.  I was so embarrassed</review_text>
I liked the blinker light when I got it.  In fact, friends noticed it and I referred them here to get it.  HOWEVER, in short order, it went on the blink, so to speak.  The on-off mechanics are not well designed and literally half the time the darn thing is such a pain to get working, I either take it apart and reassemble it or throw it back in the drawer</review_text>
I have loved every Le Creuset product I have purchased with the big exception of the Whistling Teakettle!  I did away with it a couple of months ago and bought the Brittany model to replace it.  The Whistling kettle burned my hand on several occasions, as the design of the spout allowed the hot water to spit and jump right out of the pot!  The whistle is removable and you must put your hand near the spout to remove it for pouring.  Even after waiting a minute after taking the water off the heat, the water would still jump from the spout.  While a little larger than I would have liked, the Brittany does not have the same problem and the whistle can be safely flipped up before pouring.  I have been very pleased with my new kettle and would recommend the Brittany by far over the Whistling</review_text>
One shouldn't have to empty water out after every use.  One shouldn't be punished with a rusty teapot for leaving water in the pot once or twice.  That is not a functional teapot, if that may be the case.  Though it is the prettiest teapot around, it is not very practical if you want to keep it around for a while.  Le Creuset products are generally supposed to last a lifetime, but the enamelware can't even touch the quality of the cast-iron cookware.  Fortunately, the company stands by its products and I am sending mine back for a replacement.  See www.lecreuset.com for details..</review_text>
I have probably seen hundreds of tea kettles by now and still love the look of this one the best.  Only problem is that they RUST!!!  I had mine a few weeks when I noticed the rust spots on the interior.  I don't imagine the enamel could have been chipped on the inside of the pot, so it must have happened simply because I leave water in my tea kettle at all times.  The directions that come with this kettle say not to do so, but any serious tea drinker like me knows that's unrealistic.I threw mine out and am very disapointed that something that cost so much money didn't last long at all.  I thought Le Creuset was supposed to be really high quality but I'm officially disillusioned thanks to this tea pot</review_text>
I ordered two based on the description that the mug keeps the coffee hot and that it is spill proof.  The coffee barely comes out of the lid to sip and when I tip it up to even get a drop more of it seeps out of the area where it screws on so it drips down the front of me.  It is a very frustrating mug to drink from.  The only thing that is good about it is that it is very well insulated and does keep the coffee hot.</review_text>
The set is lovely and coordinates perfectly with my OCR china set. The box is also beautiful. I wish they'd give you a diagram for placement of the flatware in the box for those of us who are first-timers.</review_text>
The seals are not air or water tight.  There is no problem with the cansiter or the clear window, but I cannot store any flour or rice type products as the seals are not airtight and allow bugs in them.  The canisters themselves do not rust and the lids are not easy to remove</review_text>
I bought this and used it once. Right from the begining I could tell this was a shotty product. I don't know who designed the wringing fuction but it doesn't work in the least. And the removeable cleaning head would not stay attached half the time and I assure you it was inserted correctly. Waste of money!!</review_text>
Unless you look like Popeye and/or have the ability to rip phone books in half with your bare hands, you will struggle to wring this mop out. Even if you can move the wringer, the handle sections slide apart. I spent more time putting it back together and cursing than actually cleaning the floor</review_text>
I've bought a number of Oxo kitchen accessories, and found them to be sturdy, remarkably well designed, and easy to use.Unfortunately, this timer is an exception.It has the usual features typical of timers at this price point: clock plus timer, ten number keys for input, memory, etc. But instead of being flat with a magnet on the back so it can fall off the refrigerator like other timers, it's round like a traditional wind-up kitchen timer. It's solid-feeling and has nice non-skid feet on the bottom.The problem is the display. It's horrible. For three reasons:First, the numbers are small -- smaller than any other timer I've seen. They're about 1/4" high, half or less the size of those on comparable timers.Second, the numbers are recessed 1/8" or more beneath a clear plastic cover, not on the surface -- it's dark in there and feels like looking down a well. It desperately needs a backlight, but there is none. Unless the light source is shining directly into the display, there's a large dark shadow covering part of the numbers. But that causes the third problem:The clear plastic cover over the numbers is both curved and highly reflective, and it's virtually impossible to arrange things so that there isn't a reflection shining back into your eyes .The bottom line is that I have to fiddle around to get the timer, the light source, and myself into a position where I can read the small, dark, shadowed, and reflective display. Not what I need when I'm trying to cook.It's just not worth it. Since I have several other timers with displays I don't have to strain to read, I use this one as a paperweight. I'd have to say it works very well.I just don't understand how Oxo managed to let such a flawed design out the door</review_text>
the thing did not work right from the beginning and now the tail fell off would not recommend it to anyon</review_text>
The pitcher is made from poor quality materials. We have two pitchers and have never washed them in the dishwasher. In less than a year, both pitchers cracked along the seam that runs from the spout down the side of the pitcher. If we attempt to use them, tea immediately leaks all over the counter. Since other pitchers are not compatible with the machine, our ice tea maker is useless. We have owned two previous Mr. Coffee Ice Tea models in the past ten years. The pitchers lasted for several years before eventually cracking. Mr. Coffee chose to use inferior materials with this model. I am very disappointed in the quality and will never trust their company again. I am now searching for an ice tea maker that uses quality materials</review_text>
Its an oven timer, right?  So why is it made out of cheap plastic that CAN MELT?  The first time it was used was also the last time it was used because it was left on top of the oven while I baked a batch of cookies.  The heat from the oven melted the back of the timer.  Good thing I also used the timer on the oven clock as a back up or I may have had to pitch the timer AND the cookies.  Even if this product were free, I would not use one</review_text>
We've had this for about five years.  The battery went dead but THERE IS NO WAY TO CHANGE THE BATTERY.  The battery is soldered to the circuit board!  They expect you to ship it back to the factory which will probably cost $20 each way!  I opened it up, cut out the old battery, and duct-taped a new battery in there but it just comes loose every few months.  Cooks rice great, though</review_text>
I have owned this type of product for years and it works very well.  This review is to warn others to think twice about ordering it from amazon. They shipped the first one damaged. Then the replacement for the damaged one was much worse than the first one!  Very frustrating and time wasting. Think about it... its a plastic product that if not shipped/packed properly is going to be damaged and will likely leak water.  I have ordered many things from amazon for many years and this is the worst result I have seen. Needless to say I am getting a refund and buying from another retailer</review_text>
We have been searching for a solution to our very uncomfortable seats in our Ford Windstar van. This cushion did not help</review_text>
I'm a BIG coffee drinker and I thought the Bunn would be a coffee lover's delight. It turned out to be my biggest nightmare. It takes a lot to set it up and get it started. If you make a mistake and close the cover before you have the pot in place, boy what a mess. It leaked out the bottom and was VERY large and heavy. Took up way to much room on my counter. I dumped it after one week and bought a Farberware coffee maker and it is just as good, if not better. It's small, easy to run, and the coffee tastes great.Deb in New Hampshir</review_text>
Sorry, but I can still smell the odor. Plastics absorb odor. After a couple of weeks the smell permeated the whole contraption. Also, the tube/bag thing doesn't last as long as they say. I dump baking soda in with the poop every time, which seems to help. Otherwise, it's not worth the money</review_text>
This is not a good product -- it is not a very flixible plastic and breaks easily if dropped or flexed.  It is also not large enough for some dishes and microwaves.  Nordicware does make a more flexible cover, but the advertising for this one is not very clear about features</review_text>
It does nothing that I can see except leave a pleasant scent.  I scrub it in with a firm bristle brush, wait 30 minutes, vacuum with my Dyson, and my carpet still looks the same. It is only 2 years old so it isn't an old carpet.  It might work on carpets that are more of a "pile" but not berber.  I gave 2 stars just for scent alone</review_text>
Bought one. It quit working within 6 weeks. The litter box lid never did fit correctly, and the unit just stopped running.Littermaid sent a replacement. The lid on the replacement wouldn't close either and the tracks for the rake were out of alignment. After some fine tuning, the unit worked for THREE days before quitting.Perhaps this is a good idea whose time has not yet arrived. The units I have bought and received are USELESS.As it is, I'm out $170 with no hope of a fix...</review_text>
While one of the other reviewers states that it only works on some types of champagne bottles, I couldn't get it to work at all.  I tried it on two different shapes of bottles, but to no avail.  The problem is that the ring that is supposed to slide down the neck to secure the stopper doesn't slide when it's on the bottle.  When off the bottle, the mechanism works fine.  It appears to me that the stopper must be made for a specific bottle and not for most champagne bottles in general.  At least that was my experience.  I found a good $3.00 stopper at Sur la Table that works just fine and is not dependent on the shape of the champagne bottle.  It doesn't have the fancy pour spout, but at least it keeps the bubbles in the champagne</review_text>
I have two earlier Aerobeds and they are very comfortable and conforms to support our bodies.    This new Premier DuraSuede is like lying on a sheet of tin.   The material is so stiff it does not conform to our body.  I find it unusable</review_text>
This flan pan is very flimsy, and don't hold up well</review_text>
The wire broke off as I was slicing my first slice of chedder cheese.  Needless to say, I do NOT recommend this cheese slicer.  Last I checked, they're supposed to last longer than one slice.  Maybe mine was faulty...but regardless, I expect better</review_text>
You never ever use an electric wok to cook Chinese food.  It is all about the fire and the intensity of the heat.  Only people that use this are people whom have no idea what they're doing.  Do yourself a favor and purchase a real wok</review_text>
Has to be seasoned just about everytime before use.  Overwise, great pan</review_text>
I ordered this teapot because at the time it came with a free tea infuser. When it arrived, the teapot was broken, with a large section missing from the side. I returned it and had to pay the shipping to the company to reorder the same item after I received a refund only for the items price. After receiving my second teapot, it was cracked in the exact same spot. I returned the product and complained with no response. I was refunded the price for the teapot, but I am out $10 in the cost of shipping. It seems highly unlikely that two teapots would break in the exact same spot, so I would try a different product.</review_text>
I did what I think is a fair amount of reseach before buying this product, and the Euro-Pro was bad decision. The product wouldn't even turn on, much less work. The packaging indicated it had passed Qulaity Control. whatever that means This was a Christmas gift that totally flopped. The Euro-Pro was one of the more expensive deep fryers in the store and I assumed the price was equal to the quality, boy was I wrong. If you're purchasing a deep fryer please stick to the name brands. This will be exchanged tomorrow and not for another Euro-Pro. Too bad because my 16 year old was looking forward to Deepfried Japanese dumplings for Christmas. A real disappointmen</review_text>
I have purchased 2 of these from Amazon, neither worked. I tried buying them from Bed Bath & Beyond, neither worked. This is a horrible company. There fryers are delivered non-working, there sweepers are bad and get recalled if they didnt catch fire. Very poor product development. Better off buying T-Fal</review_text>
The handle and pump mechanism for this dispenser are cheesy plastic - they will not last at all.  The previous reviewer also pointed out - correctly, that the honey drips out very slowly.  Not worth the money.  They should have used a metal handle and pump and charged a reasonable price for decent quality.  Not worth your money</review_text>
I could not believe it was for only one cup.  I did not read throughly and thought it was for four.  Big dissapointment</review_text>
Was happy with this toaster until I had it for about 4 months.At that time the lever started acting up by not staying down.Sometimes it worked other times we had to prop something heavy on it to keep it down. Not what I expect from a $70 toaster. Well, I have finally given up (2 months later) and am sending it back to Hamilton Beach since too much time has passed to send it to Amazon. They are sending me a new one, which I am not sure I am happy about. Might just exchange it somewhere for a toaster-oven.........</review_text>
I'm sure it will get a 5 star if I ever get the item. I placed the order on 2/6/07</review_text>
Item was defective and this was te second item receive</review_text>
I have the black version, but I'm writing reviews for the white and red as well to save you from buying this toaster model.  From day one, it hasn't been able to toast anything evenly - be it frozen / fresh /refrigerated  bread / bagel / english muffin - you name it.  If you don't believe me, see the photo I uploaded.  The toast is burnt and raw at the same time</review_text>
Hi,Really like drinking wine from these glasses.  Ended up with 8 each in two sizes.  Broke my 4th glass the other day while cleaning it.  NEVER broke any other end-high stemware doing that.  Believe me, I've been very careful too.Also had one break in a very modern dishwasher operating on a crystal cycle.Just too thin and fragile despite the resonable price and good functionalit</review_text>
I purchased this reconditioned item primarily to toast English Muffins, which I eat regularly. Strangely, I had to set it all the way up to its darkest setting (9) just to get the muffin to be somewhat browned. I would routinely have to toast more than once to get the desired level of toasting.I suspect there was something wrong with mine, but who knows? I returned my KitchenAid and ordered a Krups toaster...I am hoping for better results</review_text>
MY 5 YEAR OLD DAUGHTER LOVES THIS VACUUM THE ONLY PROBLE IT DOESN'T HOLD A CHARGE I CHARGE IT OVER NIGHT AND MAYBE LASTS 15 MIN CAN ANYONE HELP....</review_text>
I opened one of the packages and there was blood on the card that the sham was folded around. I promptly called Amazon and they replaced it. It was a waste of money, the first time I washed them, white patches appeared all over the shams as if they dye washed out. I was very, very disappointed with the quality and will not order them again. Don't waste  your money</review_text>
I have been searching for a baster with an injector.  This one looked good.  It works OK with the injector but it does not work at all as a regular baster.  I guess I will keep searching</review_text>
I bought these because I was sick of creating foil shields on the pies I bake.  I love that these slip perfectly on and off.  However, I've found that since they're made of metal or aluminum, they actually conduct heat and cause the crust of the pie to darken faster than the center--which is exactly what I DIDN'T want it to do.  That said, I have to admit that while the edges of my pies look darker than the rest, it hasn't come out burnt as it would if I were to bake the pie without any sort of shield.I'm planning on buying another brand's--something made from silicone instead</review_text>
We are very disappointed in the peformance of this toaster. The bread will toast good on the inside but barley on the outside. I sent email to West Bend and was told the maybe the bagle switch was stuck--no help.  If I return it, shipping cost makes it not worth it. Good appearance and Company name fooled me. FY</review_text>
The coffee pot came with the down and timer buttons stucked together. Sent it back and received replacement quickly.  It was great when it worked, after the 3rd day it didn't come on as programed and the down button got stuck again.  The weather display was neat, too bad it didn't work out.  I think there is a design fault on the machine.  But I have to say Amazon has great customer service, we received our replacement very fast</review_text>
The coffee is extremely hot from this coffeemaker. Beware! I find the product adequate but not outstanding. It is difficult to insert the pot all the way in after use</review_text>
Got one as a Christmas present - great concept, but the performance falls well short of the promise.As another reviewer noted, wine from my wine fridge (56 deg.) registered as 74 deg. when placed into the unit; wine at room temp (72 deg.) regularly registered 78 deg. or so.  Although the unit ran through it's cycle and indicated wine had been chilled to the proper temperature it never was.  In fact, if you put the bottle back into the unit immediately and started it again it would register a temperature about 10 degrees warmer than it had indicated just seconds earlier.I tried about half-a-dozen times over a couple days, but it never worked properly.We returned the unit to the store for credit</review_text>
these lights are junk, but the vendor i purchased them from is excellen</review_text>
I bought 4 of these light sets after seeing them in Real Simple magazine. I thought they looked and seemed to be a perfect option for my kitchen......WRONG!After only 15 minutes, my brand new batteries (4 AA) seemed to fade, and within an hour.....DEAD.  I thought this is a mistake, and bought new batteries again, only to be upset when the same thing happened!  I called the manufacture about getting the adapter 4.8V it requires.....only to be told they do not sell to the public and I would have to track it down at Radio Shack, etc. Well, I have had no luck on that yet.....lots of 4.5V, but no 4.8V. I wish I could send these back. They were a complete waste, and if I ever find the proper adapters, I will certainly use them. But that defeats the purpose of me choosing wireless lighting, doesn't it</review_text>
They take batteries but don't last 15 minutes.  They have an ac spot for and adapter but where do you plug a undercounter light in under the counter.  Hate them</review_text>
I used this light at my computer desk because I wanted something that would give off a soft light so I could still see to type after everyone went to bed and less than a couple of hours later the light began to fade, the batteries (brand new) died</review_text>
I was disappointed at how much these sheets wrinkle in the dryer. I have purchased more reasonably priced bed sheets that were of better quality at half the price of what these were. I bought them because I liked the color, and the red is a very pretty, bright color. I would not recommend buying these unless you like to iron your sheets, or dry them on low heat. The material of the sheets is fairly thin, so I am not sure how long they will last</review_text>
This is an ugly vase.  So ugly we are returning it the day we received it.  It does not measure up to Mikasa standards at all.  It looks and feels like a cheap vase one would buy at Target.  We were very disappointed.  Stick to the clean, lean lines of other Mikasa crystal vases</review_text>
This product is the worst there is.  I purchased it in a Target store going by the Oster name.  It takes forever for it to heat up and then another long wait for the waffle to be almost done.  Needless to say I am taking it back.</review_text>
We waited too long to try this out after it came.  We would return it if it wasn't so late.  It takes forever to warm up and forever to cook!  Then the waffle is not hot!  Not happy at all with it</review_text>
We bought these for our two girls (2 and 5) so that they could have dishes matching out stoneware and they were great, for a while.Now we are down to 1 out of the original 4 we ordered due to the plates cracking over time (5 months since we ordered).They haven't been abused and have been washed in the dishwasher on no heat.Same issue with the bowls. YMMV, but when 3 out of 4 are dead, I think there is a problem</review_text>
This griddle performed very poorly and I will not be keeping it.  It cooked very unevenly (the left side of a 4-inch pancake was almost burned, while the right side was practically raw) and the pancakes stuck, even though it is supposed to be preseasoned (it's cast iron) and I heated it first before applying a light coat of vegetable oil.  It also did not sit securely on my gas stove, due to the 'grill' ridges on the other side -- it rocks back and forth slightly--even thought the box says it is suitable for all cooking surfaces except glass.Because I use my griddle almost every weekend, I am considering the Broil King Ultra Large electric giddle, which got Cook's Illustrated top recommendation in its 2003 tests.</review_text>
The Rainbow 600 count Egyptian sheets were so irregular that the seams on the pillowcases were not square. I returned them</review_text>
This product arrived in what appeared to be good shape, but upon washing became blotchy and discolored in places making them unusable.  Very disappointed</review_text>
I purchased this fryer after the death of our previous deep fryer thinking you get what you pay for.  So I splurged.  Yes, I read the reviews which had a lot to do with my decision to purchase this particular fryer - mistake....No one explains that the plug is extremely short or the fact that the magnet holding this heavy cord has a difficult time keep it plugged into the fryer.The temperature doesn't seem to stay consistent as my previous fryer - yes, I know that adding food to the oil will reduce the temp.After only 6 months with average use of once per month - it's dead.Bewar</review_text>
Usually break free product but SMASHED in Amazon delivery and then had to wait 4 weeks for credit.BOO</review_text>
As great as it looks, I can't get past the incomplete directions (only printed outside of the box; no directions inside) to get it installed on the wall:  it says "pull out the plastic end cap"...haven't a clue what the plastic end cap is, nor how to pull it out nor how to install the screws that hold it on the box.  may have to return</review_text>
Order the wok and got it damaged (off-shaped). The packaging is horrible. Basiclly they put the bare wok in the box filled with the giant air bubbles. The wok can move around freely in the box. Guess the damage is caused during shipping.Return and reordered the Typhoon Carbon Steel wok, similar size and design, $3 cheaper. When I got it, I am very pleased with the quality:*) properly packaged, plastic cover on the top, sheet of paper on the bottom; fitted in a box designed for it;*) thick steel: 2.5mm rather than 1.8mm from joyce Chen;*) handles are welded on the wok, so no dead spot when cleaning;*) seasoning instruction are well documented, in 8 different languages, even thou I use my own seasoning way, not like joyce chen's one thin sheet of paper with not so clear instruction.overall, Joyce Chen's wok is like the one you can get from Chinatown supermarket, and Typhoon one is like from Macy's</review_text>
I bought this wok 6 months ago. I seasoned it very well and started to use it. But I noticed the seasoning was easily peeled off when I cooked the dish with a lot of sauce. It meant I couldn't use it for steaming. When I made a fried rice, I had a hard time to clean it and re-season it. Most Chinese use a wok to cook everything, so I expected I could do that, too. But I was wrong. This wok is only good when you make a vegitable stir fry. That's all</review_text>
THIS TOY DIDN'T EVEN LAST 3 MINUTES.  HE HAD THE STUFFING OUT IN 10 SECONDS FLAT</review_text>
The first time I tried using this machine to make beef jerky it shut off in the middle of the process.  I had to stay next to it for 8 hours making sure it didn't shut off.   When it shut off I had to take the cover off and let the machine cool down.  And this happened about 15 times.  What a pain!  I called the company and they said that they would send me a new one but I needed to ship the old one to them at my cost - WHAT!  This is a brand new machine used once and I have to pay to ship the machine back.  Buy a different machine</review_text>
i bought it. didn't work. exchanged it. the new one didn't work. same problem--the pump is very weak and just barely seaps out a few drops of liquid soap...that's all. and yes, it does very easily rust.spend the extra $5 and get something better</review_text>
It leaks from the top,barely drips from the pump.....but it looks great</review_text>
Although this item's description says it is made of "Commercial quality stainless steel" it arrived with several rust spots; so much for whatever "Commercial quality stainless steel" means. Also, be aware that the handles are not round, but are "u" shaped. It is difficult to clean the inner part of the handle short of using a small toothbrush.On the positive side, the locking mechanism seems to work well and I do like the non stick silicone tips. However, on the whole, I would not recommend these locking tongs.</review_text>
don't buy this wok.  It tastes like you are eating metal when you cook cabbage with tomatoes.  i ended up returning the second wo</review_text>
I placed my first order for the red casserole in March.  It was not slated to be delivered until May!  But, I waited patiently for it.  In May I see that it has finally been shipped and delivered to my house, but I never received it.  So they send a replacement.  And it is white, not red.  And apparently they no longer have red</review_text>
Amazon is out of RED.  After waiting for 2 months, they shipped a white while the packing list states red.  When contacted, they said that they do not have a red for replacement.  If I want a white I can get it elsewhere for $7.99.  Not I have to go through the trouble of returning it</review_text>
I bought a blue one.The mug looks nice enough, but it cracked the first time I filled it with hot water for tea.Get your act together guys -- it really is not so difficult to make dishes that can withstanda little heat. As for the claim that this can go in the microwave...after the mug cracked, Ididn't bother to try</review_text>
Looks nice but the roll does fall off and thick paper towels can rub the top edge of the unit closest to the cabinet. Item is being returned</review_text>
How does it create space? If you have a cabinet that is 12 inches high, 15 inches deep and 14 inches wide, and put this large plastic item inside it, will that give you more space or take it away? The manufacturers must not be very logical or are trying too hard to sell you something you don't need.</review_text>
The metal side arms that the drawer slides down on were binding and need some lubrication. Somewhat flimsy. I do not expect it to last long. Nice concept, but I wish they had used better materials</review_text>
The spice rack looks nice.  Won't know the quality until I can use it and see how much weight it will take.  I had a horrible time getting in under the cabinet.  It is definitely a 2-person job and there was only me.  The self-adhesive tabs didn't work at all even to just put the spice rack up to use the screws.  Very awkward to use the screws.  Doesn't allow for any room especially the back screws.  I did the wrong thing by taking the extending arm hardware off to get the spice rack in place and to make it easier to screw it under the cupboard and that is where it sits.  Now to get the hardware back onto the extender arms is almost impossible.  I wouldn't have purchased this knowing how hard it is to attach to the underneath of the cabinet.  Took much too much time to get it into place</review_text>
I got the expensive one rather than the $14.99 Aroma cooker, thinking it will be better quality. Wrong.  I only used it twice, not only the rice get burn, after i clean in and out of the cooker, it still look dirty. The quality of the material was really bad. I think the Store where i got this products knows the problem that they take my return even it past 15 days requirement.Do not waste your good earned money on this one.</review_text>
I would not recommend this coffeemaker to anyone.  The coffee does taste funny and I didn't realize it might be the metal pot.  Also, DO NOT pour the coffee unless your cup is over the sink as one quarter of the coffee spills out.  Just like one of the other reviewers said, the pot does not slide in and out easily.  Not a coffeemaker I would recommend.  The only thing I like about it is the size!!!!!!</review_text>
This fan has nice features and operates very quietly. Seems to be a durability issue with most reviews I've read because mine only made it nine months before konking out</review_text>
Very disappointed with this fan.  Failed within six months of purchasing.  Don't buy a Lasko fan</review_text>
i expected better durability out of this fan. It died after just 3 months, and had flow problems from day one.  I tried contacting Lasko but got no responses.</review_text>
Do not be tricked into buying an "easy" sharpener. They DO NOT work. Spend the same money (or less!) on a good stone set that has various angles (i.e. Lansky, w/ 17, 20, 25, and 30 degree angles, and 3-5 stones: use 20 degrees for your "slicing" and paring knives, and 25 degrees for you chefs). I opted for the stone set (I'm a bit of a purist), but I've heard good remarks about the diamond set, too; the 3 grit set is all you really need: coarse, medium, and fine - get the ultra fine if your sharpening razors and such.With proper care, and light steel use (it's the re-aligning tool, not the sharpening device - be gentle), you'll probably only need to touch-up your edge once every year or two, depending on the work load you put on your knife. But, if you do seriously muck the edge up, you'll have a system that can repair your knife to "good as new" condition.My chef fell onto the tile floor, point first, and I had a wonderfully sharpened instrument 30 minutes later. The normal touch-up takes less than 5 minutes per blade.And, at thirty dollars to have 5 knives professionally sharpened, you'll be ahead of the game after the first use!Hint: use a 5X+ magnifying glass/loupe to inspect your edge - by carefully rolling the knife to catch a bright light source, you'll be able to see shiny spots where the edge still needs to be sharpened. You can also take a look at your edge before using the steel, and see how bad you roll the edge while working with it, then see how it becomes magically aligned after the use of the steel. And, see chips and voids in your lower quality steel knives - I admit I have a couple, myself.In short: get stoned, not taken</review_text>
My girlfriend and I recently bought two ultrasonic humidfiers -- this machine and an Air-O-Swiss 7135.  The Venta worked well when it worked.  However, it frequently stopped working for no apparent reason.  You could jiggle the thing, and it would go on and off.  We finally figured out that there was a defect in the little plunger on the bottom of the tank that controls the flow of water into the base.  The water wasn't flowing properly, and the machine stopped (as it should) because there was no water.  Took it back to the hardware store where we bought it, and the guy there said that lots of other people have had the same problem.  It may be number 1 in Germany, but it gets only 1 star here</review_text>
This percolator is not worth the price.  The coffee tastes lousy and it does not stay hot.I returned mine and purchased the Farberware FCP512S 12-Cup Cordless Percolator.  I love it!</review_text>
We purchased this purcolator for Christmas 2003.  Every other pot is weaker than tea, many grounds are left in the bottom of the pot.  Once the coffee is done, the warmer continues to boil the coffee making it bitter and burnt.  The auto shut off did not work and boiled the pot dry.  I am returning the pot and purchasing a Farberware for half the price</review_text>
We purchased this purcolator Christmas 2003, and ended up returning the first one after it did not work out of the box.  Amazon was great in sending us out another via exchange.  The second percolator worked.  However, I wished I'd have saved my money.  The coffee basket allowed too many coffee grounds to end up in the coffee.  Don't take that last cup.  You will also need a carafe to store the coffee in after percolating.  The percolator maintains the heat too high when ready, and boils the coffee continuously.  Mmmm, burnt coffee!</review_text>
This mixer was highly reviewed at the time we bought it, but ours started conking out randomly after only 2 months -- it would work one day and then not work the next.  Whether it will work any particular time is uncertain enough that we are buying a new one today.  No matter what the features an appliance has, that rates an automatic 1-star in my book</review_text>
This vacuum cleans reasonably well, but I have a few significant gripes which will prevent me from buying a similar model when making my next vacuum purchase, which seems to about every 2 years. I've finally decided that we may go with an "heirloom" vacuum next time, such as an Oreck, since the lifetime of any sub $100 vacuum is just ridiculous.My complaints:1. This thing screams like a banshee! It is indeed light, and reasonably powerful, but it literally hurts my ears to use it in small rooms. It does not roar, it emits a relatively high pitched scream. I have had big, small, and medium size vacuums, and this thing easily is louder than all of them. I haev a 2 1/2 horsepower Shop Vac which is much quieter than this vacuum.2. Wheels barely extend below the bottom of the vacuum, so it requires a bit of effort to roll over anything but very short carpet. Wheeling from room to room, say over hardwood while tipping the vacuum back, also cannot really be done.3. The filter is hard to clean, as it has a flange that extends down over maybe 1/3 of one side. I often have to stick my finger in the space between the filter and the flange to get a significant amount of gunk out. Gross. Tell me how this is better than a bag</review_text>
This is a cute Vacuum, and that's about it. The filter clogs, and they are next to impossible to find. The Canister is a pain to empty. The biggest problem I found was there was no height adjustment. If you have thick carpet, you just need to forget about this vacuum. What A nightmare to push and pull this stupid thing. Mine has gone to Goodwill.</review_text>
This sharper is cool because it is a magnet that you can stick to the fridge for easy access.  However it is not a good sharpener.  It sharpens knives but not well. Also, it has a limited amount of use before it will go into the trash.  Probably half a year and it will be useless. Spend your money elsewhere for something that sharpens better and will last you more than a year.</review_text>
My daughter needed this item for an event and the wrong item was delivered.  By then we were under a time crunch so I talked to customer service but there was no way Target would expedite shipping the correct item to arrive in time.  I had to order the item from another supplier and pay for 2 day delivery.In the meantime, the online pathway for getting a shipping label to return the wrong item lets me spend time putting all the information in but then shuttles me to a "Try again" screen.  I try half a dozen or more times and give up.  An hour later I try again with the same dead end.  I email customer service to just send a label by email but have yet to receive a response.  The next day I try again with the same dead end.  I have wasted a lot of time for something I don't even want.  I think I will let my credit card company know to not pay, and let the supplier ship me a return label when they get around to it.Can you tell I am not impressed with the 'service'</review_text>
I should have paid more attention to the reviews...I was warned ahead of time that this crate shouldn't be used as an everyday or long-term solution. We've been using the crate for LESS THAN three months and already the zipper one one end (that we use all the time) is screwed up and half the time it doesn't open. At least one of the two zippers on that end can still move so the dog can get in and out, but I'm afraid of the morning when I try to open it and both zippers are fully stuck. (We leave one end open and place the crate up against the bathroom so the dog can at least have a little room to roam plus still have her crate to sleep in. When she gets a little older, we will leave her in her crate all day.) We could still use the zippers on the top, but we don't like those since the dog can't get in and out at her leisure.Although in general it's a nice crate, I probably would not buy this item again just due to the poor quality of the zippers--hence the two stars. I am completely surprised that we only got three months' use out of it before the zippers bit the dust. We've already purchased a different, sturdier, latch-style crate that we're much happier with...and we should have bought to start with</review_text>
The armoire arrived with the doors damaged and a nick on the top.  I was sent new doors but they didn't fit.  Frustrated, I accepted the promised $175.00 off to keep the doors, knowing they would have to be repaired by my husband later.  I have yet to receive this refund.   The delivery was also a major problem.  There was only one guy and he said he was told to leave the furniture in the driveway and go.  There was no way I could get this furniture in my house alone, so I tipped him to bring it in for me.  I will never buy anything from this company again!!!!!!</review_text>
The lid drops in half the time you're trying to put it on. The first six meals or so smell "bad" (spoiled)as they are cooking.. I think it's the sealing ring ! What a God-awful smell for a kitchen</review_text>
I bought this item based on price, how can you go wrong for 10$ for a programable coffee maker? Well, you get what you pay for. after having this coffee pot for only 3 weeks, it just stopped working! Just to ship it back would have been the cost of the item! based on the rest of the reviews, I just threw away and went out and bought a mr. coffee. lesson learned.treehous</review_text>
I just got this... took it out of the box... plugged it in ... and... it does not work</review_text>
I bought this as it was just a little bit bigger than my preent coffee maker..I could get 3 mugs of coffee out of it.., rather than 2...However, I used it exactly 5 days, and then it died...Granted, the econonical price was a factor when I purchased it, but I really expected it to last more than 5 days..Unfortunately, it would have cost me more than it was worth to have it fixed, so I was forced to throw it away...Lesson learned; some things are just not a bargain..!!</review_text>
Ordered this item as a gift for my daughter..arrived quickly and did not appear broken or used but would not work at all..appliance would not activate.. very disappointing...probably why it was such a deal..shipping was as much as the item! Valentine Surprise failed</review_text>
Loose shape and becomes literally towels within 3 months of use.Total Waste of money and shipping</review_text>
I purchased this item, after having read about "Banneton" in the book "Rustic European Breads from your Bread Machine". The picture clearly shows 4 baskets, and the description is vague - but you only get one. The basket you get is quite small, all but the smallest loaves would quickly overflow the basket. It looks sturdy and well made. It would have been good value for four baskets - it was too much to pay for a single basket. I didn't actually use it, choosing instead to return it, so I can't comment on how well it worked..</review_text>
This is a great sweeper, but its tragic downfall is the short lifespan of the battery. We bought one a couple of years ago from Sears with a Sears replacement warranty. Since then we have replaced it FIVE times (we really got our money's worth from the warranty, at least!)It's getting to be a joke--one day (usually 2-3 months after we bring home the new one) the rotor just stops turning and that's all she wrote. Next time we will purchase a different sweeper, warranty or not</review_text>
Many times, I've come across great deals on Amazon where I've paid just little for a lot.  This is NOT one of those moments.  This pan feels like it's made from three layers of tin foil.  It's shockingly flimsy</review_text>
I bought this power mop for my daughter for Christmas, and it broke the first time she used it</review_text>
had trouble finding  out how to put it together--- then the motor started and would not stop--- had trouble getting the bottom  in the right angle to stop it and then the slightest movement and it would go on again.I would return it but it is too heavy to move--- heavy to move to make it change to mop part from brush part and making the motor stop was a formidable task.I will let he battery run out and try it a few more times and try to use it just as a heavy mop.  that should not take too long</review_text>
I was kind of disappointed with the Black& Decker Power Mop, it is to bottom heavey to flip the scrubbing brush easily. You have to use two hands to flip the brush down and two hands to push the brush away.I have already told friends "don't bother to spend $49 for this mop, it isn't worth the money.Get a women to design this product.  I can't believe a women would have found this easy to use.</review_text>
This was a horrible egg slicer.  I thought something from KitchenAid that was advertised to slice strawberries or mushrooms would be worthwhile, but was I wrong.  Worked fine for eggs, but broke on the first strawberry.  My previous one broke on the first mushroom!Don't bother.  Use a knife.  Save the slicer for the eggs</review_text>
I wish I had read the customer reviews before purchasing this. My wife just tried to use our Kitchenaide egg slicer for the first time and two of the wires snapped as she tried to slice up some strawberries. Do not purchase this egg slicer! It is a waste of $10</review_text>
WHATEVER YOU DO, DON'T BUY A SHARK. IT IS A TOTAL WASTE OF MONEY. IT HAS TO BE THE WORST PURCHASE THAT I HAVE EVER MADE. YOU CANNOT CONTACT THE MANUFACTURER. SMART MOVE ON THEIR PART, THEIR PHONE SYSTEM WOULD BE OVERLOADED WITH COMPLAINTS</review_text>
I received this model as a gift and thought it would be great since we only brew a few cups at a time. However, as other reviewers noted, almost immediately the clock started losing several minutes every day. I wasn't intending to use the delay feature very often so I didn't bother to return it. Now, just short of a year after I received it, it suddenly started working, so I'm shopping for a replacement. I might try another Mr. Coffee model with better reviews, but not this one</review_text>
My order was cancel because company will not ship to a FPO FPaddress, really unclear as to the reason, but I am sure it isa fine product, my Turtles will continue to bask on their rock</review_text>
Wow, what a fine example of terrible engineering. The only control is a knob that ranges from OFF to SUPER. To set the thermostat, you  turn the knob to the SUPER setting. When the room reaches a comfortable level, you slowly turn the thermostat down until the heater goes off. This is the point at which the thermostat setting equals the room temp. At this setting, the thermostat will automatically turn on and off to maintain the selected temp.This design sets the stage for a frustrating user experience:- By design, you must turn the thermostat to the highest setting, then WAIT FOR THE ROOM TO HEAT UP before fiddling with the knob until the unit clicks off, at which point you end up turning it up a bit until it clicks on (if it does). Its like trying to adjust your home's thermostat in the dark...just show me where to set the dial for 68 degrees and let me get on with my day.- when the heater is working as designed, it turns on for 30-60 seconds, turns off for 10-90 seconds, then repeats the cycle relentlessly and unpredictably until you unplug it, let it cool, box it back up, and send it back.I want a refund, reimbursement for lost productivity, and an ice cream sandwich.</review_text>
I would not use this unless it had a featherbed on top.  I have two other waterproof pads from bloomingdales that are more expensive but much softer</review_text>
Hopefully, I will never make this kind of mistake</review_text>
My wife bought this one from Best Buy without me reviewing it 1st. Amazingly, I would have bought it after reading the reviews here. I'm starting to wonder who writes these things ... LG employees? The microwave is fine - no complaints. The toaster, however, is an unmitigated disaster. I am of the opinion that you should rarely combine appliances - this appliance is a poster child for this thought. The toaster browns extremely unevenly and inconsistently (sometimes you should toast the same piece of bread on 5 and sometimes as high as 10!). More importantly, the toaster broke after 31 days (coincidently the Best Buy return policy ends at the same time - Best Buy has an unacceptable return policy but with a guy named "Ricky" managing the store what can you expect?). LG picks up the phone quickly and they honor the warranty. The problem is they can't think outside of the box. They had me get it repaired but I have to inconveniently drive it out there and pick it up - OK ... no problem. One day later? It breaks again. It is an extremely poorly built appliance and the repair people thought they had fixed it and had not. That's how bad it was. LG will not budge - have it repaired again (great option - costs LG money, me more travel time, and it won't do the job) or do a rebate. The rebate requires me to buy another LG or Goldstar product. Huh? So you create a shoddy product and rush it to the marketplace (they admitted they don't have a detailed enough repair history because it is too new) and then don't stand behind your product. You backend me into another LG or Goldstar product that I would not have otherwise bought. How does our government allow these atrocious foreign companies to business here? Our we so bad as a manufacturer that we can't top this? Their supervisors were very hardlined and there was no getting around this. "You can cal Korea but they won't change their policy" they said. I will never willingly buy another LG or Goldstar product and I highly recommend you do the same. Shame on you LG - you could have had me as an appliance buyer for the next 50 years and now your name is mud to me</review_text>
All 6 of of the glasses in my set were at least slightly misshapen, one was positively a mutant!  The stems were not centered, and there were, for lack of a better description, glass tumors where the bowls meet the stems.  The glasses were also thicker than I expected from Spiegalau.  Other Spiegalau items I've purchased have been superb, so this could very well be an anomaly.  ..</review_text>
I'm not sure how well this coffeemaker works.  I purchased one from Amazon and received one that was obviously in used condition.  The glass was water stained and not factory packaged.  There wasn't a manual or any instructions.  1 star for Amazon on this one</review_text>
I did not find these pillows comfortable for airplane travel. They are too big and bulky to provide any comfort. I guess they would be fine if you were laying on a couch and not sitting mostly upright like on a plane. I would have been better off saving my money and using the airplane pillow. I wouldn't recommend these particular pillows</review_text>
This is a great maker for American coffee drinkers who have the occasional espresso.  This will not pass for a full-time espresso drinker.  The machine functions fine but the coffee is not robust enough to be called true espresso</review_text>
I am usually very happy with Hilfiger Home products.  Well, these towels are run of the mill discount linen store quality.  There is nothing luxurious about them whatsoever.  I would expect to pay around 10 bucks for each.  They ARE NOT worth it...I don't know what the heck kind of towels some of the other reviewers were using before they bought these!!</review_text>
So, this clock woke me up alright!  The snooze didn't work, and then I couldn't turn it off!  I had to rip the batteries out of it to get it to stop...It is very cheaply made (explains the price I guess), but yeah it works just fine as long as you don't need to use the snooze ever</review_text>
The product came chipped on the bottom so its lopsided.  Much smaller than anticipated, I can only fit a tablespoon in it</review_text>
If you're of Italian heritage and you grate a lot of cheese, don't waste your time with this one.  When the quantity of cheese in the grater gets low, it tends to be very difficult to turn.  It also didn't last as long as I expected.  Try a different one instead</review_text>
This grater is fine when you can get it to work, but most often the handle doesn't screw in correctly and you can't get it to. It's mostly a waste of time, though the concept is a great one. I'd recommend trying maybe a stainless steel one instead of this plastic one</review_text>
This grater is not a convenience, it's more of a punishment.  I have tried it for hash browns, cheese, chocolate, etc.  I thought at first I was using it incorrectly, but then realized, there really is no wrong way of using this.  Everytime I have used it it has caused me so much pain in my hands that I would rather do it the old fashioned way and just grate the cheese manually.  My fingers and hands ache so bad that I can't even hold a pencil after using this gadget.  I would not recommend this to anyone.  Unfortunately, you have to rate this with 1 being the lowest star, but in reality I give it NO STARS!</review_text>
...after two months, a piece of the filter broke off.  After 3 months, the carafe cracked and sent coffee and glass spilling everywhere.  Cuisinart was kind enough to direct me to their website, so I could pay another $30 or so for a new carafe, because glass is not included in their warranty.  No thanks</review_text>
These are great towels if you can get them.  They are very soft and a great price but I ordered them in December and they came in one at a time. Took over 3 months to complete the order and still did not recieve the full order because after 3 months they refunded my money on one towel that was out of stock.  When I ordered them they stated that they were in stock and ready to ship.Buy these only if you have a life time to get the</review_text>
While this is an attractive looking paper-towel holder, it isn't very functional.  At first glance, it looks like it should work as implied: 'spring-loaded arm puts pressure on paper towel roll, regardless of how many towels are on that roll at the time, allowing you to easily rip off a single sheet with one hand'.  Unfortunately, this model doesn't work that way...at least, not the one I received.I started with a partial roll, and it was obvious this wouldn't work, so I put in an extra-large roll of top quality (very thick roll) paper towels, and still, they don't come close to reaching the spring-loaded arm.This arm is no more effective at preventing a number of sheets from pulling off the roll than the old wooden one I had with no arm at all.  I'm very disappointed.  Before deciding on this model, I had viewed some very similar models that were higher in price...maybe this is a case of "you get what you pay for".If you are looking for a paper towel holder that looks nice, and are not concerned about "function"...it may be worth the price.  If you are looking for one that looks nice AND can offer you an easy one-sheet-at-a-time-with-one-hand quick pull, I suggest you look for a different model.  This unit won't do that job</review_text>
The bed warmer was described as "dual" controlled.  It comes with only one control.  The entire bed has to be at the same temperature.  The reason I wanted "dual" control was because my husband is always warm and I'm almost always cold --- hence, seperate controls were needed.  Since we had the coldest winter in years, I adapted the product to work because there was no time to return and request what was described. It does heat well though</review_text>
I was very disappointed to find the iron broken.  So I have no idea if it worked well.  Now I have the expense of sending it back, plus I won't be able to use it for my holiday parties.</review_text>
I bought this unit a few years back.  Worthless at best!  I wish someone - even the mfg could come up with some kind of solution to retain the heat with these units.  I called their customer service - who said, "Good Luck" as their best solution.  The problem is - Aluminum cools off too fast.  It will NOT retain heat.  I wish I could locate a Cast Iron Krumkake!  Do they make them anymore?  eBay - HELP!!</review_text>
I received this popper as a gift, and while it looks nice, it only pops of 30 percent of the kernels the rest just sit in the bottom of the machine. I have tried numerous times letting the device warm up for several minutes and also tried different types of popcorn. Nothing worked. If I had the receipt it would already have been returned. Since I don't, it is going in the garbage. Also for some reasons hot unpopped kernels will fly out of the machine. Stay away from this machine</review_text>
My gf loves popcorn so I was tasked to purchase her a replacement for her cheapo $10 air popper. I saw this one and thought "what a great idea" and bought it on the spot. I hadn't read the reviews here when I did my heart sank. Although some people "did" rate it high and said it was great. Sadly these may be closer to paid reviews because the consensus here seems to be true.  Slow popping with small kernals.  It makes a mess as well with kernels everywhere. If you like running through a batch of pops then do not look at this model. It's simply too slow and requires a "breather".  It was returned yesterday.</review_text>
I have owned a few OXO brand utensils over the past few years, and in general I have been happy with them.  But I was disappointed with this spatula when the edge of the head melted the very first time it was used.  The product description does warn you that it's only heat resistant to 250 degrees, but I was flipping eggs in a skillet, which I consider a basic use for a spatula.  If it can't handle the heat of a hot skillet, than I don't think it's a useful spatula.  Not to mention that it's neither healty nor esthetically pleasing to have bits of black plastic in your food</review_text>
This is a very powerful handheld vacuum cleaner.  If you just need to clean up loose this like salt or cracker crumbs it will perform great.  Should you actually try to use the beater brush attachment you will be very dissappointed.  I bought this cleaner for the purpose of cleaning my curtians and stairs.  I own two cats and virtually all of my in-laws are allergic to them.  Everytime they come, I have to clean the house top to bottom.  My upright vacuum (Dirt Devil Vision Lite model 008650) weighs a ton and was not designed to use on stairs.  I thought this little cleaner might be just the trick.  The brush worked great the first several times I used it.  But after about 20 uses it began to slow down.  I cleaned it very thoroughly but never saw the initial performance again.  Eventually, it stopped working at all.  I urge you to buy something else, if the beater brush is a selling point for you</review_text>
We received it broken..I don't have the oriinal box to send it and don't know what to do so just bought another one in a local stor</review_text>
Product worked well for several months - providing sufficient heating for moderate-sized space.  However, heater now only provides heat for approximately 1-2 minutes after turning on, then *sparks* and the heating mechanism fails.Dangerous for a space heater, no</review_text>
I bought this heater at Lowe's after returning another Delonghi model to Amazon.  It's great for a bedroom because it is practically silent.  The heat is effective and it did what it was supposed to do...allow me to turn down the heat in the rest of the house at night while keeping the bedroom pleasantly warm.  That was the good news.  The bad news is that after a few months, it broke down.  It turns OFF when you increase the heat by turning the thermostat up.  As another reviewer said, it is now an attractive retro paperweight, but that's about it.  I was considering having it fixed but after reading the parts hassle that others are having, I'm not going to bother.  After battling with Delonghi over other retro products, I'm giving up.  I won't buy any of their stuff anymore.  By the way, if you want a great, silent heater, try the Bionaire Micathermic model (BNRBH3900U).  It doesn't have the snazzy styling of the Delonghi but it works great and still runs afer a year</review_text>
I opened one of the packages and there was blood on the card that the sham was folded around. I promptly called Amazon and they replaced it. It was a waste of money, the first time I washed them, white patches appeared all over the shams as if they dye washed out. I was very, very disappointed with the quality and will not order them again. Don't waste  your money</review_text>
My wife and I have used this machine for several weeks now. We found it to be a great machine for the price. Others complained about the lack of attachments because of the odd size of the wands, so I immediately machined  an adapter that allows us to use any tool from most other American Vacuums. Now there are no limitations as to what surface the machine can be used on. This thing is lite, strong, and easy to empty. The cord retractor is a little lite so I wouldn't be to rough with it.  Garrett and Susan</review_text>
We ordered one of these racks and it was OK. Then we ordered another one and one of the pieces was bent making it impossible to contruct. Target replaced it and the replacement was similarly defective- not worth the hassle of going back and forth to the post office</review_text>
This fan does not have enough power to even come close to blowing out the hot air from even the smallest room.  Go for the industrial strength, expensive ones</review_text>
For the price, I expected a quality canister.  The plastic insert in the lid arrived unglued, and hardly creates an airtight seal.  Had I seen this item in a store I would have passed on it immediately.</review_text>
The stainless steel lid has a glued in plastic piece that is supposed to provide an airtight seal to the canister.  My canister arrived with the plastic piece no longer glued in place.  I expected a bit more from a $50 coffee canister.  I'm returning it and going in search of a quality canister</review_text>
The complaints about the pepper grinder squeaking and spitting out huge chunks of peppercorns are 100% true. Try to avoid this one if you can. I would try to get a refund, but it's just not worth the hassle. What a waste</review_text>
When I ordered this product, it had a 4 star average rating  - how that happened is beyond me. Were a zero star rating available, this product wouldn't even deserve the string of uncolored stars!I purchased it, thinking it would certainly do better than the plastic "freebie" grinder that came with some peppercorns about a year ago. After many refills, that all-plastic grinder has finially started to wear out and peppercorns get stuck in the "gears", the grinder has started to squeak and spits out chunks of pepper.So I order this one -- it's attractive, low/mid priced and offers a warranty against wearing out -- and guess what? I'm still using the plastic worn-out grinder! This MIU grinder was a total waste of money and I just can't bear to listen to it squeal when I attempt to use it. Its adjustement is loose enough, that's not the problem.   What good's a lifetime warranty against wearing out if I'm not going to use the grinder at all?Now I'm stuck with it, unless I want to pay to ship it back and lose free shipping discount on the original order, so basically, I may could get a few bucks back. Which is probably what I'll do because this grinder isn't worth 2 cents! I wouldn't even give the thing away.Maybe pepper grinders are one of those things you just need to feel and buy in person. I'll certainly not purchase another one online.If you like the sound of fingernails scratching a chalkboard, buy this grinder. Buy a second one for your salt while you're at it. You'll love 'em!(Update 1 month later - I tried to give this thing a chance and the god-awful squealing is becoming less consistent. Which might be even worse, as it now takes me by surprise as it lets out a high-pitched jag every so often. It's gotten quite worse, however, with spitting out various sized chunks of peppercorn ... from fine grind to quarter-corn sized pieces in a few turns. Not recommended at all. I might try switching it over to salt, maybe it can handle that better.</review_text>
Unless you love the look of this pepper grinder, I'd suggest you look elsewhere. When compared to a generic grinder, this product produces inferior and very inconsistent grinds. I've gone so far as to grind peppercorns onto a white sheet of paper to look at them. With this grinder you'll always get a huge variation in the grind. Some of the pieces of the peppercorns will be large enough that it would give anyone pause to wonder whether foreign matter had somehow entered the dish. The oval top is quite slippery and when you tighten down the top nut to reduce the grind to something that will prove acceptable, you'll have trouble turning it. Not recommended</review_text>
I bought this blender because I liked its retro design, and I thought it would function well.  Well, every single time I've tried to use it has been a disaster.  Even for very simple tasks, like blending soft avocado, the blender has not worked. The blades spit big chunks onto the sides of the glass jar and then spin around without blending anything... It's horrible.  And I even threw away my old, ugly blender when I bought this one... and the other worked just fine. :</review_text>
I followed the instructions, many times, but still can't get the cork pulled out of the wine bottle.The Oster wine opener cork-screw goes in just fine.  However, instead of pulling out the cork, the cork-screw just reverses direction and comes out of the cork.  I'm 75 and bought this after reading a review on how great it was for older folks with arthritis.  Well, maybe I have a "lemon" but I certainly would love someone from Oster tell me is I'm doing something wrong.Thank you for the opportunity to bring this to someone's attentio</review_text>
I liked the product until it showed a small split in the bottom and developed a slow leak after only a few uses.  Perhaps the plastic doesn't tolerate boiling water as well as it should</review_text>
This container is way too small to keep any fish in, let alone two. In such a small container, the fishes' wastes will build up quickly, causing eye and skin irritation, sickness, even death. You can try to reduce the waste build up changing the water frequently, but not only is this a lot of work for you, it is stressful for the fish.In addition, if you want to keep bettas in a divided tank, there should be decorations for the fish to hide behind when they need a break from flaring at each other. This tank is too small to allow that, another source of stress.Thirdly, bettas are tropical fish. They need a tank heated to a constant 80F. It is not possible to safely heat a tank that is smaller than 5 gallons.If you want to get bettas, please read some of the excellent websites available and learn all you can about their care. If you cannot afford a proper tank, please don't get a fish</review_text>
I checked out this machine at a local store.  It's little more than a basic drip coffee maker bundled with a basic espresso machine.  For that functionality it would be far cheaper to buy those two things separately.Regarding this Delonghi machine, on the drip coffee side, metallic coffee filters are a royal pain to work with-- paper filters are far easier to use when disposing of coffee grounds.  On the espresso side, you have to grind the beans and tamp them into the strainer for each cup you make, and then empty the strainer when you're done.  The optional filter pods are a really expensive way to buy ground coffee. For only a bit more money ($500 or so) you can get a full automatic espresso/cappuccino maker. I bought a full-automatic several years ago and my family loves it! Full-automatics grind the beans for each cup, they make excellent American-style coffee as well (simply by increasing the amount of water pushed through the coffee), and you dispose of grounds once a week.  The only disadvantage of full-automatics is that like every espresso machine, they do only one or two cups at a time.  So if you want to make more than two cups of drip coffee at once, you'll need a plain old coffee maker like the right-hand side of the Delonghi</review_text>
Clock started losing time the first day. Great tasting coffee. No problem with the carafe. Unit stopped working all together after about 10 days. Returned it to DeLonghi & they promptly sent me another. Clock started losing time the first day. Great tasting coffee. No problem with the carafe. Unit stopped working all together after about 10 days. This could get real old...</review_text>
I bought this to avoid buing and expensive mandoline to make my sweet potato fries.  What I leared is... the sweet potatoes are too hard for this cutter to work well.  Neither my husband or I could get the sweet potato to cut.  We had to take it out and chop them by hand.  It works very good on regular and smaller potatoes though</review_text>
I bought this for my husand as a gift and it is awful. It fell apart the first time we used it. It even caught his hand when it fell apart and drew blood. I do not recommend this product at all.</review_text>
Very thin and unsteady. Couldn't open it without having to hold the back of it. It wobbled side to side as I was forcing it to open. I sent it back as soon as I got it</review_text>
We bought this rice cooker because of the reputable brand name. We have been using it for about 4 months now. It cooks good rice. However, the rice does not stay fresh for over 3 days sometimes regardless of what other reviewers said. We've got spoiled rice in it a few times already with no understandable reason. And the rice was in "keep warm" mode at all times. In addition, if you forget to stir the rice and leave it in the "keep warm" mode for a day, the top layer becomes very hard and the bottom layer becomes very soggy. So, you do need to stir the rice quite often to prevent the dryout. I haven't tried cooking porridge or any other kind of rice besides white rice. If I were to decide all over again, I would stay away from this rice cooker. I thought I've bought a top-notched product, now I regret that I spent this much on a rice cooker</review_text>
These sheets were quite thin, and like the label said, needed "touch-up ironing" -- on every square inch.  I won't accept the excuse that "you get what you pay for."  I didn't intend to buy $13 sheets.  These were sold as $40 sheets marked down to $12.99, but I can't imagine anyone paying $40 for them.  This is not what I expect from Amazon</review_text>
I ordered this griddle and on the third use the teflon coating burned off onto my glasstop stove.  I called faberware directly since I was out of my return period, and after explaining my situation, they sent me another (different model) griddle, free of charge.  The first product didnt work out, but the mfgr made good</review_text>
They look nice, but the towels do not absorb much water.  I am very disappointed.  I suspect I'll use them a few times, then give them to Goodwill</review_text>
I should have read the other review more closely. This is a good blanket for HOT summer nights! I believe it is too light for cold winter nights. I expected more for over $50. If I didn't return it it would have made a nice decorative throw! The color and texture are nice</review_text>
I usually like Oxo products, but this one is a real loser. Not only does it not give accurate readings (which in itself should deem it useless, being that it is a THERMOMETER after all) but there are other features that further enhance its horrible design. First of all, the "handy" (so they claim) spin dial that allows you to set the temperature that you want to reach, is so flimsy that the slightest movement of the thermometer throws the dial off. Useless. Secondly, after only one handwashing, water seeped under the dial face which is impossible to get out. The water then turns to steam which fogs up the display so you can't even read its inaccurate readings. 2 weeks later there is STILL steam under the dial. Useless again. And to pour salt on my already stinging wound, I had emailed Oxo to inquire about how to return this item and get a refund weeks ago, but they have yet to respond to me, even though on the package it states that satisfaction is 100 percent guaranteed. Well, I am NOT a satisfied customer and if my second attempt to reach them proves fruitless once again, then I doubt I will ever purchase another Oxo product again, no matter how good they are. It pains me to even give this product one star, as a product that's utterly useless deserves no star at all. Oxo should be ashamed of themselves. Thanks for allowing me to vent my 2 cents</review_text>
Way off target. Said 350 degrees when in reality it was almost 500. Doesnt work</review_text>
I bought this oven recently. It is cheaply made but most of the functions do a fair job. All except the rotisserie; when used, grease runs from the unit onto the countertop even though the unit is level and the drip tray is not full. I was very dissapointed. I contacted them via email today, they say they will get with me in 24 hrs. We'll see</review_text>
I bought a Haier convection oven and it broke after only a few months.  I called their customer service department and they said they would send me a new one.  I have waited 2 months and made 17 phone calls and still nothing.  DO NOT BUY ANYTHING FROM THIS COMPANY.  Their products are cheap chinese junk and they DO NOT stand behind their products.  Don't believe me?  Look around on the web and you will see plenty of other people complaining about their cheap products and ZERO customer support</review_text>
The description says you can adjust for coarseness of the salt/pepper, but there is no such knob on the mini grinders. We replaced the store bought salt with sea salt and now the grinder doesn't work. Disappointing</review_text>
Neither the salt mill or pepper grinder work well.  It takes forever  to get salt and pepper from the squeezing of the handles together and still not an adequate amount.  Perhaps the blades that crunch the S&P are not sharp enough?  Very disappointed in product</review_text>
When you first unwrap these sheets, they look and feel great. But the true test is once they've been washed a few times.  They don't hold up AT ALL. They pill after only a couple of washings, and are thin and flimsy. I was really looking forward to giving these a great review, but I can't</review_text>
The item ordered 7/19/2006 has not been received as of 8/19/2006</review_text>
A friend of ours bought this for us.  He owns several coffee shops and we were excited to have great coffee at home.  Out of the box, I needed to tinker with it for a while and had to refer to online chat rooms to figure out how to get it to work correctly.  The problem was that the coffee didn't stay perculating long enough in the top and then it shot down into the carafe. I called Bodum of North America and their customer service person was a surley $$***!!!!!!*****.  They offered no help at all and had no idea what I was talking about which unless they totally disregard internet reviews was a lie.  Several people wrote, in online articles, to cut down the tube that goes in to the carafe by small dimension.  I didn't do that but I learned that if you don't push the top down all the way it will work okay.After I got it working okay, it did make really good, and hot coffee.  Then the poorly designed flip top broke and Bodum has never had it back in stock (I wonder why!),  then we got really sick of trying (in vane) to clean the inside of the carafe.  Finally the annoyance of the thing as a whole overrode the quality of the coffee.My advice is if you want really great coffee go to your local cafe.  For day to day coffee at home don't buy this.It looks cool and does make good coffee but at a big price</review_text>
I initially bought this coffeemaker because I remembered my Dad's Sunbeam Silex type coffeemaker.  It made great coffee and so does the Bodum.  Problem with the Bodum is that I had to send the unit back three times because of leakage in the lower unit between the heating element and the carafe which uses a polycarbonate material.  The folks at Bodum have been very responsive and accommodating but admit that they have not solved this problem.  I am anticipating buying the stove top glass contruction version if I continue to have a problem</review_text>
I bought this machine after researching it for a long time.  I could deal with the hard cleaning of it, I was willing to shell out $100.00 for a good quality maker, and I loved the design.  After two or three uses it started to leak.  After much searching I realized the caraf itself was leaking into the electronics and causing it to short.  I paid too much and do not like the fact that it broke so quickly. I didn't return it, I just will NEVER buy bodum again</review_text>
See other reviews for a description of overall performance and cleaning. Cool design, but overpriced and requires the use of nearly twice as much coffee to arrive at a similar strength to that typical of a french press. I only used this coffee maker 3 times, and reverted to the press.</review_text>
I bought this item - "Drinkwell Fresh Water Fountain and Reservoir for Cats or Small Dogs - Fountain (6 cup Capacity)" from PetSmart at Amazon.  Though the title clearly advertises that a reservoir is included, one did not arrive.  I contacted customer service who told me that the reservoir is not included and would only assist me in ordering one.  Otherwise, the unit is nice, though simple.  I will be returning it used to purchase elsewhere</review_text>
I was looking for a timer that had a loud ringer I could hear from another room while cleaning, so I could check on what I'm cooking..This one just didn't do that for me.I notice the sound it sends out is not always the same..sometimes it is a bit louder then other times..to me that does not do me much good..I cannot depent on it all the time!So now I just use it to keep near me when I'm at the computer, but I do notice more of the sound comes out of the back, but then you can't see how much time you have left, if you turn it backwards!!!The ringer goes for 1 min.This does not count backward.The numbers and buttons are large, which is probably the reason I bought this timer.The two magnets are not very big, and does not stay on my frig very good.When its on my frig, and I start to press the buttons, it starts moving all over.Price wise, this is probably a good buy , depending on what you want to use it for.I bought another timer that the ringer is louder, but the buttons and are very small..Guess you cannot have it all, no matter at what the price is!</review_text>
This is junk.  The blades tore through the plastic with the first potato I tried to slice.  The apple slicer broke on the 4th apple.  The blades are not sharp, and takes considerable force to get it to slice anything.  The Julianne attachment would not slice a block of chedder, though I do think any attachment would be able to slice Brie, and if not that, then perhaps jello.  Worst purchase I ever made with the name Kitchenaid on it</review_text>
This item comes with many warnings as it should. It can be hazardous to use this heater with an adaptor for a two pronged outlet. The product itself is of high quality and runs well just not when you are in the process of renovating a house</review_text>
The pop corn is very good, but the lid broke. I am going to look for one that has a solid metal top. But the pop corn is great, and you can put sugar  in there with the oil and salt to form glaze, and cinamon, pepper, chinese five spice, and so o</review_text>
I should have read the other review more closely. This is a good blanket for HOT summer nights! I believe it is too light for cold winter nights. I expected more for over $50. If I didn't return it it would have made a nice decorative throw! The color and texture are nice</review_text>
We have had the cordless blender for 3 years now, and although it was a bit cumbersome at first because we were used to the lighter and smaller corded version, it was a great benefit for a well used kitchen. Clean up was a breeze, too. The worst feature of this blender the 'rechargable' battery, which, withihn a year, took less and less of a charge after each use. Now we have to charge it 3 times to use it once. It does not surprise me that Cuisinart does not sell rechargeable batteries separately, which, in hindsight seems like planned obsolescence, but in turn, Cuisinart should not be surprised when I never buy another one</review_text>
My friend was ecstatic when she opened up this present from me at the holidays. She claims it's the best spice rack - very durable, stylish, and doesn't take up too much space on the kitchen counter. To prove her point, she went and bought fresh spices and made her own personalized spice rack. Definitely was a hit</review_text>
Not what I expected...    I thought it did duo patterns of rosettes, but only does one.  I can't not use other Rosette patterns with the set.  It doesn't remain the heat, so it took longer to make the cookies.</review_text>
I thought I was getting a good deal and a good product at a cheap price, but instead I got what a paid for and nothing more.  Cheap product at a cheap price.  Only used a few times, literally 2-3 times, then one time when my girlfriend put the glass down on the table it broke and wine went everywhere.  Luckily we acted quickly or else a bunch of carpet would have been ruined.  They feel really cheap too.  If you only want to use them a few times, get them, I know we will never get these again</review_text>
I purchased this topper June 2006, and at first loved it.This was a great purchase until it started to shrink, deflate, and discolor. What a waste! The pad used to be 3 inches think, but it has shrunk significantly in all directions and thickness. It has lost its cushiony quality, and is now uncomfortable. There also appears to be no way to get in touch with the company to inquire about what has gone wrong here.</review_text>
This timer arrived in two pieces  -  top half and bottom half.  They could be reconnected, but would never stay connected.  This is a piece of junk that I have thrown away.  Made in China</review_text>
My timer didn't work either.  It arrived broken in two pieces, and even though I was able to put it back together, it just didn't work.  Back it went.  It's cute, but pretty much useless</review_text>
These refills are ridiculous.  Yes, they are simple to use, but the maximum life span is about two weeks.  I've gone through at least 6 sets of refills this winter season already, and the results are consistent.  I run the Vornado humidifier 24/7, as recommended by the manufacturer and clean it regularly, especially when changing out the wicks.  There is never any gunky build-up to blame the short life-span on.  These are clearly manufactured to last only two weeks.  My ancient Duracraft, which is no longer manufactured, but is the best humidifier I've ever had, easily goes 4 to 6 weeks between wick filter changes, with no deterioration in performance.  This will be the last year I use the Vornado...for next year I'll be purchasing a second Air-o-Swiss, which runs like a dream, but is quite pricey up front</review_text>
This product is not eligible for free shipping, yet it ships from the Amazon warehouse along with the humidifier that IS eligible for free shipping</review_text>
I love water filters, this perhaps is my third, first was a Brita, gave to family member years ago and it is still in use, went on to faucet style but prefer pitchers, then to this Ultra.  This pitcher leaks, I suspect it is the style, leak is not big-time, but pitcher will have to be replaced wayyyy too soon in a household where there is no rough treatment of kitchen items.  I am NOT happy.Elain</review_text>
We had this less than 10 months and used only two of three Ultimate filters we purchased separately, that's how little use this pitcher got. Started leaking everywhere one day and I couldn't figure out what had happened. I thought I hadn't put the innards back in right, after changing the filter, but in the end I decided either a seal or a seam failed.I'm not the first person to report the leaking problem with minimal use, so I believe it is a design or manufacturing flaw. What a waste of a good $60, with the additional three filters purchased.While it worked, we loved its sleek design, how much water it held and how great the water tasted. That's why it gets the two stars I gave it. Too bad it turned out to be a piece of junk.I see the item is now not available here at Amazon and I guess that means someone monitored the returns or complaints about the product and made changes or pulled the item from sales rotation.What I want to know is when we will be notified by Pur about the problem, and given coupons or rebates because of it; if you sent in your warranty card or registered the product online there is no reason Pur couldn't offer somehting in exchange for their poorly designed item.Mine's now in the trash where it belongs. Don't buy one if you are considering it. Go with a good quality, faucet-mounted or under-sink mount filtering system and you will be glad you did, despite the more expensive price</review_text>
It's weird. The handle is so nicely designed with rubbery grips and that handsome "Emeril" logo, then you have the whisk part which is kind of cheaply made rough plastic which loses it's shape easily. You'd hope the manufacturers would put the same effort into the actual whisk as they did in the handle, but not here.It's not a bad whisk for the price, but if you want a nice whisk and are willing to spend a couple more dollars, buy something else.</review_text>
Although the press has a timer, I found that it does not operate as expected.  It does not seem to reset quickly after opening, so i ended up timing myself.I like that it can be stored on it's side</review_text>
We bought this on amazon about 5 months ago after a cheaper black & decker one had the heat element buckle after 6 months.  I thought if I upgraded a bit, I could get a bit more milege out of it- like maybe 2 years...but now with only 5 months of usage...suddenly no power.  Totally dead.  It is still under warranty so if the shipping costs to get it to a warranty center aren't too outrageous we'll try that route, other wise, looks like another waste of money.  I have to say that while it did work, we enjoyed it.  It was roomy enough to cook a few cookies or heat up leftovers as needed without heating up the whole big oven, and made great bacon in the warmer- a bonus we weren't expecting.update to this review: I sent in to warranty center and they replaced it with a new one.  It took a while and then they sent the wrong item (same name different product-honest mistake) but were very very nice when I called and sent the right one out right away- now just hoping this one lasts more than 5 months</review_text>
If I could give this product 0 stars, I would.  READ THE NEGATIVE REVIEWS, FOLKS, AND BE FOREWARNED.  I believed the positive reviews and ignored the negative ones, much to my exasperation.  When I plugged my handsome new oven in, the little red digital display numbers came on right away ... hmmm ... so far so good.  But, according to the instructions, you are supposed to run the oven with the door open for 15 minutes to get rid of the new oven smell.  Sooo ... the owner's manual says to push the "bake" button on the dashboard, which in turn lights the pilot LID light on the display, after which you can set "time" and "temp".  So I push the "bake" button and nothing happens, no LID light comes on.  Nothing.  Zilch.  Zippo.  So I then push the "temp" and "time" lights to try to get the gerbils to wake up.  Still nothing.  I unplugged it and and plugged it in again, thinking that maybe somehow I had screwed that up, while listening for the "beep" the owner's manual said should happen whence the unit is plugged in.  Zilch.  Zippo.  Nothing.  No "beep".  No "bake" LID light.  Tried pusing the "temp" and "time" buttons again.  Nada.  Tried unpugging it again and doing the whole shebang all over again.  Still nothing.  It just sat there and grinned at me.  About this time, I figured out that my unit was also "dead on arrival".  At least you can get a parcel paid bill of lading printed off from the Amazon website for a defective product return, saving yourself the annoyance of prepaying to return a dead product you have already paid for and now must wait weeks to get a refund on.  Amazon should take the remainder of their stock of this awful product out to the back lot of their warehouse and run them over with a forklift</review_text>
This item has not functioned at all for me. Removable of the battery cover required rubber gloves for traction and the opener would not open a 2 3/4 inch diameter can. A cute little useless item</review_text>
We've had this foam mattress topper for a couple of weeks and it's OK but nothing special. It does not significantly improve the comfort of the bed, nor provide any improvements in sleep quantity or quality</review_text>
The first dishwasher that I received from Etronics was dented, dirty and looked as though it had been used.  I complained, they picked it up, and one month later I got the replacement.  It wasn't in much better shape, but I kept it anyway because I was tired of waiting. The dishwasher cycle takes about 90 minutes, and although it cleans well, the adapter to hook it up is cheaply made, and it leaks even with teflon tape.  I would not make this purchase again</review_text>
I am not fond of this particular microwave because of the loud clunky sound of the door opening.  Poor in my opinion.  I can't believe that I will probably put up with this for years as I use my microwave several times a day.  My husband just complained that the start button is hidden on the user display among the other buttons.  Seems like there should some sort of user standards for display input.  Like Power buttons in the upper left corner.  Most-used buttons should be large.  maybe in a special color.  I like the web 2.0 look that is developing on user interfaces.  No user interface should make the user feel stupid is my thought.  I asked my husband what was the brand name and he said "Sharp" so even if cheap I think Sharp ought to protect the brand image.  But I see that I am in the minority of opinions here.  Maybe my advice is not order on line till you try this item out</review_text>
Bad quality, on/off switch and plastic ring broken after 1 year.</review_text>
My kids think this is a better toy than our dog.  Wasn't worth the money I paid for it.  Comes apart too easy</review_text>
I purchased this blender several months ago and the power of the motor is great.  But if you make smoothies and crush a lot of ice, the plastic carafe will absolutely not hold up to that use.  Mine now leaks all over the base unit even though I've always washed it by hand and followed the manual's instructions.  The Waring website says this product is sold with a glass carafe, but they don't sell the glass carafe as a replacement part - only the plastic.If you think you're going to crush ice or use the power of the motor, you're going to have big problems with the plastic carafe.  (And the replacement plastic carafe is $50!!)At this point, I think I'm going to have to throw out the blender</review_text>
This coffeemaker does not keep coffee hot and fresh for hours as the user booklet says, even if you first fill the carafe with hot water and let it set before brewing.  If you want a cup 45 minutes after brewing, it is luke-cold! I was emptying the carafe right after brewing into another thermal carafe that actually keeps coffee hot just to avoid reheating cup after cup in the microwave! It is hard to clean and very loud</review_text>
I might have bought these pans if I could find out how deep they are</review_text>
I was cooking 5 strips of bacon on the platter in the microwave and the platter actually cracked in half! I have cooked bacon on my other platters with no problem. This is dangerous and annoying. I couldn't find Sango customer service anywhere, therefore, had to return to retailer, etc.</review_text>
Bought this set at Target 3 years ago for $200, and during the first few months was seriously impressed by them.  They're heavy, cooked things well, and the stainless handles are strong and stay cool.  Never once put them in the dishwasher or put any utensil (metal, etc) in them that didn't belong in them.  Took care when washing, didn't burn things in them, etc.  Somehow the finish still flaked off of both skillets starting at 6 months, and the pots have now also been showing the early signs of retirement. Because I didn't want to pay return shipping or get a replacement set, and the flaking finish was too dangerous for donating, they had to go straight to the trash.  Very upsetting that such gorgeous pots and pans had such a short life, with high care and high cost.  The 2nd star is because they are beautiful and I cooked every day with these - if you rarely cook and plan to take care of these, they might work for you.  For me, stainless steel and cast iron is the way to go.  I wouldn't even try another "non-stick finish"</review_text>
I purchased this coffee maker and in three months time, threw it out. What a piece of [....]. You can NEVER get a decent HOT cup of coffee (it is lukewarm at best) and the carafe not only breaks, so you have to replace it, but it is designed to spill coffee everywhere as you attempt to pour coffee from the carafe into the cup. What a dissapointment this machine is. Mr. Coffee used to make a good product that would actually make a good hot cup of coffee, but the quality and design of their machines today are very poor. I would not recommend this coffee maker to anyone. The only nice thing I can say about it is the programmable timer worked.  I would not give this coffee maker one star, but that was the lowest rating available. If it were up to me, I would give this coffeemaker a minus zero rating!</review_text>
Poor carafe design makes this Mr. Coffee machine a waste of money. We bought this model to replace our old Mr. Coffe machine after we broke the carafe and couldn't purchase a replacement for that model.  We loved our old Mr. Coffee, but this purchase was completely dissatisfying because, as other reviewers have noted, it's virtually impossible to pour without spilling the coffee/water everywere.  After the first few uses, we decided to purchase a different coffee maker</review_text>
I've had this coffeemaker for two weeks. I bought it because I had an old Mr. Coffee that worked fine, but was white and stained.  I liked that this was black and looked sleek.  The very second time I used it, the off button stuck, so you can no longer turn off the machine, but have to wait for it to turn itself off.  Also, EVERY pot has grounds in it.  I'm using the filters that came with it, and have never even filled it to capacity, and I can't figure out why there are ALWAYS grounds in my coffee.  Piece of junk.  Don't buy it</review_text>
looks quite cheap, not as good from the pictur</review_text>
Within 2 weeks, the pause & brew didn't exist. The coffee poured all over when I tried to pull the carafe for a cup. My attempts at fixing it were for naught. What a waste of money! I'm not one who returns items. I just won't buy Braun again!</review_text>
This coffeemaker is a huge disappointment!  The stop when you remove the coffee pot rarely works, when pouring coffee the lid is not well made so coffee spills everywhere, and if you do not use additional paper filters, you get coffee grains.  In summary, a huge mess everytime you make a pot of coffee.  The plus? the water filter, but that is it</review_text>
I bought this coffee maker because of its compact size, but returned it a week later. I found it very difficult to avoid spillage when pouring the water into the coffee maker AND the coffee into a cup. The problem was worse if making more than 4 cups.Another problem was the taste of the coffee. I like my coffee full of flavor. I have been using drip coffee makers for several years and think I know how to get the coffee "just right". But, every carafe of coffee from this tasted weak, and MUCH too hot, almost scalding!</review_text>
PACKAGE ARRIVED QUICKLY.OVEN LOOKS REALLY NICE.OVEN BURNS TOAST EVEN ON LOWEST SETTINGS!</review_text>
Don't waste your money or your food by buying and using this so-called "slow cooker." Just like most people have reported, the unit runs VERY HOT! This is an indication of poor manufacturing quality control. After a couple of burnt meals, I went out and bought a different unit with a mechanical temperature control switch. Unfortunately, I had thrown away the carton and receipt so I couldn't return it. As a result of this experience and wasting my good money, I will avoid buying Rival products in the future.</review_text>
My husband bought this for me for Christmas 2005.  I was thrilled to get it since I had an older, smaller model.  I had never burned any food in a slow cooker before I used this model.   I couldn't figure out how to get it to cook SLOWLY.  I finally called customer service and was told I wasn't using the right kinds of recipes.  She told me that the pot had to be at least 75% full.  I used her advice, but it still boils everything on every temperature level.  I use it to make roasts and that is all.  It "sweats" horribly and I have to put it on a cutting board so it doesn't burn my countertop.  The handle cracked after 6 months.  My biggest "ah-ha" moment was when I came home after a long day out.  There had been a power surge, and it had reset itself.  My whole meal was ruined and that is when I realized the value of a dial-knob slow cooker.  Just back away slowly from this one</review_text>
Read the fine (or missing) print carefully.  This is not a general purpose vacuum purchase.  You need to buy the carpet attachment to be able to vacuum carpets (another $100).  If you want to return this item, they charge a restocking fee of 10% and also deduct for the shipment (even if you got "free" shipping) AND you pay to ship the thing back.  We ended up buying locally from Sears and are much happier with it than from Central Vacuum Stores - which is where the Miele came from.</review_text>
Ok i have a couple of these tongs sitting in a box and trust me that is where they belong.They are hard to use because when you move the slide lock up they open completly wide and if you want to quickly lock or unlock then forget it there are beter ones on the market that can be locked and unlocked with one hand not two like these require and the metal feels cheap and they are very light a slight wind will knock them right onto the floor.Spend a little more cash for the OXO locking tongshttp://www.amazon.com/exec/obidos/tg/detail/-/B0000CCY1L/qid=1122017598/sr=8-1/ref=pd_bbs_sbs_1/002-9480983-6492045?v=glance&s=kitchen&n=507846Trust me you will like them bette</review_text>
Back in the mid 1980's I bought a Patton 14 inch high velocity fan; although this fan i am reviewing uses the same name, it is not at all nearly as good as the original. The original actuallyhad three different speeds ;while this one uses three speeds, they are hardly distinquishable from each other; the original was of heavier gauge and would not topple as easily as this new version.   The original fan model had a fan which cut more deeply because the fins stood out more and hence the original blew the air much more powerfully than this new version. Oh, yes the original's lowest speed was actually quiet whereas none of the speeds on this new version is quiet.  Bad substitute and mediocre fan</review_text>
i really like the look of the toaster, and it does a nice job; on one side. the toasting elements on one side in each slot do not fully heat up so it toasts one side more than the other - will be trying to get it repaired, or likely, will have to get a new one.</review_text>
The towel is quite soft, however after using it, your body will be covered with small fibers all over.  - not recommended</review_text>
This coffeemaker makes the WORST coffee of any I have owned in 26 years.  It "brews" very quickly, losing a "cup" or more of the water added in steam that just pours out of the top.  The coffee is weak and bitter (no matter what brand we have tried).  About the 4th time we used the pot it overflowed, creating a mess of grounds and coffee all over the countertop.  We thought maybe we had put the carafe on the base incorrectly, and were careful to always be sure it was pushed in completely from then on. The same thing has happened twice more. This coffeemaker is a piece of junk</review_text>
I have been using these filters for years.  My first impression with them is that they are very expensive.  My second impression is that they might not work as well as I thought they did.I recently bought a water distiller and I have been experimenting with different sources of water in it.  I have used hot water directly from the tap, cold water directly from the tap, and Brita filtered water in the distiller.  The Brita filtered water left the most residue in the distiller, which is very disconcerting.The filters let out small amounts of carbon all the time into the top of their proprietry resevoir.  In the directions, it says to slowly add water to the filtering well, which is what I do, but it still leaches at least thirty little pieces of carbon in the prefiltered water.  I want clean water, not water with small pieces of carbon floating in the filling well.I have always wanted to believe the filters were working, but now am very skeptical.</review_text>
Why do most of us buy sharper image? Most of the times their products work well, and they look great.This heater looked great in the picture. It ends there.I bought three, thinking I would keep one for myself, and two for friends. There's no way I would give this to a friend. Maybe a stranger whom I didn't care about giving the wrong impression.Pros: It's small.Con: It looks cheap. It feels cheap. It doesn't work at all. If it didn't have the sharper image logo on it, I would guess that it was a 5 dollar clearance item at walgreens.</review_text>
If you are buying this bed to use at home as a guest bed...DON'T!I have two areobeds; I bought the first one in 1993 when they had just come out.  The pump is attached to the bed and it needs to be plugged to charge it. Fifteen years later it still works like a charm.  I liked it so much; I recently bought a Minute bed because I needed another guest bed.  It does not say anywhere on the box that you cannot use the pump without having to charge it first for 24 hours.  Needles to say one of my unexpected guests had to sleep on the sofa.  The battery is NiCad, which means it develops a memory, so now even if I remembered to charge it the day before, it does not run long enough to inflate the bed.  They do not offer a separate electric, detachable pump, so now I'm stuck with a "plastic carpet" that cannot be inflated with anything else.  The areobeds work great, but if you need one that can be used for any unexpected occasion, buy a different type.</review_text>
I have a lot of low-voltage lights on our house.  Many colors and different wattages, which I dearly love.  Unfortunately, the spiders also love to build webs on the siding because flying insects are attracted to the lights.  One night I used my Panasonic vacuum (which I love) and got over 30!  The motor chews them up and spits the pieces into the disposable bag--I've never had one survive! Nice jolly subject, right? Often, I have to hold the vacuum in one hand (20 lbs.) while using the hose with attachment in the other.  This gives me over 3 ft. of reach and the suction is so great that the insect is "gone" within 1" of the brush.  OK, the Lentek is rechargeable, doesn't have a power cord and is lite (albeit unwieldly).  After charging for a day the unit would pick up a 1/8" spider but nothing larger.  After a minute of operation the suction is down by about half and you won't get anything then.  Yes, I'm back to the Panasonic and the Lentek?---the "round file"!</review_text>
i hated these shakers. i got them as a gift and 1. they are too big and take up too much space and 2. the rubber stoppers were not a tight fit so the salt and pepper was always leaking out the bottom and 3. the holes in the top are too big and too much comes out at once. finally one broke and i was thrilled to toss them out. the other, smaller fiesta ware ones -- the round ones -- are much much better</review_text>
This product does work and produces great tasting water--for a while.  I thought maybe we'd done something to make it leak, but a guest said his did the same thing in about the same amount of time (approx 8 months).There's a part of the filter assembly that becomes loose and leaks, and then eventually squirts water all over the place.  There is no way to fix it.We won't be buying this brand again.</review_text>
this product did not come with all that was advertised</review_text>
We were very disappointed, upon opening the package, to see how small the glasses are.  I was concerned about this when I purchased them, but could find no info on size (and the seller is very careful to not show them near anything else that might give you a hint as to how small they are (2 inches in diameter at the largest point and only 4 1/4 inches tall; I can hide the entire glass in my closed fist)</review_text>
I am a very experienced user of Innova.  Innova is I guess you can say is the parent company of Ultrex which is a line of nonstick cookware.Innova is not know for quality and this product is no different.  There is a 25 year warranty on the Ultrex, I had mine for 6 years and the nonstick coating is off.  You can return the product for another but yes, you have to pay for the shipping and if your pot is oversized, you have to pay UPS or whomever to make you a box and thats another charge.The customer service is not world class.  I had to wait almost 3 months for a replacement.  The workmanship is horrible, the product is made in China, however, I've had other things made in China that were of great quality, so I don't know what is up with Innova.I suggest that if you find a product made by Innova, avoid it!  Save yourself the aggrevation!  This product doesn't deserve 1 star</review_text>
The product came chipped on the bottom so its lopsided.  Much smaller than anticipated, I can only fit a tablespoon in it</review_text>
I prefer my spoons to stand upright. Many of my spoons fall out of this one, I guess it depends on your shape of the spoon</review_text>
I didn't get this order, did you credit my credit card if so email me with the conf. number and when the credit was given.</review_text>
I loved these sheets when I first received them and would have written a glowing review then.  However, now that I have washed them twice there is no sheen to them and every single inch on them is pilled.  They look terrible but I haven't slept on them yet since they pilled so I don't know how that will feel.  Hopefully it won't be noticeable.  No one sees these sheets other than me and my husband, but I am very disappointed with these considering I've had cheaper sheet sets for 8 years that haven't reacted this way.  By the way, I ordered the set in chocolate and it is a nice color if brown is what you want.  Maybe it's possible that certain colors pill and some don't?  I have read other reviews that people said their sheets pilled also</review_text>
I'm a betta hobbist and I know about all the misconceptions that betta can live in just about anything and it is bogus. This "aquarium" is way too small, betta require atleast one gallon of water and that needs to be cleaned 1-2x weekly atleast. This is probably 1/2 gallon or less meaning you either clean it every day, t hus stressing your betta out and killing it or let is die a slow death from ammonia burns and other ills. This also has no lighting leave betta looking dull and boring, no heating or ability to heat so your house must stay warm where your betta is and it just isn't good. You can also buy large Critter Carriers (2-3 gallons) for the same price or less, it wouldn't be great, but it'd be a heck of a lot better</review_text>
The frother works well as others have said.  Unfortunately, it broke very easily when I dropped it into the sink while cleaning.  I've only had it 3 or 4 months but did not save any warranty info.  This device needs to be made stronger to withstand normal kitchen events</review_text>
After reading all of the positive reveiws and only a few negative ones I purchased this humidifier back in Dec. Well here it is early Feb and this thing just plain sucks. I have a digital humidistat sitting right next to it in a med size room (13x13) and it never reaches higher that 29%. In the dry months of winter 29% is unacceptable, and my eyes nose and throat would agree. So don't do what I did, and save your money. Or if you must try it, just be prepared to send it back or donate it to goodwill. Enjoy</review_text>
We now have the 4.2 gallon humidifer, as well as the air softener, all Vornado, and this one is most disappointing.  The construction is a bit flimsy, but my biggest complaint is the area coverage.  The unit is supposed to support at least a 600 sq ft space.  We have it in our master bedroom which is smaller than this and the air still feels very dry in our bedroom even after we've been running it for 2 days now non-stop on the high setting.  Granted, I have a pretty heightened sensitivity to the moisture in the air in our bedroom given I have a cold and nasal congestion, but I expected more from this unit given our satisfaction with the other.  We run the air softener on our 1st floor, which covers several rooms and it definitely maintains a level of moisture there very well.  The 4.2 unit is in our basement, which again covers several room and that one also has met our satisfaction.  We bought this because we needed one just for our master bedroom and we are pretty disappointed.  We have radiator heat and are suffering through the cold winter of Chicago right now.</review_text>
I've had two of these stop working when used with olive oil, sadly, though the canola oil one is still going strong</review_text>
Walnut Tradition Kitchen Scissors (ASIN: B00005AM7R) do not have "Comfortable wood handles secured with triple-brass rivets", they have unattractive chocolate-brown plastic handles.The bottle opener and screw driver extensions are a poor design feature, and simply get in the way.</review_text>
From the description, I thought these would be a lot more sturdy. They're fine for storing light weight items that you don't need to access often. But I found that the plastic supports tended to break through the fabric at the corners and break in half if stressed</review_text>
This sealer does not use a piston pump like most other sealers use.  It removes the air with a fan.  There is air left in the bag, it doesn't create a vacuum.  The bags are not ribbed and you have to fit them over a hose under the lid.  The bags are folded on a roll and you have to seal three sides to create a bag.  I was also dissappointed in the weight of the bags.  They are thinner than Ziploc bags.  You cannot use canisters with this one</review_text>
It is a very lovely two piece set. And Amazon shipped it to me twice, and both times it arrived in more or less a pile of shards. I gave up, but from what I could tell from the remains, this set is a very nice heavy earthen bakewear. I'm not sure, considering the shipping problems, whether the set could survive normal jostling in storage cabinets or a dishwasher</review_text>
I placed a substantial order, mattresses, sofa set, table set and cocktail tables with this vendor and they cancelled my shipment becuase the cost to deliver the items they said was "too much"Nothing in their ads states they will cancel your order for such a reason and they state the shipping charge on the items and their site.  This was a great inconvenience to me and I feel they are not a reputable dealer and do not conduct their business in an honorable fashio</review_text>
The first use wasn't too bad. It cut things well but the lock locks too easily, without something even touching it, so it had to be unlocked multiple times during use. Safety is nice,but that is just annoying.The biggest problem is the coil/spring is NOT stainless-steel so the inside of it rusts, even if you take it apart for each washing. Once it gets rusty it becomes very very difficult toclose the shears, making cutting a real pain, literally. I soak the spring regularly in rust remover but I can not use it no more than a single piece now without horrible aches in my hand.My prior shears lasted for 10 years, but these I need to replace after a couple of months..</review_text>
I gave these 2 stars because they worked nice for the first couple of months, even cut through chicken bones.  But just like the other reviews, the spring rusted terribly and the spring tends to pop off too easily at the most inconvenient moment.  I used these for making chicken soup alot, but noticed that it also doesn't always come clean between the blades and when using on chicken I like to be extra careful. So the next set I get I'll look for a set where the blades unhinge to make sure they come clean and not from Henckels this time</review_text>
I received my bowls today and was very disappointed.  How bowls this size can be referred to as "mixing" bowls I cannot fathom.  Neither do I know what could be mixed in bowls so small.  The second from the largest bowl is about the size of a normal cereal bowl. The bowls nest so the largest bowl holds the "cereal" bowl and the next to the smallest bowl nests in the cereal bowl.  The smallest bowl is a joke.  I doubt it would hold an extra large egg without running over.  The material is nice...melamine... and colorful but those are the only positive statements I can make</review_text>
The humidifier started leaking after a few weeks.  In another website, a few reviewers also had this problem.  The water overflows from the reservoir to the unit and onto the floor and does not stop until the tank is empty.  Very annoying!!  The filter has not lasted long and started smelly funky the third day of use.  It is also way too expensive</review_text>
Although I have used this model before and have all good results, the one I bought for Christmas did not work.  Jura Capresso states that they test their machines before they leave the factory.  They might have tested mine and it may have worked, but all it did for me was spit out hot water underneath the tray.  I tried different grind settings but to no avail, water flowing out the bottom of the machine.  Too bad as this was a gift for all of my family.  Imagine the look on their faces when all they got was water dripping onto the floor</review_text>
This steamer performs very poorly.  The wrinkles in my shirts just laughed when they saw it coming.  Now it sits in my closet collecting wasting space</review_text>
The design is great, the function is not. Always difficult to get both in the same package! I'm going to return it. It toasts unevenly. Toast is not crisp & it burns a corner of the toast</review_text>
WHY DO THEY CALL IT a 3 CUP PRESS..I barely get ONE cup out of it!! Are they talking EXPRESSO cups?Well anyway, every single time I use it I get grounds in my cup! EVERYTIME! GROUNDS!!!! yuck!This is the third French Press I have owned and it is the worst of the three! I guess I will continue my search for a fourth French Press before I choke on too many grounds!!!!</review_text>
First I liked this press - good coffee, reasonable price.But in 3 weeks operation, the press itself has already broken. The plastic holder for mesh filter has broken...May be this pres is good for ones a year usage, but not for everyday...</review_text>
Product was fine except that it isn't microwaveable. At the time of purchase it claimed to be microwaveable. The handle has a screw in it. I purchased it specifically for use in a microwave</review_text>
I was very impressed with the infomercials on this product and was about to buy the set before I read a very detailed and thorough online review at http://www.epinions.com/content_180924944004.  The reviewer gives a blow by blow review challenging all the claims made by the commercial for this product.  Among her pet peeves:* things do stick to the product - use a flour cooking spray for better results.* odors do stay with the product* not easy to clean - the reviewer says she found a special plastic cleaning product helps.* size of the pieces are small* the pieces are so flexible that if you don't place the food neatly in the pan, you get some unexpected lumps or misshapened results.* you can slice through the product easily.* guarantee is shakey at best* and so on.....There are one or two pluses but not enough to warrant buying in the face of all the negative issues brought to light.And more importantly, I personally wonder how safe it is to cook food on silicon surfaces at high tempertures on a day to day basis.  I for one, definitely will not buy this product.Please consider this recap of another's review a public service.Buyer beware</review_text>
The Bissell 2680B Perfect Sweep Dual Brush Sweeper has a pole attachment that keeps coming apart every time you attempt to sweep. This defect in the design, which uses sections instead of one long pole, makes it impossible to use without aggravation. We have put tape around the pole, but it does not work. Now we are going to try screws to hold it together. I never saw anything like this in my life, and hope I never do again.</review_text>
I was looking for a set of steak knives and came across the infomercial one night. It sounded great and much cheaper then the Henckels of the world. And look at all the different types of knives. NOT WORTH IT. These knives don't cut well at all (as compared to my Henckel knife). I wish I didn't buy it and just purchased a couple of good quality knives.Also, the block holder is HUGE!  It takes up too much space.</review_text>
The original filter that came with the unit worked fine and it was easily able to humidify two large rooms.  This replacement filter, however, does not seem to wick water very well.  It can barely keep a 17x12' room at 30% humidity with the door closed, windows shut and heat turned off.  And it's in the 40s -- not even very cold out.  In fact, it wicks so badly that for the water level to change in the tank I have to flip the filter every hour or so.  I called Hamilton Beach but they said it wasn't their problem because the filters are manufactured by 3M.  Of course, this is the only filter offered for use with this unit</review_text>
I am glad I only paid $60 for this.  I see it's now up to $90.I am a bit disappointed in this purchase.  It does slice well so far (although I haven't tried slicing anything really thin like prosciutto yet) but I don't like the fact that I have to hold the on button down with one hand while cutting.I also found that when I used it to slice homemade bread that the slices get stuck in between the blade and the plastic guide at the bottom, so I have to stop and dislodge each slice, sometimes tearing them in the process.I also don't like how loud it is and the fact that it sounds like it is working REALLY HARD all the time.  It makes me question how long the motor is going to last.The catch tray is really useless (as someone else pointed out) and in addition to not doing it's job it doesn't store inside or attached to the machine in any way, so it just kind of gets in the way.  If I decide to keep the machine I am going to throw it away.So all in all, I gave it two stars because it is a CHEAP slicer (or at least it was at $60 I am not so sure at $90) but it works like a cheap slicer too, so you are definitely getting what you pay for..</review_text>
WE MADE TWO BATCHES OF ICED TEA IN OUR MAKER.  WE COULDN'T FIGURE OUT WHY IT WAS LEAKING BUT FIGURED MOST OF THEM DO HAVE SPOUT PROBLEMS.  MY HUSBAND FOUND A CRACK FROM THE SPOUT UPWARD SO OUT IT WENT. ALTHOUGH THE INSTRUCTIONS SAY TO ADJUST THE SPOUT WE NEVER TOUCHED IT</review_text>
We finally broke down and went looking for a complete set of quality kitchen knives. The name Wushof came up several times and we purchased a set of them.They work well until they started getting dull sooner then I thought they would . I have numerous sharpening stone ,(ceramic, diamond)and buffing wheels, and sharpened them myself to a razors edge.Again they worked well, but soon became very dull. We were very careful in the storing and handling of them which made no differance.They are well balanced , looked well made but are over rated and priced.The 2 Mac Japanese knives we have stay sharper longer, take abuse better and sharpen easier.</review_text>
i bought this screen and hoped it would keep the stove top clean whilst i sauteed or fried food.  i used it twice and it worked well. the third time i placed it on top of my cast iron skillet where the hamburgers were grilling and the screen caught fire at the edge.  it was a small fire but big enough to burn a hole thru the screen and i no longer want to use it and take a chance of another fire.  think twice before buying thi</review_text>
This grill pan heats relatively evenly, and is large enough to accomodate four slices of bread, allowing for the preparation of two sandwiches simultaneously.  It leaves nice "grill marks" on the food, and works well overall. The press that comes with it is very nice to have, as it helps cook food faster. However, it has one major drawback: it makes a very odd smell when it is used, regardless of the temperature at which it is being heated. I thought maybe this smell would dissappear after several uses, but even after many uses the smell is still as strong as the day I took it out of the box. It is enough of an odor to make me wonder about the safety of the product.  I have a number of higher end Calphalon non-stick pans and none of them make this smell, making me think this is a consequence of a cheaper pan. Bottom line: If I had to do it over again, I would spend a bit more money and get a higher end Calphalon grill pan and press instead</review_text>
I loved these sheets when I first got them.  They look expensive and have a nice thick feel to them.  After laundering them in cold water by themselves once a week for 2 months they started to fade, and worse yet started developing spots of discoloration in a bright orange color on the pillowcases!  I have laundered these in Tide with NO bleach!  What a shame they did not hold up well</review_text>
Just got the pressure cooker, and it looks like a great, heavy duty pot.  Very nice.  Because of the other reviews, my main purpose in purchasing this was for canning.However, after reading the manual, I learned that this CAN NOT be used at altitudes above 3,000 feet -- which leaves out a lot of Colorado, New Mexico, Utah......Otherwise, I'm sure it's great</review_text>
Believe me, I dearly wanted this pan to work out. It costs well over $100. However, no matter what I did, everything I cooked in this pan stuck. I tried using it without greasing it, greasing it with oil, spraying pam on it, putting ghee/butter in it etc. The following things all stuck: pancakes, eggs, hamburgers and chicken. In fact, every thing I tried, stuck. Also, the shape was strange as most of the surface area was off the heating surface. Also, they have this 1" label on the bottom that was hard to get off. I finally did but once I cooked something, when I turned the pan over there was a microscopic film of glue from the label that I wasn't able to get off and it had turned brown. Ugggh, this was the worst cooking experience of my life. Needless to say, I returned this pan...</review_text>
Okay, I bought for the price. And it is effective enough. But it is very clumsy and unergonomic, so that after a couple minutes of use it is difficult to handle any longer. The main problems are: Balance of weight, and the switch.First, the switch: Because it is a cheap push-in button, which must be constantly depressed to keep the knife on, you lose optimum control quickly. The handle is badly placed for this, as your thumb must always be on TOP of the handle and forward toward the front of it, but you can't hold your hand up there because your wrist angle will be completely wrong for cutting. In addition, keeping that button depressed is difficult not only because it does require a constant application of pressure at a different direction from both the grasp and the application of the knife, but because the button sinks deep into the handle, so your thumb is inside the handle as you're trying to hold and control the knife: Quick cramp. Moreover, as you're pushing it in, if the food you're cutting is moist (like a turkey), juices may run onto the handle, your thumb--and into the hole into which you're pressing the button. NOT safe. A couple times I've wondered whether that shooting pain in my thumb was from nerve torture or electric shock; either way, it wasn't good.Then the weight distribution of the knife is not very good. Look at the huge bulk of the motor--and then look at where the handle is located, and how it is designed. There's no way to hold this at a proper angle with the handle shaped as it is. Add in the need to be depressing the power button as you're holding it awkwardly, and...2 stars for effectiveness; minus 3 for bad functional design</review_text>
the pin is not properly secured to the body of the pitter. after a few uses it will pop off. i've gone through three of these pitters from my local linens 'n things. how could the designers be so inept</review_text>
I bought this coffee maker to try and get above the level of cheap coffeemakers.  I did not succeed.  I paid $50 and could have bought a $20 Mr. Coffee and saved myself a lot of my money.  This is not a top of the line coffee maker with bottomline features.... it is a bottomline coffee maker with bottomline features.  It has no clock, no timer, no automatic turnoff (It will cook the pot dry if you forget to turn it off.  It is hard to fill to the correct level without having water run out the hole in the reservoir at the back.  It is hard to pour a cup of coffee without cascades of dribbles.    You are supposed to be able to take a cup out as it is brewing.  In a word, "Don't".  It just keeps drooling coffee all over the heating element.  And it takes forever to brew a pot of coffee.I am not an engineer, just a harried housewife that is trying to get everything together in the morning and get everyone where they need to go.  THIS coffeemaker should have never made it to the marketplace.If you want a basic coffeemaker, get a Mr. Coffee for $20, this is not what you are looking for.There is nothing "Deluxe" about this coffee maker except the profit they are making off of consumers like me.</review_text>
I received the Shake-N-Take as a gift for Christmas 2006.  Mine just broke down this morning.  The motor gave out.  I didn't really get 2 weeks of service out of it</review_text>
The outside ring works well but the inside ring leaves an incomplete cut. It appears that the two rings are not at the same level leaving no way that the inside ring can make contact with the cutting surface. I am cutting the inside ring with a separate modified piece of metal</review_text>
You may as well put your betta in a glass of water. The argument is that bettas are naturally found in rice paddies in Thailand...go ahead and google images of a rice paddy. Bettas can live in small areas due to a special lung that lets them breathe air directly...humans can live in cars, but should they? And the tiny stick of bamboo is a joke, adding insult to injury. They have nothing to retreat or hide behind at all in this kit. Bettas were not put on this earth to make your office pretty. If you want a betta, get them a proper tank</review_text>
Do not buy this product.  It is not supplied with a parts list to order parts that may become broken.  If your call their customer service number, everyone is very courteous, however they want pictures of the Power base, (front-back-top and Bottom)as well as a picture of the menu book.  They want all of this just to order a simple O ring gasket that goes on the the blender blade piece to act as a seal.  They will not sell you this item (package of 4 for $7.95) without all of the above information as well as a receipt. I find that all of this would be unessary if they would just supply a simple parts list.Dyanand</review_text>
This was a seventh anniversaty gift, and being made of copper is its only real benefit.  Two of the welded connections between the rings were broken upon receipt and it's light and relatively shabby in construction.It's difficult to find a 7th anniversary gift made of copper, and to that end, this fit the bill.  But its real value, even for the intended purpose, is very limited</review_text>
Same problem - the surface has begun to deteriorate.  We use this pan daily, always using appropriate implements and washing by hand, but still the non-stick surface has broken down.  I am going to contact All Clad to see if they will stand by their product and replace..</review_text>
I must agree with the negative reviewers that this pan's nonstick coating began coming off almost immediately after I began using it.  I'm not talking about scratches, which often are a result of using the wrong kind of implements for cooking and cleaning.  My pan began pock all over, even up the sides where I rarely touch them.  I hung on to this pan for 3 years, simply because I could not bear to part with it for the expense.  But eventually I had to treat it like my other All-Clad pans (which I LOVE) and use full amounts of oil to cook.  It was no longer worth using.Although the reviewer who loves this pan was "certain" the rest of us who have not liked this pan were not caring for the pan properly, that "certainty" is based on nothing but speculation.  I cared for my pan precisely according to the directions provided by All-Clad.  Of course, I could have asked All-Clad to replace it early on, since it was clear the nonstick coating was coming off on its own accord.  But that would not have changed the fact that the coating on my pan was coming off</review_text>
I purchased this fry pan in June of this year - and it is almost to a state where it is ready to be thrown away as of December 1st.  I would have expected the nonstick surface to be of superior quality and durability from All-Clad, but the sad truth is that I have had cheap grocery store pans that have maintained the coating far longer, and a small fraction of the cost.  After just a few weeks the surface became scratched on this pan and the coating started to come off in the food - ick!  I love the uncoated All-Clad, but I will be looking elsewhere for nonstick in the future</review_text>
I have used this vacuum for over a year now.  I consistently have trouble with the belts staying on.  I cannot count the number of times I've had to unscrew the plate underneath and reattach the belts.  If it even rolls over something uneven on the floor, the belt comes off and the beater brush stops moving.Also, although "bagless" sounded great, this vacuum is very, very messy to clean out.  I have to take it outdoors and the dust goes everywhere.It also does not have a lot of sucking power through the attachments.I write this review today because the beater bar stopped turning and all belts are attached.  I have taken this vacuum apart for the last time..</review_text>
I bought this product in December 2004.  After two months of use (about once a week) the on/off switch broke.  Eventually after using it for a year (and trying to get Hoover to correct the problem), just before Christmas 2005 I got quite a fright when I started smelling smoke whilst using it.  I discontinued the use of the product, and asked Hoover once again to please look at it.  Their reply was that I should take it to one of their authorised shops, where they'll repair it, charge me.  Then Hoover will see if it was in fact a factory error and only then refund me when they feel they're not in the wrong.Please.  Don't waste your money on this product.  It is defnitely not worth it.  It is noisy, vacuums carpets well when used to work, but is unable to vacuum floors at all.  (One of the options on it).Sorry, Hoover.  But you have lost a loyal customer.  (My whole family for 3 generations back has always bought Hoover, including myself...</review_text>
At first, we loved this ultra quiet vacuum cleaner. After one year, however, it started sounding like a jet engine. The turbo-nozzle had broken. I live in a major city and no one within the city limits services these things, and when I ordered a new turbo nozzle, they sent a mini. It turns out that the actual replacement nozzle, listed at $29.99 a year ago, now costs $125.00! The explanation I got was "Prices are subject to change without notice." Now I'm stuck with a 5-inch mini turbo nozzle and my wife is going to kill me. Plus the cord, which used to snap back into the cannister at the touch of a button, creeps in while we're vacuuming--and when we press the button too. I love it at first, but I'll never buy another Electrolux. It's not well made, and they don't stand behind their product.</review_text>
Worked fine for about 6 months and then the inner surface failed.  I'm not sure precisely what happened but some part of the surface coating wore off and now it's impossible to make a waffle that doesn't stick completely to the waffle iron.  A complete waste of money</review_text>
Unlike many people it seems, I've never had a problem with the hinge on this waffle maker -- it's still sturdy for me after about 8 uses.However, the fact that I've owned this item for nearly 2 years and only used it 8 times speaks for itself. This waffle maker produces extremely mediocre waffles. I've NEVER  been able to make waffles that come even close to waffles I've had in restaurants.After trying over half a dozen different recipes, I realized that it wasn't my ingredients -- it was the waffle maker. This waffle maker is simply incapable of producing waffles the way they should be -- crispy on the outside, chewy and moist on the outside.Instead, no matter what recipe I used, or how long I cooked the waffles for, I would end up with dark brown waffles that were dry throughout and lost all crispiness (if they had any to begin with!) within moments of leaving the waffle maker.The model doesn't burn the waffles, the nonstick coating does indeed prevent sticking, and overall the waffle maker is nice looking. But that's all it has going for it. I've learned my lesson by now that when it comes to small kitchen appliances, you get what you pay for.</review_text>
My husband brought home this neat black coffee maker, deliberately choosing one without a timer - the less bells and whistles the less can go wrong . . .right?How can this company not even get the on-off button right???it's so cheap, when you push it, the "lighted button" just pushes right in, and doesn't turn the coffeemaker off or on.Why didn't we keep the box and receipt, so we could return it??$20 down the drainDON'T BUY THIS</review_text>
Do not buy this product or any other product with the Perfect Pour Carafe.  The brilliant designers at Black & Decker thought that they would improve on a centuries old design by incorporating a plastic spout on the glass carafe.  The problem is that the coffee flows in between the two and on to the floor or whatever else you are pouring over.  Nice work guys.  One call to their Customer Service line was cut off.  On the next I chose the option to leave a message and be called back--unfortunately the mailbox was full.  I guess the poor product deserves poor customer service</review_text>
At first I thought this was a great product.  If you only make cheese fondue it is great.  The pot is very easy to clean although it could be easier if it were dishwasher safe.The problem I've had with mine is that it doesn't get beyond about 320 degrees.  The dial goes up to 400 but even after waiting for 30 minutes for it to heat up, it only got up to 323 degrees and wouldn't go any further.  So if you want to use this for oil for a steak fondue it won't do the job well.I know these kinds of appliances have to have a short cord and also a break-away cord but this is ridiculous.  Touch the darn thing and the cord falls free.  Very frustrating if you have a lot of people trying to use it for fondue.  People kept telling me that the cheese was getting "hard" because the cord had fallen off, again.  Next time I'd get a pot that had a thermometer built in, don't rely on the heat setting dial.</review_text>
Don't buy this fan, unless you can put up with noise it will make on high speed.  Also, if it has green lights(like my blizzard fan did), it will light up a dark room at night. Also, you will see the fan shadow on your ceiling.  Low speed is quiet enough for sleeping, but high will disturb you. The angle tilt adjustments are not precise, and are difficult to do.  There are better choices</review_text>
The unit has nice, large digits, but the wireless sensors don't work consistantly.  The system works for perhaps 3 days and then the wireless link goes down.  We have to remove the remote sensor batteries and reinstall them for the link to be re-established</review_text>
This is the worst pan I have ever had.  We love mini muffins and have had Wilton and other pans.  They are hard to clean so I thought I would buy this one and cleaning would be a snap.1st.  The silicone smell was horrible.2nd.  The pan warped in oven.  I used the sled it came with and followed directions3rd.  I washed in hot soapy water 3 times and still muffin residue4th.  The muffins did not come out.  I used spray I waited until cool and still they stuck.I will never buy silicone anything.  Don't waiste your money</review_text>
Being lost without a timer for everything!, I purchased this to replace one that jumped into the dishpan......  Having a clock and the ability to time three events at once are great features, but the alarm is too soft. I have hearing problems, but even at a distance to 12-15 inches, the alarm is easy to miss.  Even my sharp eared children agree.  I wish I had read the reviews before purchasing.... a lesson learned for me.</review_text>
Reasons:1. Faulty battery cover design.  The battery cover comes off time I remove the timer from a metal surface.2. The protective glass is cloudy - making the timer numbers hard to see.3. The alarms are not very audible.4. The magnet "unglued" itself within the first three days of use</review_text>
First item came with the LCD display scratched UNDER the protective film from the factory.  Yes from the factory.  Put a battery and it ran for exactly 15 seconds and died.  Tried a new battery, different brand etc.  Yup, dead.  Don't buy this thing, I've never seen worse quality in my life</review_text>
The temperature settings for the alarm are preset and cannot be manually changed.  So if you cook your food using the alarm, you can over cook it, horribly over cook it, or turn it into a cinder</review_text>
It was kinda hard to use and after about 6 months it just stopped even though I always kept it charged. Since this is the type of product youmight take camping I don't recommend it because it's not reliable.I used it once or sometimes twice a day....no more so I really thinkit should have lasted longer</review_text>
I bought this aquarium for my son for his birthday last summer and thought it was great... that is until it started leaking about 4 months after I bought it.  Giving the benefit of the doubt, and thinking the leak was a QA issue rather than a design issue, I managed to exchange it for the exact same model.Well it's been 4 months since I got the new one, and this morning what did I notice?  Yup, a leak. The tank was full yesterday and this morning it's 2/3's full, with a pool of water on the table that holds it.  Luckily, no damage was done to the floor either time.I understand there are sometimes manufacturing issues with a product now and then,  but when the same leak occurs in the same product after the same length of time, well then, it's just a cruddy product.Stay away from this aquarium</review_text>
The only european characteristic of this cup is it's price.  The picture is deceiving - this thing is tiny. I could only put three of my fingers through it's ear.  I am definitely returning it to Amazon - in my mind, it's worth 5 bucks and is more of a for a kid than an adult.</review_text>
We travel in third world countries and ordered this to provide a little more security while we're sleeping.  The materials used in this lock are just too flimsy to inspire much confidence.  The main body is plastic.  The metal bar which fits into the door jamb is thin and flexible so easily bends out of the way when pressure is put on the door.  The serrations on the bar are not deep, so don't promise much strength.  While none of these locks can be expected to withstand someone trying to kick the door in, this one, while prettily-designed is overly expensive and unimpressive. We're going to try a few others.By the way, in returning this item, which we consider unsatisfactory, Amazon will charge us doubly:  the cost to return the item to Amazon and also charge us for what we originally saved with our "Super Saver" shipping.  The end result is far from the full refund other merchants offer</review_text>
The Rubbermaid Chrome Dish Drainer arrived in a timely fashion.  However, the utensil holder was not included.  I promptly contacted the seller by email.  Their representative apologized profusely in her response and assured me that the utensil holder would arrive promptly.  Two weeks later, I did not have a utensil holder and I had received no further communication from the company.  I plan to return the item and dispute the charge on my credit card.  I also have found the same item under a different brand name for a cheaper price at Bed, Bath and Beyond</review_text>
It makes great tea, but the pitchers last about 4 to 6 months before the seam on the front cracks and starts to leak. It would be great if a quality replacement pitcher was available. Then I would give it 5 stars</review_text>
I know this is supposed to be a waterproof thermometer, but my wife ran it under the faucet to clean it and the screen fogged up inside. I took out the battery and found water in the compartment.I give it as many as two stars because until the water got in, it did work as advertised. And seeing that other people have had no problem with the waterproofing, I'm wondering if I just had a bad o-ring.Now, I'm off to find a better thermometer</review_text>
i hated these shakers. i got them as a gift and 1. they are too big and take up too much space and 2. the rubber stoppers were not a tight fit so the salt and pepper was always leaking out the bottom and 3. the holes in the top are too big and too much comes out at once. finally one broke and i was thrilled to toss them out. the other, smaller fiesta ware ones -- the round ones -- are much much better</review_text>
Not functional, bought it as a gift and could not give it after looking at it and trying to put a roll of paper towels on it.  Impossible to use -the rod and rod top and base are not aligned properly nor made properly. Also, it came in a box that was damaged and taped together (not the shipping box, the Polder box that the product comes in)...looks like someone returned it previously (probably for the same reasons) and it was then sent to me.  I still have it because I was not able to return it within the 30 days alloted. Time to throw it out - waste of money</review_text>
I have owned a Roomba for several years, and have been very pleased with its performance, so I was very excited to purchase the Scooba.  However, it has been the worst purchase that I ever made.  The first one that I received would quit working every time it bumped into furniture or the wall.  iRobt did send a replacement, but it only works about half of the time.  The other half of the time, it does not vacuum up the dirty water, so it leaves the floor dirtier than before I "cleaned" it.  I have contacted iRobot for help, but none of their suggestions have worked.  Honestly, I would throw it in the trash if it did not cost so much</review_text>
I only used the cup 4 times before my trying to get the lid back on (not exactly easy because of push on design versus screw on), caused the inner lid seal to break. The lid is now worthless and needs to be replaced.Now I have to deal with seeing if Amazon will help me replace the unit, even though I already sent the packaging to the recycler a week or so ago.I would not recommend anyone purchasing this unit, due to the lid issue and other points made in the other comments herein</review_text>
I have nice sharp blades... I sliced veggies, and got all these tiny little plastic "hairs" that the cutting mat gave off as I sliced it up along with my veggies.  Had to toss them.  These mats are fine if you want to use them to knead dough, or any other purpose other than for what they are made for... chopping and slicing with knives or other sharp objects. For the price it was worth testing them out.</review_text>
Bought this knife set 3 months ago. It was beautiful with unique patterns on the blade and very sharp. But within few days we noticed it rusts very quickly. We left a knife in the sink in the morning after breakfast, by the time we came home for dinner the knife had several rust spots. We had to use Barkeeper's friend to clean all the rust out. We've tried to clean and dry the knives immediatly after every use - real pain in the #*@ - but once in a while one will be forgotten for couple hours and then rust immediatly forms. Once, when someone else was helping clean up, one went into the dishwasher. It didn't only have rust all over but the blade edge rusted away! Now the knife has jagged edge!!! I guess if I grind down the knife about 1mm I'll have a full edge again but I didn't expect this from top-of-the-line knives. Will not buy this brand of knives anymore</review_text>
When I opened the product, the sheets really were soft. But when you're laying on them, they aren't very comfortable.  I wouldn't buy another set again. But they were cheap, so not a horrible buy</review_text>
I knew when I purchased these sheets for only 13 dollars they weren't going to be great, but really these are ridiculous.  They are incredibly  thin sheets and they pill easily.  They also do not stay on my mattress, I am constantly having to put them back on.  I will not purchase these sheets again</review_text>
Not the best sheet experience. My legs broke out in a rash. Best to wash before using, I guess. The thread count is a bit lacking, too. For microfiber sheets, I want a cloud-like surface. I will go for a higher priced item next time</review_text>
I purchased the F69204 for $150 on sale. Used once that year with good results. It was another year before I tried to use again. Shortly after starting the motor, it froze up and quit. On disassembly I found that roller bearings are not used in the motor, instead an oil soaked felt type bearing that failed. The parts book said you could order the motor alone,but when I attempted this I was told you had to order the complete motorizing unit for a cost of $90 plus shipping. In the future I will stick with the cheaper middle grade units that I have had excellent results with and are cheap enough to discard and buy an new one if they fail</review_text>
This juicer is extremely heavy, made of industrial type metal parts, but it's poorly machined and assembled.  The heavy parts don't fit together well, and the juicer is wobbly and unstable, despite it's heaviness.  I am sending this back without using it once, becuase there's no way to adjust the parts, and it's too unstable to use as is.  Also, it really is almost impossible to pick up and move, due to the weight, without straining your back.  Finally, like a reviewer of the orange-x large-size juicer, I find the industrial chemical smell of the parts unpleasant, and the enamel paint is chipped and scratched in many places.  It seem like the kind of company where to get a good product, you'd have to go to a store and look through several boxes to try to find an undamaged one</review_text>
HOOVER HAS A KNOWN PROBLEM WITH THE BELTS STRETCHING OUT ON ALL THE SELF PROPELLED VACUUMS, BUT WIL DO NOTHING FOR CUSTOMERS STUCK WITH THEM! WE MUST REPLACE THE DRIVE AND PROPEL BELTS EVERY COUPLE OF MONTHS. REDICULOUS POOR CUSTOMER SERVIC</review_text>
Saw the other review and had to share my similar experience. The glue is still not off of my pan after hours and hours of scrubbing. It's now spread out a bit into a larger dark grey spot surrounded by steel wool scrapings. I have to return it because I know will get angry every time I pull it out of the cupboard and see the mess</review_text>
The manufacturers of the this pan have the most wonderful glue to stick a label to the surface of the pan.  It took me 2 hours to get all the glue off the pan.  The pan comes sealed in plastic so there is NO need to glue the label to the pan with some space age adhesive.  I had to use laquer thinner and steel wool to scrub the glue off.  Now I have 2 brand new jelly roll pans that each have 2 scraped up spots on each pan.  Think twice before you purchase this pan</review_text>
after just 7 months. So be aware that you might buy into some hassle by exchanging the knifes with Henckels. I am very dissappointed and will not spend that much money ($80) on knifes ever again, at least not on Henckels. My K-mart knifes hold up better</review_text>
People cliam this fan is quiet, it's not quiet.I wanted a fan that will circulate the bedroom air during the night, it's too loud and keeps me awake</review_text>
If I could give half a star I would.I had this unit for exactly 93 days and it just wouldnt turn on one day.I used it less than 3 times a week. There are several drawbacks to this unit. It draws ALOT of electricity to run it. I could use the same socket to run anything else while this on. Water gurgles/spits out of the spout while its boiling and I have gotten burned. The spout is also poorly designed, the water doesn't come out in an even stream, it goes where it chooses and even out of the seam of the lid. The heating element is exposed inside the pot and makes it almost impossible to properly clean. The water does get really hot in a short amount of time but its not worth it.I just bought the Braun WK200B about a week ago. It is everything this kettle isn't and so much more. Read the reviews on that one before you buy this one. Its a better choice all around. Save the shipping costs, time & headache, just buy the Braun first and pass this one up.</review_text>
The other commentators stress features of this kettle that pretty much any cordless electric kettle will have.  It pales in comparison to my old Hamilton Beach, however, in several respects.  Well, really, one big one.  It's a plastic object.  And it gets very hot.  Too hot.  Hot enough that it smells like it's melting itself.  I got this as a gift, rinsed it thorougly, boiled a pot just to clean it - and it stunk like melted plastic.  Ran it again to try and get the smell out.  Same thing.  Rinsed it with cold water and tried again - still melted odor.  The outside of the kettle near the heating element was very hot even after it shut off (a problem I didn't have with my previous kettle, which I lost in a move), and when I touched it a melted plastic film tacked on to my finger.  You can bet I put this right in the mail back to Amazon.  I normally would hesitate to return a gift, but I'd rather the person have his money back than this thing sit on my counter collecting dust</review_text>
Why oh why did I buy this useless thing?  I have a perfectly good Cuisipro mesh 13-inch screen, which does what it is supposed to do, namely reduce the spray of grease spewing onto the burners, walls, and floor.  Is it perfect?  No. But it definitely does most of the job, which is what I can't say about the Tovolo.  It has three fatal flaws.  First, the working end of the detachable metal handle is proportionally too small to securely and safely leverage the screen off. I had to use  one hand to steady the metal edge of the lid--hot hot hot--as I tried to wedge the handle under the screen's lip with my other hand.  Second, count the number of air holes in the silicone screen.  Then, count the holes in the metal mesh of the Cuisipro, or its ilk.  The purpose of a screen is to catch the grease, and this is the important part, to allow the steam to escape, otherwise the water vapor condenses back onto the food.  I first tried using the Tovolo to saute ground beef.  The beef began to stew in the water dripping from the surface of the screen.  Third, too much grease escapes around the edge of the screen because the metal rim bows from the heat.  In all fairness, the mesh type bows also, but not as much, possibly because the edge is thin and more pliable.This product, imo, is just one more silicone kitchen gadget that does not work as well as the metal version. Save your money and buy the old fashioned kind.</review_text>
We bought this Krups FLF2-J4 with anticipation of and excelent machine for our needs. It is a nice looking unit light weight and fast at heating a full load of water. However, an odor  is created in the unit and after two weeks of usage it still remains. It hadn't diminished during that time. It smells like burnt plastic and it transfers that to the water for our tea or fresh ground coffee. Not pleasant.  We felt it just wasn't safe. I've repacked it and will return it if possible.  Krups know of this as they mentioned it in their manual.</review_text>
I have used a lightweight Hoover for years and was very pleased with it.  When I first received this new cleaner I was really excited with the power it had.  The third time I used it the belt broke.  With each use, my back would start hurting. The forward motion was very easy, but pulling it back was hard.  I returned this product because I felt there was something wrong with it</review_text>
I bought this underwater lighting system with four laser beams and when i installed it one of the beams came defective and didn't lit on; i didn't matter because they look beautiful underwater...    one week later i noticed that another light went off and two days later the other two shutdown too; i replaced the beams but they stop working days later. it's my opinion that this is the worst product you can buy to your aquarium. (unless you only want to use it for one or two weeks)</review_text>
We ordered 2 of these wafflemakers.One for a present for my daughter in college. It never worked from day one. The second one worked for 2 months then quit heating up. Calls to villaware company resulted in them telling us to "ship them back". Shipping costs would have been above $30.00..Then what if new ones don't work...do I pay to ship those back too? Don't waste your money on these.Yes, when they work they make great waffles,but only WHEN they work...</review_text>
I bought this belgiam waffle maker 30 days ago.  It worked fine for 30 days and then the iron stopped heating up.  I contacted Villaware and they suggested getting Amazon.com to replace the unit which they did.  Time will tell on the replacement</review_text>
I got these sheets and was very pleased with them at first. After a couple of days I observed color sticking to everything around. The worst, it painted my matress in RED color!! I tried my best to remove the color but it wont go away. Now I found the best place for these sheets - in the attic</review_text>
These are more like 200-250 thread count. Soft at first, but after a couple of washings, they feel rough, loose their shape, and wrinkle easily. I purchased several different colors in twin and king sizes and all have been a disappointment.</review_text>
Okay - there's something wrong with Brita filters. They don't always fit into the pitchers - when I tilt the pitcher I can hear the filter shifting inside - and yes, I am aligning it properly. It may filter out impurities contained in the tap water, but only to replace them with thick black carbon particles. I've followed all the instructions and replace the filters every second month, but darned if there isn't a problem with every single one! Don't buy this - look for another alternative</review_text>
I ordered this product based on the reviews that were available at the time. I was sorely disappointed. There is no measuring cup, so all water amounts must be estimated (the unit has three "lines" to help, but nothing that denotes how much water to use if you wish to cook a specific number of eggs); there is no buzzer when the unit is finished, so unless you babysit it, everything ends up overcooking. This is a great unit to avoid purchasing unless you plan to always cook 8 eggs at a time and want them all hardboiled</review_text>
I returned Eureka 437AZ back to AMAZON. I was very dissapointed when I've tried to vacuum my room. The vacuum is powerful but flow of air comming from the front blower is so strong that it disperses dust all over and prevents proper vacuuming. In the Cosumers Report Eureka 431 green vacuum cleaner is not recommended model and now I know that these two vacuums are practically identical, the only difference being color and HEPA filter. Another downside of this vacuum is that the dust acumulates over the filter which then is difficult to clean.</review_text>
My pump just up and quit after several years...and it didn't always work great, but when it did, it was ideal.So I'll replace it, but with some other product, not the Cuisipro again.</review_text>
My last one (same model) was good.  This one, the auto shut-off just buzzes and doesn't shut off</review_text>
A couple of days ago I depressed the switch to begin toasting a piece of sliced bread, when all at once a blue flash jumped out at me, thus causing the demise of my applicance. I now realize I paid far too much for this unsafe piece of junk that lasted about two weeks short of a year</review_text>
My steamer worked well for all of 5 mins.  The pole went from upright to a 45 degree angle without hanging anything on it and would not straighten out; the defect appeared to be at the connection where the pole screws into the machine.  Then within minutes I had water all over my hardwood floors. I had the same problem as other reviewers, the water tank kept leaking.  So off to the returns department we went.  I guess it steamed well for the five minutes that it worked? Not worth all the mess and hassle of returning it.</review_text>
Drip, drip, drip. One drip at a time. It takes 20 minutes to fill a pasta pot. We've had it 3 years (it never worked any faster than this) and sometimes I'm just tempted to just use the tap water and not worry about lead poisoning from the pipes</review_text>
The Amazon product picture makes these trays look like they produce square cubes and will, therefore, rest upon each other without spilling.HOWEVER, the product one actually receives from BIC Superstore are trays that produce longer, comma-shaped ice; and the trays themselves do not rest on each other at all.  The bottom of one tray freezes into the ice of the next, so you get a frozen block of ice and trays, all stuck to each other and impossible to crack apart without hot water.These trays are a big mess.  They don't nest without spilling!  And don't be fooled by the "-" and "+" signs on the end of the trays, no matter how you stack them, they won't stack without spilling!  Also, BIC doesn't share Amazon's helpful return policy, so BUYER BEWARE!!</review_text>
I have sold a number of this style timer made by KitchenAid in Pink , Black and White. Almost every buyer complained. All complaints were that the ring is not loud enough to hear if you are in another room, have a fan on or are listening to the TV or radio. Replacing the battery does not remedy the problem either. If you want a kitchenaid timer invest in one of the Red, Black, Blue, White or Tangerine ones that are entitled Digital timer with rotating dial - no one has any complaints over this style of KitchenAid timers.</review_text>
Just recently purchased the Thermometer and the clip does not hold the theremometer in place.  Paid $6.50 for item and $6.34 for shipping and was very displeased/upset with quality of the item. I thought the clip would hold the thermometer in the upright position so you could move the frothing cup in circular motion.  Thermometer falls over due to clip not tight enough on thermometer shaft.</review_text>
I bought this to make meaty stews with rice for my dogs.  It works for a while then stops working, or just goes on warm.  They replaced it three times--everytime it went out.  This seems to be common with cheap rice cookers--see the reviews on the RIVAL RCS 200, they all go out within days or weeks!  I guess Black and Decker and Rival used the same Chinaman to design these useless things.  I can't understand why Amazon et al are still selling these when obviously they do NOT work.  The companies will replace them but all replacements go out immediately. In frustration I bought the Aroma 60-cupper for $125--and after two months that also went out.  Any suggestions on a 20-cup rice cooker with longevity would be appreciated</review_text>
It did the job til it became defective.  After a year of light use (avg 3 times a week), three of the most important buttons stopped working: the start button, power level button and minute plus button.  Now the only way we can get it to heat anything is to use the popcorn button.</review_text>
I ordered this kettle specifically to avoid heating up water in plastic. However, this  kettle emitted a foul chemical odor that also transferred to the water. I boiled it a few times plus tried the water/vinegar suggestion in the brochure but nothing seemed to help. I decided that I didn't want to take the risk of drinking these unknown chemicals so I'm returning it - it's not worth the risk. I can't figure out if it's coming from the "stainless steel" bulb  (that feels like plastic to me if you tap on it) that covers the heating element or the plastic seal between the glass & the bulb. Plus the lid has a stong odor too & that is plastic covered in "stainless steel"</review_text>
Until a week ago, I'd have given this coffee maker four stars because it has brew-strength control.  Last week, though, the clock face turned entirely black and this morning the unit completely malfunctioned. The shut off alarm sounded after only an hour but when I went into the kitchen to salvage the last of the coffee, I discovered the unit was still on.  Draining the pot, I attempted to shut the unit off manually and it kept coming back on. I finally got it shut off and 10 minutes later it turned itself back on again. After unplugging it, the unit went into the trash. I strongly suspect steam was able to get into the mechanism causing the electronics to short circuit. Obviously, it is a fatal design flaw--or a clever ploy to force people to buy more coffee makers. In all, it lasted about eight months</review_text>
Had somewhat higher expectations, given that this was a Lennox. Got the shaker home. tried it out, IT LEAKS. No matter how hard you hold the darn thing together, it leaks. I am a materials engineer so I gave the product a more than cursory examination. VERY, VERY POOR QUALITY.  Also Made in China (if that has anything to do with quality ... hint hint wink wink) DO NOT BUY</review_text>
Thank gawd I didn't purchase this product! My landlord has it in my apartment and I have to hang dry everything because it doesn't dry clothes at all!!  Sometimes it doesn't even wash! Go to Sears and do proper research on a washing machine!</review_text>
I purchased this product in November 2003 and still have not had it installed. The customer service is horrible. I had questions and had a very difficult time finding a service company who knew anything about this Haier machine. I called customer service over five times and had to have corporate refer me to a company in Indiana. Nobody I knew has had a combo, and it has been frustrating dealing with the company. I also did not know I could not return this product. I honestly regret getting this machine; it is pricey and not worth it. I was looking forward to the space saving option, but I rather have no machine than face the hassles and headaches. I read a few negative reviews and do not look forward to the troubles ahead.</review_text>
Unfortunately, there is no option for 0 star.  I had the same problem as Lana from NC.  I ordered the product, and when I opened the box, I found that I received only the bottom piece.  When I asked if the remaining pieces could be shipped, I was told that partial products are not shipped and that I would have to get an entirely new order.  Fine, other than I have to go through the hassle of waiting in line at the post office to return the wrong one.  Except, if they don't ship partial products, then why did I receive a partial product to begin with?  I received the second, mind you the replacement order, and the same exact thing happened - I received only the bottom piece.  So now I have to shlep both packages to the post office and waste my time for their error.  I suggest doing a search of metrokane cocktail shaker and you will find a couple other sites selling the same product.  One site even has 2 different sizes if anyone is looking for a smaller shaker</review_text>
The only good thing which occurred when I bought this item from Amazon was it arrived with in two days.  I was quite disappointed when I opened the package only to find it was a typical pop-up hamper I could have bought anywhere in a store thus in the long run I ended up paying more for it.  I wanted to buy a pop-up hamper with a lid that you can zip it to stay closed.  This hamper lacks a lid so I reccomend if you're looking for the same thing not to buy it.  If I had known it lacked a lid I would not have purchased the hamper.  It's partially my own fault for not doing enough research about the product.  I gave it two stars because it's still functional and sturdy</review_text>
This hamper is okay, but Amazon was very irresposible in how they shipped it.  I ordered four, and all four shipped the same day from the same warehouse.  How did they arrive?  In four giant shipping boxes; each one contained one hamper and about 3 cubic feet of air filled plastic bags!  It took me 20 minutes just to break down the boxes and the plastic bags.  I live in the city where recycling and trash space is scarce, and this really an insult to me and to the environment.  There is nothing fragile about a compressed laundry hamper.  According to the packing list, the shipping cost on each was $6, which means that due to Supersaver, Amazon was skinning their shareholders to the tune of $5 per hamper.  Amazon, shame on you, you could have shipped all four in a large envelope!</review_text>
Worked just fine for over a year, then started behaving very oddly.Among the various problems this TOB-30BC unit exhibited, the most dangerous was switching itself on even when the main control was set to off, not switching itself off at the end of a toasting cycle, sending alarms when switched off, not being able to switch the unit off!  This unit neds to be unplugged from the outlet and I consider it to be a fire hazard.  Repeated communications to Cuisinart remain unanswered.</review_text>
My wife got this Cuisinart Classic Toaster oven as a wedding gift. We liked the appearance and had it on our registry. We used this toaster oven a lot because it cooked very well. Toast was perfect, and the oven cooked nice and hot. We broiled meats and made all kind of things in it. We found it hard to clean. We would take the baking pan/and crumb tray and use our regular self cleaning oven to clean those, but it would take a lot of scrubbing to clean the glass and interior of the oven.Then after about 1 year one of the plastic feet broke off when simply adjusting the position of the oven on the counter. I glued it back on with super glue. It broke again and seemed to become more brittle over time because of the heat so I had to fix this plastic foot a few times.Then another problem arose. The toaster and the one light would shut off a few second after pressing start. So to make toast we just used the un-timed bake function, but then we would have to watch so we did not burn the toast. Still we lived with it.Then after about another four months all of the controls stopped working. So it does not bake. I think I knew this was going to happen because I would hear a strange buzz and see a little smoke come off when ever I turned the dial to bake for a while.So therefore I think the electrical wiring was not heavy duty enough or the electrical system was not soldered well or protected well enough to last. I would have expected better quality. Considering how long we have been making toaster ovens, I think that it would have not been too hard for them to have made a more heavy duty electrical system for the controls.So like other reviews say, it does cook well and evenly, but it is hard to clean and does not last. If I were to have rated the product before the problems started I would have given it 4 stars. I wish that Amazon and these sites had a section for long term reviews that would rate the quality, because most of the reviews seem to be written soon after receiving the products.We are now looking into T-Fall Convection Toaster oven, but after reading those reviews we do not know if it cooks as hot as this oven and we want to get one that cooks well and lasts.______________Since writing my review above I tried to fix my oven to no avail, but I have gained more insight into its design and perhaps why it broke.My recommendations are as follows. Since I know that the rotary controls and the circuit board of this "Classic" model product can over time get dirty and stop working, I recommend that people who own this oven keep it far away from any other cooking products that create grease or steam such as range tops, rice cookers, deep fryers, pressure cookers, or kitchen sinks. Especially keep the vents near the controls on the right side of this unit away from these sources of moisture and grease.I recommend consumers to consider the newer models with digital controls, which might have a different mechanism inside or the models with the controls beneath and therefore the electrical components and cooling vents underneath the oven and not in an exposed location. This might make the unit last longer.The newer Cuisinart models with the knobs or digital controls beneath the oven might be a design improvement to correct the sort of problem I had. Or perhaps other manufactures have solved electrical component problem other ways. Maybe 1.5 years is average life, or maybe the fact that my oven was placed near the cooking range in my kitchen made my unit more susceptible to malfunction. Reviews of lots of other brand models show short life spans for these products. From the reviews and my observations above, I think the Krups models and the improved Cuisinart models might last a longer time than this classic model that died on me.</review_text>
I really made a mistake and bought 2 sets, thinking I could always have extras ready.  I tried all types of grinds, I packed loosely, I packed firmly, I packed tight, I played and played. Still did not get a good cup of coffee.  Finally, threw them out.  Just taking up space.  Learned a lesson on buying quantity</review_text>
I have explored a number of different ways to use my own grind of coffee in the Senseo Coffeemaker.  Folding filter paper didn't work....too much water goes by the filter making a week cup of coffee....The Quick-Cup sounded like a good idea....but it doesn't fit the holder tightly enough and too much water goes around the filter to get a good cup of coffee.  I found that the Eco-Pad fits tightly into the two cup holder and it works well.  The key to any of these re-usable pods is that water cannot be allowed to go around the filter.  The pressurized hot water must be forced through the coffee.The Quick-Cup and the Eco-Pad are essentially the same design but the Eco-Pad fits the holder correctly and the Quick-Cup is slightly small.  Buy the Eco-Pad, it works.  The Quick-Cup would work if you could rig a small rubber band seal between the Quick-Cup and the holder...a gasket, to prevent the water from going around.   Good Luck</review_text>
I purchased this blanket for $30 from Amazon after reading the same reviews I see now.  The negative comment about it being too light weight sounds fake after I saw the blanket and found that it weighted more than I expected from the review.  The real issue is that the quality is very poor.  I returned it and got a $30 blanket from Target and found the quality much better.    Luxuious Egyption cotton--no way.</review_text>
The decanter's pretty, the wine topper is okay. However, the picture is misleading.  These two items are clearly not meant to be paired.  The topper does not fit.... must have been very carefully balanced for the photo, but it sure won't stay that way.  The topper is made for a bottled wine, not a decanter.</review_text>
My girlfriend just bought this couch from amazon. This is by visiondecor furniture. First it shows up on the curbside in pieces. Did you ever hear of a couch in pieces and that you actually have to put it together? This is not including the cushions. The material is loose and very cheap looking and the frame is flimsy. I don't know if it will last a year. IKEA furniture is actually better quality. Paid around $550 with shipping, if she would have spent another $200 she would have a great quality couch from one of the local furniture stores in Los Angeles. She is very disappointed and wants to cry. Sad, very sad...</review_text>
Packaged with four left legs (requires two left, two right)One briquette grate is smaller than the other and falls to bottom as a result.Had to drill / elongate hole to install grate support bracketPaint on handles started to run when I handled them with wet hands. I tried to rinse off the remaining paint or ink under running water so that it will not continue to bleed off. What paint do you know of that rinses off under plain water?Right cast iron grate cracked when it came in contact with heat.The design and construction of this product shows clear disregard for the consumer and is absolutely unacceptable at any price. I have to question at this point weather or not the paint used on the grill and grates is toxic or lead based. I've come across my share of junk but this is really bad!</review_text>
Seriously, for as good as their mixers are, their knives are really, really disappointing.  Flimsy, dull, easily bent and broken.  Within the first week of use, our paring knife bent a full 90 degrees at the tip and needed regular re-straightening before it eventually broke off altogether a couple months later.  The steak knives are now following suit, and the handle of the chef's knife has completely seperated from the blade.  Gah!  Don't waste your money</review_text>
We ordered an 8 inch quiche pan.When it arrived, the Nordic 8 inch pan turned out to be 9 inches.  A 9 inch quiche pan can be bought at any local store.  I went on line to find a hard-to-locate item.  AND when I ordered this item it was not in stock so I waited almost a month for delivery and it is NOT AS DESCRIBED  I was deceived by the web advertisement.  UNFORTUNATELY, Amazon hides the merchants name in the billing arrangement so I cannot review the merchant</review_text>
The written description of this heater led me to believe that it would perform like the 2 5-yr-old Vornado models that are the best electric heaters I've ever had.  The VH2 has major flaws.  It's single fan speed is way too fast, causing heated air to be cool/cold within 10 ft of the heater.  The fan cannot be slowed down.  The thermostat causes the fan to stop and start in ridiculously short intervals; thereby wasting energy I believe.  Finally, the thermostat is set so that when at the highest (hottest) setting it doesn't allow the heater to bring even the immediate area around it to more than 70 degrees F.I've had the heater &lt;1 mo and will attempt to return it for a full refund in another wk or 2 as soon as I have an alternative brand in my home</review_text>
too expensive, too little heat, unit quit after a year of intermittent use - I won't buy Vornado again.</review_text>
Get a couple of good hones instead and learn to use them. I got one of these a couple of years ago. I figured I would now enter "easy sharp knife heaven", but it ruined all my knives. They are sharp, but only kind of sharp. It ground the bevels to flat and I never managed to get anything that was remotely razor sharp, and trust me, I have tried. Anyhone who says razor sharp, doesn't really mean razor razor sharp or may never have seen a really sharp knife. If it isn't as sharp as that scalpel you used in biology class, it is not razor sharp.I recently bought the book Razor Edge sharpening, and a couple of Razor Edge hones and hand reground all the knives I had ruined (doesn't take long if you do it right, even form a destroyed edge). Now I finally have the ultra scalpel sharp knives I always wanted. So sharp it is almost scary. Good hones aren't cheap either, but you can use them for your other tools too, like chisels, etc</review_text>
I ordered this item and received several notices postponing its delivery.  Eventually, I cancelled my order because more than a month has gone by, and still, no table and chairs</review_text>
Somehow I stumbled onto this item while searching for "quiet" and "fan". Now that I review the item description I don't see any mention of  "quiet". Oops.The fan's primary flaw is that it only has two speeds, both of which are insanely high. I don't need such a mighty wind to just take the edge off of my over-heated workspace. A gentle breeze would be great. Instead I have a choice between either a hurricane or a tornado.On the bright side, perhaps this product will bring about a resurgence of interest in the paper weight. And then, one day, frustrated over my choices between a sweltering office or a deafeningly loud fan, I can grab my largest paper weight and use it to break a window, thereby cooling the office naturally. Everyone wins!Also, while the fan looks identical to the Holmes fan pictured, it is branded as a "Westpointe". Really. "Westpointe" with two "e"s</review_text>
This is not and I repeat is not a good alarm. There is one alarm light and you can hardly tell which one is sounding. It looks as if the specs are lying to me and I hate lies. Also the battery died after 6-8 months. The low battery alert is loud and chirps so anoyingly. I also noticed that the alarm sounds a loud shrieking alarm when it sounds. I will return this alarm. Never again will I trust in First Alert</review_text>
This is a hollow ground blade (not flat ground) which does not cut straight.  The blade tends to want to rotate in the cut because of this.  Get a knife with a flat ground blade, not this one.  You can see the ground part at the bottom of the blade.  It is a cheaper way to make knives</review_text>
I have watched Emeril and perhaps others using this food processor and ending up with liquid all over the counter.  I just dismissed it as part of Emeril's shtick until I bought this machine for myself.  The first time I tried to use it with any liquid ingredients (making mayonnaise), it blew much of the liquid through the joint between the top and the bowl.  The top is just flawed in its design, as it would seem pretty obvious that the part of the top overlapping the side of the bowl should be on the inside rather than the outside of the bowl.  I suppose it had not occurred to me that anyone would design the top in the way that KA did, much less that such a design flaw would be overlooked in so many reviews (e. g. Consumer Reports and Cook's Illustrated).In any case, this machine is pretty much useless for wet ingredients and borderline for dry (they blow through the badly designed joint as well) unless you feel that wiping up a large part of your ingredients from the counter, the outside of the bowl, the bottom of the machine, and any items nearby is a reasonable thing to expect to do.  I will probably get rid of the machine in some way and go back to the Cuisinart I have had for some time as it is a much better design in this regard.</review_text>
I returned this--absolutely unusable. Could not keep bottle engaged WHILE pulling down the two rather unforgiving arms</review_text>
This is a very nice and soft blanket, the best out of all electric blanket.  However, I have to return 2x due to the malfunction controller.  After only 2 weeks of usage, one of the controller started blinking E and no heat at all.  Same problems twice!I can't recommend this item until the problem is fixed</review_text>
I received the sleepwarmer blanket last week and have been very disapointed--it is just not warm enough!!  Even on the highest setting it doesn't get warm enough initially.  It is fine for keeping warm during the night but I want to be able to turn it down to keep warm and have it pretty hot in the beginning and that is not at all what this does.  It is nice and soft but you can absolutely feel the wires as well.  Not worth the money at all</review_text>
This electric blanket has the nicest texture of the last "five" electric blankets we have purchased. However it stopped working within a month, like the other four. Who makes a realiable electric blanket? Not Sunbeam and not this brand. Since the texture on this one is nice, we can at least keep it as an extra cuddling blanket</review_text>
I can't figure out what is so special about this rice cookerso I am irritated by the price which is making me wonder iftheir whole product line is over priced</review_text>
It amazes me that this model is being sold here, since the product was recalled by the manufacturer.  A newer, safer model is offered for just $10 more by Vornado.Do your homework before you buy...</review_text>
I received this message direct from the ManufacturerThe DVH  is subject to our Heater Recall  that was announced last year Aug 3, 2004. and should be sent in and repaired before you use it again.If you still hold in your possession a Vornado DVH, EVH,  IntelliTemp or VH heater, we are most interested in having it sent to our factory to be serviced and the potentially defective part replaced. We are providing free shipping via FedEx both to us and back to the owner.To Register your product for free shipping and repair, you must call 1-888-221-5431.  You will need to know BOTH The Model  & Serial Number of the Heater ( which is only on the Bottom of the Heater itself) and also we will need the following information. Your Name, Street Address, City, State, Zip, Phone Number (with Area Code first).</review_text>
I was very disappointed with this cheese slicer--the wire broke after about the fourth use.  I have always had good experiences with Oxo and was very surprised.</review_text>
Works good except for with the Cappicuion pods they dont brew throughly. But makes great coffee</review_text>
Please do not buy they do not packge the refigerator right it comes with dents and parts are missing!!!!!!</review_text>
Was happy with this toaster until I had it for about 4 months.At that time the lever started acting up by not staying down.Sometimes it worked other times we had to prop something heavy on it to keep it down. Not what I expect from a $70 toaster. Well, I have finally given up (2 months later) and am sending it back to Hamilton Beach since too much time has passed to send it to Amazon. They are sending me a new one, which I am not sure I am happy about. Might just exchange it somewhere for a toaster-oven.........</review_text>
I had my first machine for 5 months - a gift from a friend. When it started to let steam out all over the place, I went out and bought another one. I thought I was just unlucky with the first one. It also only lasted 5 months like the first one. I cleaned it - vinegar etc... like the instructions said - no luck. Steam came from everywhere. It would not warm the milk anymore. I took it back. Never again.</review_text>
do not buy this.  the steamer stops working in a month and it cannot be fixed.  cleaning doesn't help at all, even after carefully following the instructions.  very cheap, no good</review_text>
There is a clear echo here, so to simply quote the experience of another reviewer, "after two months the steamer ceased to function properly and steam came out of the espresso head instead."Rather than paying to ship the unit to Krups myself---clearly, the company cannot afford to pay shipping on the thousands of these cheaply made units---I hauled the Krups FNP112-42 down to my workshop and found that the hose to the steamer had detached.Well, fixing that problem did not render the FNP112-42 usable, for now it simply exhaled steam in great plumes like a bull in a Bugs Bunny cartoon. Cleaning the unit per the directions from Krups did nothing whatsoever. Nor did shaking it robustly or inserting various instruments into the nonworking nozzles serve any purpose, but at least I felt a bit better.Turns out the only thing getting steamed was me. . .I'm going to buy a good espresso maker this year for Christmas and I can promise you that it will not have the word Krups emblazoned on it.</review_text>
As a Starbucks employee of almost 2 years at my college... I know how to brew espresso and properly make drinks.  My roommates got this for me as a Christmas present at the Field Days Sale so I could make coffee drinks for all of our late night study sessions.  After about 2 months of use... the steamer ceased to function properly and steam came out of the espresso head instead.  I contacted a service advisor at Krups' website and it turns out that I would have to ship the machine to the nearest service center in Illinois on my own dime.  No thank you!  I'll find something better</review_text>
Functionally, this product holds plenty of media in an easily accessible manner.  It is not attractive to look at however.  My walnut finish was closer to a cheap mahogany, there are multiple areas where the finish migrated along the seams and left areas with nearly no finish, the varnish is very high gloss, and the knobs are low-grade, mismatched junk.  I believe the build is solid, but only time will tell.Final word....pay the extra money for a hand-crafted cabinet where you can pick the finish and you can talk to the craftsman personally.  This just isn't worth $300</review_text>
I, too, received this item with chipped corners, scratches, and broken pieces. Unfortunately, the cost & hassle of shipping it back is not worth it, so we'll have to live with the damage.It's a nice-looking desk otherwise, but beware that the keyboard drawer does not fold down completely and may cause problems typing on the keyboard for long periods of time</review_text>
Check out Kmart.com they have the samething for 39.99 a $20 savings</review_text>
I ordered some replacement batteries and was told that they would be here last Wednesday.  It is now thursday of the next week.  I have emailed them and told them to email me or call me to let me know where my package is and to no affail, no call.  I will never order from Petsafe again!!</review_text>
I DO NOT THINK THAT THE BATTERIES WERE FRESH.  DOESN'T SEEM TO BOTHER MY DOG WHEN HE BARKS</review_text>
Great looking set if they could arrive here without being broken. Amazon, how can you continue to ship these out to customers when it is so obvious that the manufacturer doesn't pack them well enough for shipping?Amazon then simply throws that poorly packed box in an Amazon box with not enough cushion and away they go. Any rough handling at all resorts in the canisters banging each other and you end up with a broken box of ceramic. I've received two of those lovely surprises, the first set I ordered and the replacement set. Oh boy, I give up!The canisters are packed one inside the other with a thin piece of cardboard separating them. Just imagine the UPS guy throwing the box or even setting it down hard. THEY BREAK!Amazon is however good about issuing a credit or in attemting replacement (in this case) so it's like playing the lottery to see if you can get lucky and receive them without breakage. Are you feeling lucky??? If so then roll the dice</review_text>
I bought these because they matched my dishes.  I really wish I'd kept my old ones, even though they were black.  The size of these is nice for flour, sugar, etc.; however, the rubber seals in them aren't great.  The seal on my flour (biggest one) falls in every single time I take the lid off.  They're pretty, but not very functional</review_text>
Saw these canisters and fell in love with them. Couldn't wait to get them and when I did they were broken into a million pieces.  They replaced them very timely but one lid is almost too small and the seal doesn't fit properly.  Another lid fits so tight it takes two hands to get the lid off.  I was disppointed in the quality.  I wouldn't buy these again even if I had to buy something more expensive</review_text>
I bought this coffee maker and after only using it 6-10 times over the course of 13 months, it stopped working.  I called the number for service that was listed in the booklet and was told it can't be repaired & I should just throw it away!  I had already purchased nearly 100 pods and now those and the coffee maker are useless!  Buy one at you own risk</review_text>
This as a new and "improved" Zyliss press. It does not come with the plastic cleaner the older model used because it has a "nonstick" surface. It is very difficult to remove the peels left after pressing. The holes have to be cleaned individually with a small probe like a toothpick. Difficult and time consuming. I have sent multiple e-mails to Zyliss asking for cleaning suggestions. Zyliss does not respond.   The companies lack of interest in customer satisfaction is very informative. Don't buy their products</review_text>
I bought this fryer and used it twice.  The 3rd time I got the error message on the screen and could not get it to work, even hitting the reset button wouldn't get it going. I had to take it to an authorized dealer for repair and he got it working.  I used it one more time and it went out again. I took it back and two months later I received a new fryer in the mail.  The new one doesn't have the digital controls, it's back to the old fashion dial for temperature setting.  If you look on their web site this fryer is no longer there.  The one that they sent me is there instead of the Dual Zone.  When the fryer worked, it did a great job, however it didn't work very long.  I will be using my new one tonight to fry some fish and french fries.  My guess is that it will work as it should, since they got rid of that stupid Dual Zone control.</review_text>
We purchased the DeLonghi based on its ease of cleaning (4 of 5 parts can be placed in the dishwasher).  After the third use, the plastic part that holds the heating element in place MELTED off the base.  DeLonghi service was apologetic, and promised to send a replacement part ASAP, although the part was out of stock.  That was in September, almost 6 months ago.  Parts are still backordered!  I returned the unit to Lowes in frustration, got a new unit, and it too melted on the First use.  Returned it for credit.  Do not consider this unit.</review_text>
After reading countless poor reviews of the Dolce desk and hutch, I was quite skeptical about ordering it online. ... I gave in and ordered the set from target.com. The desk arrived in almost perfect condition (a few smudges in the stain); however, only half the hutch was in its box! The entire drawer (left side of hutch) was missing, the hardware was missing, and the assembly instructions were missing. ... I recommend calling your local Target store to check the Dolce collection's availability (and the parts inside!) before you waste the time and gas to get there. Aside from the missing hutch, the desk looks really great in my home office.</review_text>
These covers are not even close to being red.  The are wine or burgundy in color</review_text>
This pet chime was a good idea, but I am sending it back.  Sometimes the chime won't ring and at other times it rings on its own and worst of all it starts ringing and won't stop.  Clearly the manufacturer needs to work on quality control</review_text>
It stopped working 6 months after the warranty ran out.  According to Sanyo will cost more to fix than I paid.  While it lasted it worked fine.</review_text>
I returned the Honeywell 6011i humidifier because the product had 2 defects and the product was very poorly designed.The 6011i humidifier had 2 defects right out of the box.  The first was that the 6011i humidifier would not run on the High speed setting but did run on the low and medium speed settings.  The second defect was that the cap for one water container had no rubber o-ring seal and the water bottle leaked when upright in its normal operating position.  The fact that this 6011i humidifier had 2 defects says that the quality control for this product must be very low and implies this product suffers from an above average failure rate.The 6011i humidifier has major design defects that make it difficult to operate and maintain the 6011i humidifier.  The design defects are somajor that the person(s) that designed and approved the design of the6011i humidifier should be shot or at least fired!  The first major design defect is that the water bottles will not stand up by themselves in my sink.  Because of this I must hold the water containers vertically with my hand and still cannot completely fill the water container to the top.The screw-on caps for the water containers are so large they are difficult for my wife with small hands to screw on while holding the water container vertically upright.The next design defect is that one cannot at a glance check the water level in the water containers but must pick up the water containers and turn them over to check the water level in the container.  One can see if the water container is empty or nearly empty at a glance, but this is of no use if one wants to quickly see if there is enough water in the water containers to last until one returns home from work or will last through the night.The last design defect of the 6011i humidifier is that the water containers and humidifier fan housing do not just "drop into place" on the base.  One must use one hand as a guide for the water container and then still fiddle with the position/angle of the water container to get it to seat properly.  This is even more difficult if both water containers are removed for filling at the same time.I bought this 6011i humidifier to replace a Honeywell humidifier that finally failed after many years of faithful service.  I also selected the 6011i Humidifier because of its many desirable features.  However the positive product features were significantly outweighed by the poor quality control and the poor design of the 6011i Humidifier.  I believe   that a humidifier should be designed for usability first and esthetics second, not the other way around as is the case with the 6011i humidifier.  Thus I returned the 6011i humidifier</review_text>
I've had my vacuum for a few years now only b/c I'm too lazy to buy another one. However, I am at the end of my rope. From Day 1 of having this vacuum the belt broke frequently -- and most of the time I was vacuuming on hardwood. If I accidentally ran over a cat toy or piece of string or anything bigger than a crumb, the belt broke. I took to buying lots of extra belts whenever I went to the store. The other day - surprise - the belt broke for no apparent reason. I promptly replaced it and it broke again the minute I turned the vacuum on. I say: NO MORE. I am now determined to buy the best vacuum EVER. I don't care how much it costs!! The only nice thing about this vacuum is the ability to use to the hose/attachments without having to flip a switch; and it is pretty powerful. But that's it. Changing the cannister can be messy and like a few other reviewers, I frequently run over the cord. Something just wasn't designed right there... You've been warned</review_text>
I just purchased this vacuum this morning and vacuumed the entire house...and now I am afraid that I have to return it back to the store. It sucks wonderfully, don't get me wrong. The reason why it's got to be returned to Targetland is because of 1. the noise2. the `dust that flies out of the dust cup when you're emptying it.The noise is certainly the LOUDEST I've ever heard on a vacuum cleaner. But, I thought, hey, that's okay if you want to be noisy...until I ventured into cleaning the stairs. There's not much of an extension between the cleaning wand/brush and the actual machine, so while I was bending over to suck up hair and debris (what have you) from the stairs' carpet, I had the crazy noise blasting "turbo"-style directly into my ear. (This was done 15 minutes ago, and my ear still hurts).The other problem I've found with the vacuum is the point that while emptying the dust cup, I am having to actually touch dirt and dust (the entire outside of the cup is coated with it). While pouring the dirt into the trash can, a bit of dirt and dust fall onto the floor...nasty and what's the point in the dust cup if this happens? I had a Eureka Spin Brush vacuum contraption most recently (it died after 2 1/2 years) and I know from that experience that the dirt and dust should not be coating the cup, nor falling to the floor.So, alas, my friends, I must pack up this marvel and take it back to the store. Mayhaps, I'll have luck with a vacuum cleaner that uses bags (you know, the old-fashioned kind)</review_text>
The high-tech commercial cooking surface began to come off at the third use of this griddle.I don't know what Evenheat means in their product description, but this griddle has a hot spot on the left side.I'm in the market for a new griddle, but I won't buy anything labeled Broilking again</review_text>
I was excited about getting a cute timer that worked with the decor of my kitchen.  Unfortunately, the timer never worked on the product!  Now I am sad</review_text>
I ordered this timer and was excited this was stylish and red to match my kitchen.  This ended up being a nuisance purchase as I have to return it!  It ticks but the bell doesn't ring at the end.  Also, I was disappointed in it's packaging as well as the item itself.  It does not look upscale.  The plastic is not nice but cheap looking and the metal part is actually painted plastic.  If you are looking for a classy gift or decoartor item, look elsewhere!</review_text>
3 cups? I don't know where this teeny thing would equal that- not even 3 demitasse/espresso cups.Amazon really should make the 'See larger image' say 'See life size' (try it)... or better yet show something for scale- like 10 coffee beans- the amount it holds.So, I'm already kinda down on this Liliputian trinket and I check instructions to see if I can heat the water in the microwave- like I do with my other 'real size' French press (without the top).No, nothing saying that should be a problem...2 minutes later the rubber bottom mat is burning furiously in my microwave !I'd hope Hugo had a 'BonJour' because I certainly didn't..</review_text>
Was very disappointed in this comforter. While it is heavy like I had anticipated, it is not soft in any way shape or form, it is like newspaper, it crackles on the bed and makes noise all night long</review_text>
I bought this griddle under the impression that it was non-stick - it is everything but that.  I only cook with butter (no sprays), but that does not matter.  Even with butter the eggs stick every time.  Even pancakes stick.  This is the worst grill I have ever used</review_text>
I've own my X3 for about 2 years now and overall, it has been used to make one double espresso daily. So when it stopped working a month ago, I was heartbroken. Called FF, after some back and forth I sent the machine in for repair. The cost of repairing it is about $200, incl. the shipping. Add that to the $499 I paid for it and this turns out to be one very expensive machine.After several days of back and forth with customer service, I still don't know what exactly is not working in my machine. Apparently, there are 3 items that have failed, one being the thermostat, a washer and something else, that CS was unable to explain. I really liked the machine when it was working, so I gave it some serious thought of shelling for repair, but at the end decided against it - I rather purchase a new Rancilio Silvia.When I called the CS with me decision and asked them to send the machine back, I was told that on top of the $12 shipping there will be a $13 handling charge for packaging the machine. I refused to pay that and the rep turned outright nasty. Long story short, I finally got them to send the machine back with just a shipping charge, but that was one very unpleasant experience. It is a whole another issue what additional damage they might have done to my machine after the nasty fight I had with them.I really liked the X3 when it was working, and I would love to have it back, but it is just not cost effective at all. What is really confusing to me is that with the low usage my machine had and the maintenance I provided, it has 3 parts needing replacement - if this was a good quality machine, it should have worked a lot longer without any problems.</review_text>
I have purchased several espresso machines and sampled scores more, francis francis being my first.This machine is better than the 200 coffee maker labelled as "espresso" machines but marginally.If you are a serious espresso drinker you know that the quality and cutting of the bean and the quality of the machine are equally important.Focusing on the machine for a moment. You need a machine which extracts the coffee at just the right pressure without burning the coffee.A truly good espresso is characterized by a thick golden crema on the surface and almost syrup like consistency without a burnt aftertaste.This machine simply does not develop the pressure required to extract that golden crema from the coffee beans.The espresso extracted is thus poor in taste.If you are going to spend 600 usd on a machine shell out another thousand or so and get a good quality commercial machine by faemea or elecktra.You will need to compliment this with a commerical grinder for best results. The cheap pods really limit the different beans one can try and the  cutting of the beans are fixed</review_text>
The larger of the bowls was broken when I recieved it so it was not packet very well. I have used the smaller bowl and loved it.</review_text>
After a couple months, the humidity became stuck at 20%.  Even holding it by my humidifier didn't help</review_text>
I also have this fountian in black. I get a orange slime on my filter and the white residue on the slide part. I agree it is hard to tell if the fountain is dirty. The filters do not seem to last very long either. I have not even owned this for a year and the motor has broke. Now I am attempting to find a motor to replace this one. I do not reccommend this color at all! The fountian has been fine until now, but it shouldn't of broke down already</review_text>
Petmate makes a great fountain, but their black model should be discontinued.  It is impossible to tell if the water is clean by looking at it.  When I went to wash this fountain, like I usually do every couple of weeks, there was a purplish color slim growing by the pump and the charcoal filter was covered with it.  I think the pump motor might have been leaking (I'm not really sure). If I had their white fountain I would have noticed there was a problem with the water right away</review_text>
It is soft and feels sooooo good!!! BUT the Burgundy sheeds like a cat it is all over the floor, my hair, the red fur is every were!!! I only get one pillow cast and one sheet like  thing !!! I have 2(two) pillows please! in the photo it looks like two of every thing!! Help me here!!  where is the other one?</review_text>
FIRST OF ALL ADD WAS DECEIVING :Product DescriptionNew! Non-Slip Cascading Hangers Hang up to twelve shirts or blouses, eight skirts, and eight slacks in the same amount of space it takes to fit a single hanger! Store more clothes than ever imagined in your closet and free up essential drawer space. Use separately or hook together. Non-slip coating keeps clothes on the hanger and off the floor. Durable, chrome-plated. 12 Shirt Hangers 8 Skirt Hangers 8 Pant HangersTHE LAST SENTENCE MAKES YOU THINK THAT IS WHAT YOU ARE ORDERING.ALSO, VERY CHEAPLY MADE. 2 WERE BROKEN IN THE BOX, ONE BROKE WHILE HANGING SOMETHING UP. I ENDED UP SUPER GLUING THEM TOGETHER. I DID NOT WANT THE HASTLE OF SENDING THEM BACK. BEWARE OF THIS PRODUCT!!!</review_text>
The Skinny Grill Satin Black came in chestnut brown and brokken to pieces. Still waiting for some relief in terms of a credit. I feel like the guilty party ,even though all I did was give them my hard earned money and trust that they would deliver a product to me. So far...computer form replys!</review_text>
this unit is smaller than i was expecting; it is 11" tall and 5.5" in diameter.  i have it in our small bathroom at the moment because it was too small to affect the humidity level in the 120 square foot room i had originally put it in (i have a hygrometer in the room to measure its humidity and this unit did not affect the humidity level in 24 hours).  i doubt it is adequate for our tiny bathroom.  it seems like it might be adequate for a not-too-humid closet.  it says it removes 16oz. a day at 86 degrees Fahrenheit, but whose house it 86 degrees?  in our humid bathroom it  sucks up a mere third of an inch a day; i guess it performs better in a warmer space.</review_text>
I wanted a humidifier that was silent, but when I plugged this in, not only could I hear it from the other room, but it's a high-pitched whine. I don't know what to do about it. I think I'll probably just return it for something different</review_text>
I am looking for a remote trainer for one of my dogs. Amazon's listing says this Innotek trainer comes with a "lifetime warranty." I've read that batteries can be an issue with remote training collars, so I decided to review the owner's manual to learn more about the warranty.[...]The last page has a section entitled "Lifetime Limited Warranty," which states ". . . INNOTEK brand products will be free from defects in material and workmanship, under normal use, for a period of one year from the date of the original retail purchase."The "lifetime warranty" apparently expires after one year!Further on it says, the company "offers several product exchange options during the warranty period. . . . Costs are dependent on the processing time."This suggests customers will incur fees for warranty repairs even during the one year "lifetime" warranty.The next paragraph says "After one year from date of original retail purchase, we will repair, replace or upgrade your product at afixed rate based on the component."What will these repairs cost?This leaves me with a big question mark about buying a collar from Innotek.  What, if anything, is warranted for a "lifetime?"  If the lifetime warranty is really only for one year, why call it "lifetime?" And finally, what will repairs cost, both during warranty under their "product exchange options" and afterwards under their component-based "fixed rate?"My specific concern is that the collar contains a rechargeable battery. The manual does not indicate that this battery is user-replaceable. Does this mean the user will have to send the collar to Innotek to replace the battery and, if so, what will it cost?I have contacted Innotek through their website and will report back if I get a response. Until I do, I've got to rate this product with only one star because of the warranty.Can anyone comment on warranty claims to Innotek</review_text>
The add said it would seperate small berry seeds.  The holes on the smallest grate are about 1/8".  You could fit 20 seed through one of them.  Very disappointing</review_text>
I got these knives as a gift. Ironically, the first thing to rust was the part of each knife stamped "Stainless Steel".Let's be realistic. These knives are cheap. They're thin and they're not well weighted. However, they say stainless steel, and you figure that that's what you're getting. I hand-washed these knives and dried them immediately, but they still corroded.Now comes the bad part. I wrote to their customer service department twice and didn't hear back. I finally got their address (from the post office) and sent them back the knives. It took three months of me emailing and calling them (with 15+ minute wait times for Each Call) to get them to send me a replacement set.The replacement set rusted in about two weeks. That was in September. I just got off the phone with Miracle Blade, a call during which I was interrupted so many times that I actually had to say "I'm going to finish my sentence" so their rep would stop talking. They won't refund my money. In fact, they won't refund Anyone's money after 30 days. The lifetime warranty is for replacement only. They'll send me another set of soon-to-be-rusty knives, of course--if I pay the shipping and handling...Again. I asked the rep for his full name, for his ID#, and for a manager, and he refused all requests.In summary, if you buy these knives, they will rust. You will want to get rid of them. Your only option will be the garbage can</review_text>
I think this may be a great product, and is why I bought it. However, mine NEVER worked (and hence was never actually used, it was just taken out of the box!)The remote would beep the collar but not spray. Seller did have manufacturer send new batteries (which further delayed my getting a good response to this situation). New batteries arrived, item still didn't spray, but seller would only refer me to dealing directly with the manufacturer, to get a replacement, even though I responded within their advertised 30 day return policy. Please read seller information and return policies CAREFULLY! Even if you get them to take something back (only if never opened...if opened and doesn't work, they toss you to the manufacturer), there is a 25% RESTOCKING FEE!!!!!!!!!!!!!! Pretty exorbitant and not Amazon type service I have come to expect over many years of buying from Amazon! Be very careful of sellers that are not Amazon...sometimes it isn't very clear it is not Amazon. My feedback on Seller is on feedback page and seller responded, but I don't get a chance to respond to their feedback, which gives the misconception that I actually used this product! I couldn't have used it as it didn't work! If you want to buy this, I'd recommend a reputable pet store such as Pet Smart where you can easily take an item back if it doesn't work and get a refund. Even if they are willing to replace something, you may not want to risk having future problems with it in a month or two and would want a refund, which most stores have no problem with doing for you. Next time I go the established pet stores</review_text>
When I bought these pads at Amazon last year, a 50-pack was $11.99 -- now its $26.99! Does anyone know why this happened?The pads themselves are fine and work beautifully with the pad holder, but I'm protesting against this price</review_text>
Nice Looking, but not easy to move.  The bar at the top isn't smooth and it hurts if you try to move the stool with one hand.  Also, it arrived with the top plastic piece broken on one side.  Disappointed.  Not worth the trouble of returning</review_text>
I have two Great Danes who love chew-treat toys. Especially KONG. I brought the Everlasting Treat Balls Home and they both were able to pop out the treat within 2 minutes! They enjoyed the treats- but the expensive plastic ball is useless. I will be returning this product tomorrow</review_text>
First, the item came with a manual marked by the previous owner.  That can be overlooked, but the grinder was horrible in its grinding ability.  I may have just as well bought a blade grinder in that the grind was dust and chunks, no matter what setting I put it on.Horrible to say the least.  I sent it back and purchased a new one, which I enjoy to this day</review_text>
The unit is hefty and nice looking but that is about all nice I can say about it. The grind was no better than from the $20 burr mill it was replacing. On the third use the motor burned up. I also had problems with it making a mess when removing the jar -- such a defect should never have left the factory since it is so obvious</review_text>
I liked the price and all the different stitches.  However, I needed a sewing machine that would handle many varied things, such as alterations and heavy sewing.  I'm very disappointed in the lightweight quality of this machine.  The needle threader never worked and on close inspection my husband found that a tiny hook was missing that was supposed to hold the thread.  Also, the food feed stalls, jerks and surges.  This machine has beautiful stitches, but is for lightweight sewing only</review_text>
In my opinion the reset problem and occasional burbling are not problems. My main beef is it's too hard to clean. A few weeks after replacing the filter the deposits start adding up. It has to be cleaned basically every time you refill the tank. Soaking in vinegar doesn't do much and requires a lot of vinegar as the entire bottom reservoir must be filled. The (phosporic-acid based) cleaner sold on the website is slightly better but in the final analysis you have to resort to hand scrubbing. And there's the hitch! You can't reach parts of the element, not even with a toothbrush. Why they couldn't center it just a little further away from the edge of the "wall" is beyond my comprehension. I spent more time last winter with the thing taken apart & trying various methods of cleaning than with it running. I wouldn't buy it again</review_text>
This "nifty" piece of machinery was the one choice at my local store and so, I got it. I really wanted to get the Air-O-Swiss one but alas, it cannot be found or shipped to Canada... weirdly.So far, I am less than impressed. Took me forever to even get it working. The constant resetting is tiring. I did find a solution (initial anyway) - you fill the tank but also fill the inside reservoir (where the round filter is) and then it works.The noise it makes is NOT easy to get used to, no matter how tired you are.I am trying it for one night, then if I can't sleep I will return it. It's not worth the money. My advice? Save up and get the Air-O-Swiss</review_text>
Too bad I didn't come here first, at epinions nobody had the reset problem but I sure did. It's too bad too because this thing is a technological marval... except it's defective from the very start.My water is somewhere between hard and soft but more to the soft side. I read that using distilled or water with no mineral content will allow the boiler to boil less and therefore not trip the automatic shutoff.I now quote from the review of a Sunbeam on this site:"A vaporizer only works well if the mineral content in your water is "ideal", so you may have to make simple adjustments if the water doesn't boil (add salt), or if it boils too rapidly (add distilled water). This will prevent "spurting", boiling over and overheated reservoirs."The problem is it is ridiculous to buy a water distiller for a unit that already has a good filter in it already! The unit boils like the bejesus on low, putting it on high pushes it over the edge and it shuts off with the red blinking "reset/refill" light. I tried 4 times and even called tech support (they were pretty clueless, are you listening Bionaire?).It's really a pity too because the humidistat can be placed away from the unit and it wirelessly communicates to make sure the room is evenly humidified.I think the problem is that the water does not go high enough in the tray and you can't tilt it to fix the problem (most warm mist are designed that way for some reason</review_text>
Total rubbish. Wood was scratched on top, corner was smashed, water damage on the shelf, and door was cracked. It is really irritating to spend an hour putting this tv stand together only to find it is too thrashed to use. The holes were not even lined up properly with the dowels making it quite difficult to put together. Extremely shoddy craftsmanship and apparently no quality control. To add salt in the wound, the crumbly styrafoam packaging got all over the living room and I had to spend a good bit of time vacuuming and sweeping so the dog and the baby would not eat it. If you like taking chances and do still want to buy it, it's probably a 50-50 chance that it will be damaged.</review_text>
I like this type of opener very much, and wanted to replace another similar model that had lasted a year before failing.  So I opened the package, and tried to open a bottle of wine, but the corkscrew would not lock.  I'm not even sure I'll send it back given the warranty hassle, shipping costs, etc, given the price.  I just can't recommend this brand to anyone</review_text>
I bought this particular lever corkscrew because I read a very favorable review in Consumer Reports.  It is all metal which is necessary because the lever action actually puts a lot of stress on the gears, the guide and the frame.  After about 50 bottles the pin in the guide started wearing and the screw no longer entered the cork along the axis of the device making it harder and harder to use.  I actually fixed this a couple of times but then the frame actually broke at its thinnest point.End of story.</review_text>
A collegue of mine raved about it--she has several of the smaller model in her home and brought one in the office.  I tried it for a day, but was not convinced either way.  Then, I bought the largest model, and tried it at home.  I used it exactly as written in the instructions and put it to the "acid test".  I used it in the toilet room, closed the door, and let it sit there for 8 hours.  When I inspected the room, I could still smell what I smelled 8 hours earlier. And I so wanted it to work!  The other thing that bothers me is that it is supposed to make the odors undectable to the human nose, but even the manufacturer does not claim that it actually removes the source of the odor (as does a HEPA air filter)</review_text>
I bought the four pack of these pillows and kept finding the pillows thrown in other rooms.  My husband informed me that he hates the pillows.  They are not soft, and are crunchy and loud when you lie on them.</review_text>
After I read stories about problems chlorine causes in the shower chlorine I got this filter.  It turns out most water systems are using chloramine now, a more stable additive, instead of chlorine and this filter, like most, is ineffective at removing chloramine.  See if your water system uses chloramine and save yourself an expensive filter that probably doesn't work</review_text>
The problem with this is that (as it appears to me) VillaWare has tried to cut corners by re-using all but the plates as it has on it's Panini Grill (which for the record is an excellent product - which I have given rave reviews).  Check out the Panini Grill - unless you had these products in front of you & were able to open them up, you'd never be able to tell the difference between them.  I would say, don't write off VillaWare products just because of one poor one, as I said I also own the Panini Grill & LOVE IT!!!!!!!!  However, don't waste your money on this one - I hope VillaWare does right by their respected name & pulls this off the market completely.One thing I will say, the "audible warning sound" that was mentioned in a previous review is actually a click - the same as the Panini Grill, but listen carefully or you'll miss it</review_text>
I bought this for my cat a few months ago, because he just loves playing with a laser pointer. The whole concept of this toy was great but they should've expanded their ideas a bit more. For the size of the toy you would think that it would point further out than it does. I'm not sure about others but most cats I know like to run back and forth a room chasing the laser, maybe even jump up the wall. As opposed to with the Bada Beam that just goes in a circle, reversing its direction every once in awhile. My cat never avoids the laser pointer, when he sees that red light he jumps right up! But with the Bada Beam, he will just sit and stare at it. The whole point is so that you don't have to hold it and let the cats go crazy! NOPE! It's one thing for me to be disappointed, but it's clear that my cat was more disappointed.</review_text>
I had this vacuum for about a month.  The suction was so bad that after EVERY room I had to empty what little dirt was in the canister just to get back some suction.  I hated it!  Not only that but the bagless was a pain!  I had to go outside everytime to empty the dang thing because it was so messy!  Not to mention that trying to get the canister out and back in was the hardest thing ever.  It made even more of a mess trying to get it out and in!  I did not want that in my house!  I absolutely hated this vacuum</review_text>
This canister vac might be ok for VERY light duty, but don't expect it to handle any "real" housecleaning.  The filter clogs easily and this item is very prone to overheating, which leads to long waiting times because it turns off when it gets too hot.If I had it to do over again, I would not purchase this vac.  I would save up and buy a better canister vacuum</review_text>
I wish I had read some of the reviews for this product before I bought it.  I was SO disappointed with the quality of the product. The sheets are extremely rough, thin and scratchy. The comforter required restitching because the original stitching looked more like a basting stitch and came apart as easily as one. Since Thomas the Tank Engine is such a popular character, I would have thought more effort would have been put into the integrity and quality of products bearing  it's trademark. As such, I am very reluctant to purchase anymore character bedding</review_text>
I often have to mix by hand, things always end up dry and grainy.  Might be partially my fault - maybe I should try adding the ingredients as it's mixing.It makes a REALLY huge mess.  My mother and I both bought one, but I told her to return hers, it wasn't worth it</review_text>
The Hoover Floormate was great the first two times we used it.  Along with the Old English it did a great job cleaning and picking up the solution.  After using it twice, it had difficulty dispensing solution from the Reservoir.  This was remedied by having to apply downward pressure constantly.  It still got the job done.  Not too long after that it wouldn't vacuum the solution back into the unit.  I got a great clean for the price divided by four uses.  You do the math.  I'll stick to the "cheap" clorox thing we pulled out of the closet after I put the Floor ex-Mate into the trash.  Very disappointe</review_text>
I WOULD RATE THIS ITEM -0- STAR BUT IT IS NOT AN OPTION.THERE ARE TOO MANY STYLES/MODELS. IT IS VERY CONFUSING. CHECK ITEM SPECIFICS CAREFULLY TO AVOID GETTING THE WRONG STYLE/MODEL.THIS VACUUM HAS STATIONARY BRUSHES. SAVE YOUR MONEY AND PAY THE DIFFERENCE FOR THE MODELS W/ SPIN-SCRUB</review_text>
I was pleased with the way the Hoover cleaned my floors, except that I had to empty the containers too many times.  After using it for 3 or 4 weeks, I realized that it is scratching and scuffing the floors and they look terrible.  I hope I can return it because I can no longer use it.  Terry Sit</review_text>
STILL CAN'T FIGURE OUT WHAT THIS SCISSOR CUTS ..............IT SURELY IS NOT POULTRY, OR MEAT OR FISH................I WILL HAVE TO TRY IT ON PAPER BUT THEN I DIDN'T NEED ANOTHER PAPER SCISSOR !!!!!</review_text>
We too have the same issues with this that everyone else has mentioned.  We already had to trade it in after using it only once because of some sort of electronic malfunction on the espresso side that just made the digital screen blink on and off, nothing in the troubleshooting guide fixed the problem.  Now a month after using the new one, its espresso pump is loud and noisy, sounding like its broken. Also for some reason or another it won't send the water all the time through the brew head to make the espresso.  It ends up going into the overflow container to be dumped out. But then wait alittle bit and it starts to work fine.  Its been going for the last couple of days, but its such a iffy thing. On the plus side it does look nice! And it does make a good tasting espresso when it does work! My husband does agree with the directions are hard to follow, but he says that about everything</review_text>
I bought this item brand new and in hot pink colored (caught my eye). Flashy, small & cool looking! However, it contains 1 LED light which is bright but not wide spread. So when reading it lights up only the center of the page. You will have to constantly reposition it to keep from straining your eyes.  The constant bending and reposition will affect the fragile wiring on this thing.  About 10-15 uses after buying this product, I noticed a flikering (very annoying).  It slowly worsens the more I used it. In fact, I put the thing away and haven't used it again b/c of the annoyance. Thank goodness I didn't pay much for it. Value for the money is about a "7" because you get what you pay for.  Spend the money and try something else with more than 1 LED in it. My next bet is finding something with a real light bulb in it or maybe I will just annoy my husband at bed time and read with the lights on :</review_text>
I'm terribly disappointed. The feed chute is tiny (barely big enough for two fingers), the tray above the chute doesn't hold anything (most things fall out), clean-up is a nightmare, and it takes forever to get a usable glass of juice.Stick with a centrifugal juicer like the Breville Elite 800, unless you enjoy torturing yourself</review_text>
Yes watch out, pls always try to read review before buying. Its true the picture is deceiving, but what I don't understand is why Amazon keep using this picture</review_text>
Had this grinder for 8 months.  Two large cracks have formed in the side of the unit, now they are widening and trapping lots of coffee grounds.  I'm tossing it and getting a different brand.  All form, no function</review_text>
I found at a housewares store (Bed Bath &amp; Beyond or the like) a shot glass with several different units of measurement: fluid ounces, teaspoons, tablespoons (in half-tablespoon increments) and ML's.  Much more useful than this product, especially if you're measuring for weight loss purposes and can have EXACTLY two and a half tablespoons of that salad dressing</review_text>
I just threw this item away after finding the filter clogged with hairy, dirty, black and green mold again! I changed the little bulb that is supposed to prevent mold and the filter often. Each time I changed the filter, I found it clogged with mold!I have never had a problem with mold with any of the warm mist humidifiers I have used for years. This was just plain awful</review_text>
This thing worked like a champ, impressed friends, and lasted all of 6 months...and then, the plastic screw that attaches the handle to the grating drum snapped.  Cheap, Cheap, Cheap! and at $20/per...definately not considered disposable!  Look elsewhere.  The Zyliss will be my next purchase and I will leave feedback.</review_text>
Bought this at Target, returned it the next day.  Not even close to the quality of B&D T-R-O's from even a few years ago.  Summed up in one word, 'cheesy' is the appropriate descriptor</review_text>
I'm sending it back immediately. No where in the description of the product did it say it was plastic, and I don't feel I should be charged for return postage</review_text>
i tried this thermal coffee press - delighted to see it was 1/2 the price of other thermal coffee presses - but in this instant you get what you pay for 1) the coffee doesn't stay as hot as a regular thermos 2) when you press the grains down to the bottom they leak back up into the thermos and your last cup of coffee looks and taste like mud 3) its these times that you wish you bought the item in the store because now i have to pack it back in its box and send it back</review_text>
My wife and I are tired of cleaning up after our 4 cats. Though the Catgenies are terribly expensive to purchase and to keep stocked with Sanisolution and granules, it would be worth it for more free time and a cleaner basement. Unfortunately, they just don't work.Becuase we have 4 cats we bought 2 Catgenies. Even with 2 of them it was more than the machines can handle. Even when we ran them right after the cats made their deposit the impeller was never able to grind up the turds properly. They clogged everytime and beeped incessantly.Another problem is the scoop. Even though it scoops 3 times for every cycle, it always left turds behind. Those turds would then go through the whole cyle, which includes drying. That means that, even if they're scooped up the next time it cycles, they're going to be so dry and hard they'll never be ground up properly. Again, this results in clogs.We had them for a little over 2 weeks. In that time we had to run extra cyles, backflush and even take them apart and clean them.This product results in far more work, not less</review_text>
I pre-ordered this right after I saw it on "I Want That Tech Toys" and it finally arrived just after Christmas, after nearly five months of waiting. The first few days had serious set up issues where the water wouldn't drain. My cats were interested in watching it but since the water wouldn't go out they were not interested in using it for its intended purpose. I had it sitting next to their Litter Maid and they wouldn't use the new box. Their excessive use overwhelmed and burned out the Littermaid motor so it had to be thrown out. Now, with just the Cat Genie I hoped they would adapt. They did not - they pee on the floor, poop on the floor. Finally one of the four was willing to use the new box... then it stopped draining and even that one cat would't go near it because it was full of water. I am at my wits end, plugging and unplugging trying to reset it. I have made two attempts to contact the parent company who makes these with no return calls or emails. I am very tech saavy, we have lots of robots around here... roombas, scoobas, spotbots and others so this cat genie was ideal but I guess it isn't ready yet.</review_text>
I bought this toaster and a B&D coffeemaker (that's no longer available because it sucked!) on the same day back in December 2005. They both died a week apart, the toaster giving up the ghost just this morning when the slide would no longer stay down.Maybe B&D makes nice power tools, but they're batting a big ZERO with me in the kitchen small appliance department.</review_text>
Thinking this would be an excellent gift for Mr. Electronics Geek/Light Sleeper, it became a pretty big joke (and embarassment for me) because some of the sounds that come out of this thing sound like a circus or a dying Speak N' Spell. Don't bother - buy the sound screens used in medical offices, etc. for half the price. They're so much better</review_text>
We got this for our new baby.  We loved it until tonight... it just up and died and I've only had it 19 days.Taking it back tomorrow</review_text>
This dispenser has a strong resistance and makes it difficult to pull back the lever with the thumb.  When it closes, it tends to leave behind a drop of syrup that can run down the side</review_text>
Just purchased this toaster and it is being sent back.  Even on maximum setting, it hardly toasts.  We tried different breads, different settings and it just doesn't work right.  We even tried toasting (on maximum) one lot of bread (not good) and followed it by another lot of bread (better, but not adequate)on the theory that it was warmed up after the first lot of bread.  Forget it.On the up side, the toaster looks good.  But for $80 it should toast better than my old $9.99 Black and Decker!!</review_text>
The packaging hadn't been so pathetic. The tiny pieces of styrofoam, that failed to cushion the fridge during shipping,  led to a fridge that arrived leaking coolant. The cooling part of the unit had come dislodged from the frame, and one of the pipes was broken and leaking. PLUS there was no crisper drawer included. I won't be buying a replacement from Sanyo!!</review_text>
I paid too much money for this tea kettle to drip from under the spout and spit water all over the stove before it even whistles.  This is a disappointment!  Save your money and search for a better kettle.  This one isn't a good buy or a good produc</review_text>
Got this tea kettle for a gift recently.  It's discontinued on Amazon but they sell it at Home Goods for $ 24. 99.PROS ~* Asthetically pleasing (looks pretty)* Removable top for wide area to fill with water AND makes it easier to wash* Removable whistle (I can't stand the sound of a whistling tea kettle, so I remove the "plug")CONS ~* It'd be nice if the tea kettle had a flip up "plug" on the spout instead of the removable one (I'll lose it eventually, the other Le Creuset models have the flip up "plug" that opens with a press of the thumb)* The poor design of the spout is dangerous.  No matter how slowly I pour the boiling water (even with the small amount I use, only 4 or 6 ounces at a time), a few tablespoons of water "blub" out very quickly - sorry I can't think of a better descriptive word.  The spout opening is WAY too small, but the width of the spout itself allows more of a flow of water, so the first few tablespoons GUSH out.  So when you pour the water, do it as slowly as possible, put the mug on your counter or another surface that won't get ruined when wet, and don't hold onto your mug as you pour the water because the "blub" of boiling water will burn</review_text>
I have probably seen hundreds of tea kettles by now and still love the look of this one the best.  Only problem is that they RUST!!!  I had mine a few weeks when I noticed the rust spots on the interior.  I don't imagine the enamel could have been chipped on the inside of the pot, so it must have happened simply because I leave water in my tea kettle at all times.  The directions that come with this kettle say not to do so, but any serious tea drinker like me knows that's unrealistic.I threw mine out and am very disapointed that something that cost so much money didn't last long at all.  I thought Le Creuset was supposed to be really high quality but I'm officially disillusioned thanks to this tea pot</review_text>
I ordered this thinking it would be great for grinding up "big people food" for my grandson.  It could not even grind up a soft hot dog!  We kept trying softer and softer foods to see if it would be able to grind them but since the blade is a cheap plastic material (painted gray to look like metal!) it just couldn't do the job.  Sheesh, I mashed up a banana faster and better than this grinder.  Total waste of money.  Also, my husband tried to put the handle on the carrying case and it snapped right in two.  Junk</review_text>
Coffeemaker just quit yesterday makes cold coffee now unable too use. got a three year warranty and lasted three months. Biggest waste of money yet. Now call customer service get a busy signal last 15 minutes. never buy another hamilton beach product.</review_text>
My Lab mix had the rope detached from the tennis ball material in less than 20 minutes.  In the same time, she'd broken some of the individual strands of the nylon rope, so if one thing hadn't broken something else would have.  Not durable, not recommended</review_text>
I tried this knife at Sur La Table at the Furi demo. They appeared to be very sharp. However I did not like these knives for the following reasons1) I dont care much for the cheap plastic-like orange handles2) The finish on the knives appear to be cheap. Furi implies that these knives are made in Germany. However they are cheaply "Made in China". Now generally I dont care that much .. everything is now made in China anyways.. But when I am paying so much money for a product, I was hoping it was made in Germany or USA.3) The case is even more cheaply made.Personally, I would wait for a sale on the Global or the Wustof knives</review_text>
We ordered this for a spare fridge and it would be a great size, but the first on came and it was damaged. It looked like it had been dropped. Then I called Target. They did great taking care of getting us another on. Only the second came today and it was also dropped from a truck. The back was dented and it was already rusting. so I think we will try some where else for this item.</review_text>
After about 10 days from date of purchase, only 4 of the 8 cups would cycle. I would have to push the On button, get another 2 cups. After 5 or 6 tries I would finally get all 8 cups through. The design is bad for left handed people. It's very hard to pour water in left handed without it going out the back overflow slot or too far forward on to the plate. The lid is a bit of a struggle to screw on and I would rather have a thumb operated carafe than this screw to pour lid. Overall not a good design. I got my money back and am bought a Hamilton Beach Brewstation which I think is a great coffemaker.</review_text>
Cute bookshelf -- looks goods and serves its purpose. However, the tips of it that screw together break really easily.  We were using it at trade shows where we put it up and took it down once a week; it only lasted through 3 shows.  Two tips snapped off the last time we unscrewed it, even though we put very little weight on it when it was in use, and NO weight or funny angles on it when unscrewing.  Probably would work well if you never plan to take it down, but I'd question how much weight it can hold over a long period of time</review_text>
I was tired of replacing wires on myold cheese slicer every couple of years.The blade "bends" through a block ofcheese.  It doesnt provide a straightcut.</review_text>
Amazing that in 2005 you can read review after review on Amazon about the poor quality of almost every toaster offered. We hoped this one would be an exception. It was, but only in that it may be the poorest of them all. Ours buzzed loudly whenever in use. Never had a toaster buzz before. We toast bread at least twice a day, and the toasting performance of this unit is horrible. It has no bagel setting (which toasts the cut side more than the crust side), so we ended up with one side burnt and the other barely starting to toast. What's more, it toasts completely unevenly. One corner of toast will be blackened while the far corner will barely be tanned. And it's really annoying when a 4-slice toaster does not allow you to operate the heating elements independently. As far as looks go, De'Longhi did just as bad a job. The photos look cool, but the crumb tray this unit "sits" upon is actually wider than the unit itself, so there is a big uneven gap at the seam. It's the lower line you see in the photos--but they make it look real nice for that! What you don't see is the other side of the toaster where the bottom crumb tray will be sticking out several MM from the side of the toaster rather than being flush as shown. This makes it look broken, like two pieces of something that no longer fit together. If De'Longhi had spent even a second thinking about this, they would have done the opposite: The bottom tray should be slightly smaller than the toasting unit, which would give the unit a seamless look rather than a busted look. (We even went to a store [yes, a real store] to confirm that they are all like this, and they are.) Also, the bread warming rack is another poorly designed element. There are 4 tiny plastic feet inserted into the four metal posts of the rack so it doesn't scratch the metal surface of the toaster. However, two of the feet had already fallen out during shipping, and though they slipped right back in, all four of the tiny feet can easily be removed or fall out (only friction holds them in) and you WILL loose them very quickly--especially if you ever wash the rack. We're happy to pay extra for a quality item--even a toaster--but we expect something in return besides utter dissapointment. Final advice: Stick to the $20 toasters with functions such as bagel, defrost, and dual controls. If it's ugly, keep it under the sink and only take it out when you use it. This one looks broken, performs poorly, and costs a lot of money. If you do buy this model, maybe you'll get ours...we returned it</review_text>
I used this item twice-the second time I had one sweatshirt and one sweater on the rack & it broke into 5 pieces! Waste of money</review_text>
What a piece of crap. Just putting this together broke it. And was missing one of the snap parts. Truely a waste of money</review_text>
This thing basically self destructed the first week.  The handle pieces wouldn't stay together and when I pushed down on the handle to tighten the pieces together the base fell apart.  Not worth the money!  I was very disappointed</review_text>
Once in a while the coffee side of the machine will spew steam out the back and I will get a half of a pot of coffee.  The big problem with this piece of junk that the coffee maker was under a cabinet and the steam was ruining the kitchen cabinet.  I say this is $199 down the drain.  I have never had problems with a coffee maker spitting steam out the back and no water dripping into the pot.  Stay away from this garbage.  I am not even interested in contacting Krups for any warranty repair because it is not worth it</review_text>
Searched for a long time to find a good quality espresso machine that didn't cost over $500.  We had a great workhorse Krups combo espresso coffee machine that was still working after 15 years.  Was hoping this one would be the newer, more powerful, fancier model.  Boy are we sorely disappointed.  The coffee part works fine.  Unfortunately the espresso part leaks all over from the gasket and doesn't even produce hot espresso.  I exchanged this once, hoping I just got a bad one but apparently the Krups XP2010 is designed badly.  Shame on Krups for releasing a premature, untested product</review_text>
The LCD display do not work right line are missing from the display.</review_text>
I'm not happy.  The filter needed changing one day out of the box.  We have soft water so this should have lasted a while.  Difficult to hang on to when filling, have to hold it like a baby.  Does put out the air though and fits about anywhere</review_text>
I have just used this spinner for the first time in a long while.  Now I remember why I avoid it.It is nearly impossible to get the top and spinning basket to mesh and at the same time get the top with the handle to fit onto the bottom part.The very few times that all has gone together and stayed long enough to get a good grip on the bottom, the greens have come out nice and dry.Otherwise it's an exercise in frustration!I hope that mine is "defective" or something because otherwise I must say pass this one by and find a different design or model AND TEST IT IN A STORE before you buy it</review_text>
I bought this item because other comforters from this seller had good reviews, but it was a complete mistake!  It really was dingy like described by other reviewer.  I returned it, but lost over twenty five dollars in back and forth shipping costs for this item.  I HIGHLY RECOMMEND AGAINST THIS PRODUCT OR SELLER</review_text>
I really wanted this cereal dispenser to ease the morning rush. Unfortunetly it is just messy,annoying and takes up counter space. When you turn the nob it crunches the cereal and much of it flies in every direction. If the cereal is too big (honeycomb size) it doesn't come out easily. If it is too small (fruity pebbles) it comes out too easily and gets everywhere! I definetly would not buy this product again. At one point I even had ants crawl up my counter into the dispenser and had to throw all the cereal away. The time saved by not getting the box of cereal from the pantry is spent cleaning cereal of the counter</review_text>
Zero best describes how well Amazon supports what they sell...great deal on this toaster absolutely. And it does a nice job on toast but after using the left side twice it stopped locking down so now we have a 2 slice toaster. Amazon just takes your money and runs, giving the standard answer that you have to take it up with Krups. Krups to their credit at least will look at the problem and repair or replace it IF they determine it is a warranty covered problem.....unfortunately you'll have to box the item up and ship it to one of about "Krups Service Centers" around the country to see if they fix it or not, at your cost - shipping cost more than the toaster did.....save yourself the aggravation; go buy your toaster at Walmart, Bed Bath & Beyond or someplace that will at least swap it out for you without all this hassle</review_text>
Probably have bashed this product enough, but it is insulting to still see &quot;Sturdy lid and side handles for improved grip&quot; advertised.  In no time at all, the handles broke off like peanut brittle; glad I wasn't carrying it around the kitchen. No wonder no one carries replacement handles. Don't know what's better, but sure won't try Rival again</review_text>
Loses grip on can and the can slips off ...bad product. Do not buy</review_text>
This product does not work. The dial just moves randomly. Please tell me who to contact for a refund</review_text>
I was excited when I read the great reviews for this product, but I was very dissapointed when I received it.  I wanted this because I live in an apartment complex where I have to carry my laundry some distance to the laundry room.  I thought it would be great to just be able to wheel it over with this.  However, when I tried to put it together out of the box (it requires complete assembly), though it is simple to put together, not one of the small screws that hold the top bars on to the unit fit!  All four will go half-way in and no further.  Perhaps I got a faulty unit, but I see it falling apart soon because of this. Also, the bag itself seems flimsy.I was also happy when I read that this rolls quietly, however, they must have been rolling it on carpet because out on the concrete walkway that leads to the laundry room, it is extemely noisy - I ended up carrying anyway so as not to disturb my neighbors.  The only thing this unit has going for it is it looks nice and holds a surprisingly large amount of laundry.  If you are just using this in your home, it might work well for you, but if you need to take it out to a laundry facility, go with something else</review_text>
Don't make the mistake of thinking your dog could play with this.  It's to large.  Would be great if they made it smaller for dog</review_text>
I purchased a Krups thermal replacement pot for an electric coffee maker.  About two weeks after I bought it, I made coffee one morning only to discover the coffee running all over the floor.  For no apparent reason, the glass inside of the thermal pot had completely shattered.  I will be returning the pot this week</review_text>
I also had the surprise and joy of having my carafe's glass lining explode. The carafe had a little over 1.5 years of use, and I never used any sort of abrasive on it.Note that for the price of this replacement carafe, you could pay for most of a whole new coffee machine</review_text>
Hey, I wasn't expecting much but seriously, these are a pretty bad.  I bought two of these for my office.  The plastic shade comes all dented and looks so cheap.  The stupid pieces don't fit together right and so if you move it,  you have to pick it up from the base or it falls apart.   AND the switch gets stuck pretty much all the time so that it's really hard to turn it.  I'm the kind of person who enjoys fixing things so I've taken it apart and tried to fix it and its still rotten.  The second lamp is just completely broken now after only 6 weeks.  SAVE YOUR MONEY!!!!  I'm back on amazon looking for new lamps actually :</review_text>
I have been a homemaker for almost 20 years and I have a lot of experience peeling vegetables...I am fast and have rarely cut myself.  However, I bought this peeler during the holidays and a few days ago I cut myself so severly with it, I thought about going to the hospital.  This peeler seems to slide over the food quicker than others I have used and so it some how gives me an &quot;out of control&quot; feeling with each thrust.  It is also extra sharp.   I can't recomend this unless your fingers are made of stainless steel as well</review_text>
I bought these candles in the store.  When I got home, I set everything up and lit the candles.  In less that 30 minutes, all 5 candles had burned to half way, and the strings the medals are on had caught on fire too.  The entire thing was on fire (a big fire).  I was able to blow it out, and take it outside to the trash can.  I have bought Target candles before, and love them.  I am not happy!!</review_text>
I bought this for my mother a year ago, and I was recently looking for a vacuum myself, so being a person big on checking reviews on items before purchasing, I asked her how she liked it. She said she liked it, and thought it worked well, and loved how light it was (she suffers from rheumatoid arthritis). So... needless to say I went out and purchased it, trusting mother deartest's opinion.I HATE IT!I just moved out of my house, and I had to clean (vacuum) every room in the house. It took three times the amount of time it would ave taken a regular heavy Hoover vacuum to do the job. One sweep for a normal heavy vacuum turns into thirty for this piece of s*** just to pick up some damn crumbs.Also, you have to clean it out every five minutes because the filter gets covered so easily, after only vacuuming about half a room.It WILL NOT suck up hair. Rather, it gets tangled in the wheel, and looks like a thirty year old hairbrush that was never, ever cleaned out. Hence, making it harder and harder to pick things up (not that it does to begin with).It's loud, time-consuming, and the biggest waste of money.The only thing it has going for it is its weight, which is highly overshadowed by how much it sucks anyway.OH... AND I've used this product ONCE. ONCE! One time of use pretty much was all it was worth. IF THAT.I'm taking it back... and throwing it at them.DON'T WASTE YOUR MONEY ON THIS PEOPLE!!</review_text>
If you read between the lines on the other reviews here, I think you'll see that everyone thinks this thing is junk. And their right!!! No matter how small the job, it won't do it. It's just one more "MADE IN CHINA" piece of junk that I've wasted money on. It won't suck anything off hard wood or carpet floors. I don't get how any company, let alone a well known vacuum company, could sell such a usless tool. My only question is how could anyone give this thing two or more stars??</review_text>
First off, I paid $25.00 for this at Walmart, so I would suggest going there first if you decide you want this light weight vacuum. At the time of this writing Amazon is selling it for $54.00.   Secondly, it works fine for the amt of money I spent. Thirdly, my biggest problem is the thing is so LOUD that in order to use it, I will have to put ear plugs in.  Seriously,this product makes about as much noise as a fire alarm!! I have an email in to Eureka.com because their 800 number did not have this vacuum as an option on their automated voice mail and I was disconnected for trying to reach a human being to speak to</review_text>
The item is not packed well for shipping. The drawer and top were cracked. When I called the number on the replacement part, I was told did not have the replacement. They gave me a number to call for Target, THEY in turn told me they couldn't send it and told me to call the number I had just called.UNREAL trying to get this fixed. I am going to have to pack the WHOLE thing up and return myself. NO HELP IN GETTING THIS TAKEN CARE OF.</review_text>
Very hard to put together, drawers came broken both times- cute though- not at all sturd</review_text>
I dont see the point in this, the Mighty bright LED light lasts a lifetime because it uses L.E.D. therefore you will not need replacement. Besides that the product photo of this "replacement bulbs" show ordinary light bulps, not LED !!</review_text>
I was very unhappy with how the product worked.  It squirted all over.  It only made the adhesive gummy.  And you could smell the petroleum.  Our waste disposal company would not even take it and I had to take it to a landfill site for them to dispose of it</review_text>
People who complain that the aerosol can is empty the next day should listen closely to the product. The one I ordered will leak as long as the mechanism is attached to the aerosol can. I have tried reconnecting it many times, using different pressure as I push down, but to no avail. At 10 dollars a night, this product will get very expensive, very quickly. If it had worked without the leak, I would have given ssscat 5 stars</review_text>
I loved it until it broke after using it for a day.  Now when I turn it on the sound will not turn off.  If it actually worked correctly I think I would have given it a better rating</review_text>
I purchased two units--one for our home and one for our vacation home.  Within a few days, the unit at home was no longer making good crema.  The water pump at the one at our vacation home died within about 10 uses.I'm sending both units back and buying another brand.If they had worked properly, I'm not sure I would have like them even then.  The design of this unit is "odd".  I've had home espresso machines for 12 years and this one is just weird.  If you remove the espresso coffee holder too soon after you brew, the grounds and steam explode all over.  I also suspect that the thermostat is broken.  It allows the water to boil--which does not make tasty coffee.Overall, I hate this unit.  I'm going back to shopping</review_text>
The windtunnel II is a poorly constructed vacuum.  It is less than six months old and the motor for the HEPA filter had to be replaced.  It is very messy when you have to empty the tank.  Dust and dirt collect around the hepa filter and falls down when you are emptying the tank.</review_text>
This is the most poorly designed machine I have ever seen. It is continually clogging both filters and the hepa filter becomes filled with dirt quickly causing loss of all suction. I replaced it with the dyson dc17, which is awesome. Do not buy this vacuum</review_text>
Giving 2 stars on the suction alone. Hepa filter doesn't self-clean/turn after one use. A lot of dirt falls out from the hepa filter when removing the dirt box or collects behind the the dirt box if you don't pay very close attention to aligning it just right. I really liked how much dirt this thing pulls out of the carpet but it's heavy and dirt just falls out, a lot of dirt, when emptying the dirt box. I'm returning and not getting another after reading the other reviews in here that sound just like my experience</review_text>
The vacuum has great suction.  However, suction is the only good quality about this vacuum.I purchased this vacuum at Sears and got a good discount during their vacuum sale.  But I have gone through 3 of these vacuums and have returned or plan on returning each one.  The 1st vacuum got so much dirt stuck behind and in the hepa filter, the vacuum started making a sound like it was going to break.  The 2nd vacuum had a handle that was assembled badly so with each forward and backward pass the handle felt like it was going to come off.This vacuum is hard to push.  You have to put the carpet setting at close to high for low carpeting. On hard surfaces the vacuum is hard to push too!This vacuum has a large dust cup with 2 sections. The small compartment in the back of the dust cup is (1" high X 5" wide X 6" deep) for the dirt.  The large front section collects the hair, crumbs and other larger things you pick up off the floor in your home, however dirt and fine particulate dust is what I collect in my vacuum, and Hoover only gives you that little compartment for the dirt so it gets caught in the vacuum behind the hepa filter.  You spend more time cleaning out the vacuum than you do vacuuming your carpet. Today I had to pick up the vacuum and shake it over the trash can to get most of the dirt out from behind the hepa filter. Even my husband noticed that this vacuum takes too much time to empty and clean out.  Yes lots of dirt falls onto the vacuum when you remove the dust cup and is messy to clean up.I have tried Kenmore, Eureka, and Fantom in the past. I plan on returning the 3rd vacuum once I get my Dyson I purchased from HSN</review_text>
I bought this coffeemaker 6 weeks ago and the burner plate is pealing.I also discovered after I had water and coffee grounds all over,that you have to place the carafe with the handle to the side slightly or it will not drip properly.Hopefully, I can get my money back,and try another bran</review_text>
Before I purchased this product, I read several reviews, many of them very favorable. This product was also recommended by the grout cleaning/restoring company I recently used for my tile floors. Imagine my surprise and disappoinment when I discovered how utterly useless this product actually is. It does a very uneven job of distributing the cleaning solution onto the floor, and an even worse job of sucking it back up, leaving many puddles of dirty solution over the entire floor. I literally have to remop the entire floor every time I use it. I've tried other Bissel  products which were fine, but this one is an expensive dud. Don't waste your mone</review_text>
I had this blender for 3-4 years and was very unhappy with it. The design is poor (liquids tend to dribble terribly when poured), the motor seems weak, and it is hard to clean. Food seems to get under the metal band around the top and is not reachable. Today, after only sporadic, medium-duty use over the few years I had it, my blender outright died.I have other Cuisinart products that perform very well, but this blender is a loser</review_text>
Looks great in my kitchen but I, too, only use it for shakes & smoothies.  It DOES smell like burning rubber nearly every time.  I used to think something was wrong with it and now I just disregard it.  And after less than two years or making smoothies, I'm replacing the blade & gasket assembly.</review_text>
I rate this set very poor.  In less than six months the face cloth has holes in it.  The towel absorption is ok</review_text>
I read the two other bad reviews here and just bought 9 of these anyway. I was stupid.  I had bought one in the past and have had it for a few months.  That one is great and has held up after multiple washings.  It is still so soft.  So I just didn't belive the two bad reviews.I WAS WRONG.  The bad reviews are correct.I took these new 9 out of the box yesterday.   They are not of the same quality of the one I already have.  They are packed at least 3 different ways.  I think maybe some of them are someone else's defective returns.I don't think these are first quality.  There are MANY snags.  There is at least one blue stain.  One looks like it was defective and then repaired sloppily. The quality of the construction is not good.  Some are soft, some are rough.I returned all 9.DO NOT BUY</review_text>
Not up to standard set by other KitchenAid Pro Line appliances. When dessert is frozen will not dispense even with mix engaged, when thawed, dessert turns to near water consistancy. No way to remove dessert other than through dispenser. No control to modulate freezing, either on or off, manual setting. When front comes off for cleaning, retained liquid runs down the front of the machine short of the drip pan.</review_text>
I ordered this cereal dispenser for my adult son.  He filled it with raisin bran.  When he turned the knob to release the cereal into a bowl, the flakes of cereal broke up.  Some missed the bowl and went on the floor.  He's going to try putting Cheerios in it to replace the raisin bran.  If it doesn't work well with the Cheerios, I plan to return the item</review_text>
we had a heated pad for years that finally played out. it was wonderful. wanting to spend less this time than i did for the first one, i bought this item. i wish i had never put it on the bed so i could have returned it. i was suspect when i opened it. poor quality material. poor bed fit. very very warm on the lowest setting. after 3 sleepless nights of feeling the wires, which are quite large, in my ribs--it had to come off. i had rather be cold and i hate being cold</review_text>
Unless you're planning on washing dinner plates only, this dish rack is not for you. Smaller plates (or bowls for that matter) are not secured by the inadequate wire lips ( about 1/8 inch )so they fall flat and then fall out onto the floor because the sides are completely open (3 1/4 inches) . Anything small dumps out of the side opening and onto the floor. The utensil basket has a divider which moves around and your utensils end up laying down in the bottom. I bought this thinking that since Polder has a good name, it would be a good product. I was wrong and Polder should be ashamed of such inadequate design</review_text>
Be Aware Before you Order! On Oct. 31, 2006 I ordered two cases of bottles through Amazon, to be delivered from Stacks and Stacks. When they arrived, the cases were only 16 count instead of 48 count. I called Stacks and Stacks and a supervisor was to return my call, I received an email instead (supervisor claimed my home number was a fax). She offered to credit me shipping cost ($18.47 for the heavier weight boxes - the 16 count boxes are only 5.99 to ship)if I wanted to keep the boxes, otherwise they would arrange to pick them up. She claimed that J.K. Adams does not make a 48 ct case. I responded that I wished to return the boxes (I had less than half of the bottles I needed, and the cost per bottle was now more than doubled). I have since written two more times and as of 11/16/06 have received no response, no instructions to return, and no credit to my account. I have filed a claim with Amazon A-Z Guarantee, hopefully this will be resolved soon</review_text>
this product does not pick up dirt on laminate flooring at all which was not my impression when it was advertised</review_text>
I would rate this ZERO but that option is not available.  The weight of the stainless steel is heavy, exactly what I had expected for 18/8.  However, the top does not affix to the base.  It seems the threads inside of the top do not match with the threads on the base.  Furthermore, the pumper does not work leaving one to pour the liquid from the base.  That's worse than our original situation with the unsightly bottle of liquid dishsoap on the counter.  Yuck!I do NOT recommend the purchase of this product.</review_text>
the sheets say they are sateen, but feel more like basic cotton or flannel.  Since I was really going for that cotton sateen feel, i'm not impressed.i have a queen sized bed and have not had any problems getting the sheets to fit on the bed - even after washing - as some other reviews stated.</review_text>
We received our sheet set and they felt like Sateen, but when we washed them they lost the Sateen feel.  They feel like flannel.  We are very disappointed with our purchase</review_text>
I got these knives as a gift. Ironically, the first thing to rust was the part of each knife stamped "Stainless Steel".Let's be realistic. These knives are cheap. They're thin and they're not well weighted. However, they say stainless steel, and you figure that that's what you're getting. I hand-washed these knives and dried them immediately, but they still corroded.Now comes the bad part. I wrote to their customer service department twice and didn't hear back. I finally got their address (from the post office) and sent them back the knives. It took three months of me emailing and calling them (with 15+ minute wait times for Each Call) to get them to send me a replacement set.The replacement set rusted in about two weeks. That was in September. I just got off the phone with Miracle Blade, a call during which I was interrupted so many times that I actually had to say "I'm going to finish my sentence" so their rep would stop talking. They won't refund my money. In fact, they won't refund Anyone's money after 30 days. The lifetime warranty is for replacement only. They'll send me another set of soon-to-be-rusty knives, of course--if I pay the shipping and handling...Again. I asked the rep for his full name, for his ID#, and for a manager, and he refused all requests.In summary, if you buy these knives, they will rust. You will want to get rid of them. Your only option will be the garbage can</review_text>
Very hard to get any actual pepper to come out of this thing.  I just put some pepper on eggs and it took over 10 squeezes.  Imagine trying to grind pepper out for a stock pot full of soup.  Impossible</review_text>
This is a nice quality LIGHTWEIGHT comforter. There is a discrepancy right up front in the 'Product details' that lists it as shipping weight '9.00 lbs.' which is not the case at all. After arrival of two of them, we were shocked. When advised seller they replied after many days, said we needed to read the 'Product description' (scroll further down on item) which was different info from what was listed above. They did not update information on this item for customers on Amazon site for 2 months.. thus the 2 stars. I should have written this review earlier.On the plus side, it is very nice quality, individual pocket stitching to keep fill in place and border piping, ideal for Springtime.</review_text>
This was given to us about last christmas to replace our old one... not worth it...a couple months into our ownership of this item, it stopped working properly. The right burner remains on at all times - we have to actually unplug it when not in use because even though the dial is turned all the way down it is very very hot when it is plugged in and turned off. So the right burner remains on hi all the time, and the left burner is either lo or hi, there is no concept of temperature control with this device... if the knob is a centimeter below medium on the left burner then the heat will be very low too low to cook most things... if it's a centimeter above medium it's hot - if you want medium heat to work, good luck.It worked ok until it broke, however it was never especially powerful. I can't even tolerate trying to cook with it anymore, I just go to the apartment downstairs and cook on my boyfriend's mom's gas stove for nice even heating. But a ministove that they are dubbing 'professional' should not be breaking after like, three months</review_text>
I bought this kettle in February 2006. I liked everything about it until its automatic ON-OFF switch died recently - only two months after the purchase. Now the kettle won't turn on. It wasn't abused in any way, and these kettles usually last for years and years. The last one of similar kind served me well for 12 years until it started to leak and was replaced with this spanking new Proctor Silex K4070.I wonder if my bad experience with this kettle was unique? Has anyone else had one with a short-lived switch, or was I unlucky?</review_text>
I ordered this item but the platter I received has a completely different flower pattern in blue!  I really wanted the item pictured so I'm not too happy..</review_text>
Not worth the high price.  Difficult to clean and very persnickety.  Comes with a bunch of sensors that, if not properly triggered, keep it from roasting.  Not long after I bought it, I couldn't get it to start without jamming a pencil in one spot, and now it doesn't work at all.  When it works, it works fine, but it doesn't always work nor does it last very long.</review_text>
I ordered a Tailchaser for my cat before and I had no problems with getting my order but not with this one. Its been over a month and I still havent received the 2nd one I ordered!  I will never order from them again</review_text>
I ordered the 5 piece ble set on MARCH 18th and still haven't received this. I keep on getting an email that it is on back order and I now won't get it until JUNE 30th. Costumer service is ridiculous, I was told it would take 3-5 days that's why I ordered it. DON't get it, if you need it within one yea</review_text>
The can opener does not swing tight and once installed, kept swinging out instead of staying stowed. I bought it because it was so highly rated, but I am very disappointed. There is no magnet to hold the can lid either. Although it was intended to save space, it is kind of a clunky eyesore</review_text>
Read the info about this product carefully.  This listing is not for kitchen scissors, but rather poultry shears.  Chef's choice does make the 8" kitchen scissors in the picture, but that is not what you will get if you order these.  I had these on my wishlist and my brother ordered them for me for christmas.  I am now returning the poultry shears to amazon</review_text>
The machine looks great. It sat nicely on our counter-top next to the Kitchen Aid mixer and looked really classy. If that was all I wanted to do with it, then I would have been very happy with it, but I actually wanted to make decent lattes and espressos.Firstly, I found the steamer wand to be awkward to use. It rotates, but has little movement up or down. As a result, I found it pretty impossible to steam milk without spilling some on the counter-top when I was finished. It produced good foam though.Secondly, the indicator lights are so dim I found it difficult to tell whether the machine was ready or not.Finally the espressos I made had no crema at all. I have been making them for 3 years with our current Saeco machine with a delightful crema on each one. After pulling the shot it continued to leak water from the filter holder. The machine was constantly leaking water & steam when it got up to temperature and the design of the drip tray is such that it is awkward to empty it without spilling everywhere.In summary: If you just want a pretty machine to sit on your counter, buy this machine. If you want to make decent espresso-based drinks, don't</review_text>
First off, this machine LOOKS great.  But unfortunately, that's where the attraction ends. You see, I too used a little Krups $45 espresso machine for years. But it was a heck of a lot easier to use, and made consistently better espresso/cappucinno than this dog.  Here's a brief synopsis.The reservoir holds enough water for just a couple of days.  I'm constantly refilling it.  After making an espresso, the thing leaks out coffee drippings for minutes on end, making a mess of the whole machine.  The steamer seems to spurt out as much water as it does steam.  The lever that dispenses the steam does not move in a fluid fashion. And positioning the coffee holder pod thingy is downright cumbersome.Did I mention the thing leaks? Now you might forgive the little bugger if it made amazing capuccino............... it doesn't</review_text>
I really loved the look of the lamp, and it went perfectly in my living room for a reading light next to my favorite chair. Two days after I bought it, it broke at the place where it screws together on the pole. I returned it, and actually considered getting another one just because I liked the looks of it so well, but ended up just getting a refund. I was pretty disappointed, and am still looking for a lamp to replace it</review_text>
The detector was simple enough to use, although it required alot of batteries(8).  But the results were mixed.  Urine markings were faint and hard to distinguish from other organic substances. Even in areas where I knew there had been an accident, it was difficult to spot the difference.  All in all, I generally wouldn't recommend this.  (Although it did clearly show a distressing amount of what I believe is mold in the bathroom.)</review_text>
these sheets feel like sandpaper....they didnt fit my pillowtop either, thankfully, so i had to return the</review_text>
While the wine pourer works as advertised I am disappointed that the company appears to have discontinued the wine stopper I was originally seeking.  I was after the pourer that came with a "flapper" at the top that acted to preserve the freshness of the wine in between tastings.  While the above item fits the bill as a spout I personally find it useless</review_text>
The pump broke within 2 weeks and I haven't been able to find a replacement.  It would be under warranty but I threw away the paperwork (my bad) because usually I keep everything and then it just clutters up and I never have a problem.  However, I still think the product should last a little longer than that!  I purchased mine at petsmart and we live too far away to return it although I had tossed the box, etc</review_text>
The sheets and comforter in this set are very scratchy and stiff and you can see right through the sheets.  I would not recommend the set, very poor quality.  I don't even use the sheets on my son's bed because they seem so uncomfortable</review_text>
After reading the reviews on this product I thought it would be a great space heater for my apt.  I couldn't have been more wrong.  It barely gets hot - even on the highest setting - and gives off almost no heat!!Perhaps mine is defective or got broken during shipping, but it was a huge waste of money.  I have had to go out an buy another space heater already.It is so frustrating.  One word - don't!</review_text>
Worst set of sheets I've ever owned.  Washed them, and put them on the bed directly out of the drier:  The fitted sheet ripped at two different corners</review_text>
The image in this product is misleading. It looks like this product contains more than 1 piece, but when I opened it I got only one piece which is very small size and also the quality is inferior</review_text>
I've had a lot of problems using this, my sister has one and loves it! but for me, it leaks</review_text>
it seemed like a great idea at the time,but it does not work at all....simply the grass isn't growing,it only made the water in the fountain dirt</review_text>
This towel start falling apart after one wash and a tumble dry on low--one inch strings were sticking out all over the surface and little balls of frabric (like dust-bunnies) formed on it too.  Perhaps it would be good to use as an oil rag, but not in one's bathroom</review_text>
The product description for this is wrong!!  There is a somewhat "hidden" zipper but for some inexplicable reason, the lining is sewn into the cover so you can't separate the two.</review_text>
After buying an aluminum I read about the leaching of the mayerial into the food and the health risks involved. I was advised to spend the extra money. Since this is a stock item, I took it to Wal-Mart and traded it for a 6 quart Stainless. Boy was I surprised that a whole chicken does not fit as I used to have a sixx litter European and a whole chicken fits just fine. Anyway, I can't recommend this, because of the material and because of the size. If I could afford it, I would go for the electric pressure cooker with at least an 8 quart size of stainless - Cuisinart or other brands check Amazon around $150 and up. You get what you pay for</review_text>
What a failure!Seemed just right for a simple way to make a quick single brewed cup of coffee. Small, low profile and uses little space on the counter. The science is so simple and established that I figured there could be no problems.Wrong, it cannot deliver more than 6 ounces of water through the system, even though the water well holds 12 ounces. If you drink more than six ounces (smaller than a juice glass) of coffee, this is not the unit for you.The well is filled with 12 ounces and the machine starts to brew. Good. Then, about half way through the process (VERY slow) it simply stops. I used my own 12oz mug  which fits well but the pot seems pooped and just keeps on heating the water without delivering it through the plumbing. I have "plunged" the small water hole in the bottom if the well with no results.I've tried it five times, wasting coffee and time and it simply doesn't want to work.I'm planning to use it for a planter. Small cut wildflowers will look nice. For coffee, I'm going to a real working product.It doesn't pay to return this item because the time and postage will make it too expensive.This is junk, pure and simple</review_text>
I agree with a previous review,coating does not hold up. Comes off if bumped to hard.has been used gently and the metal is already showing. One thing I would like to know is, what is the highest temp this coating will tolerate</review_text>
As far as whisks for non-stick surfaces go, the silicone-encased wires are very flexible--a far cry from the hard, thick plastic whisks with only a few wires.  They are ideal for non-stick surfaces except for one problem.  The silicone is soft and not durable.  After a few uses or getting banged around with other utensils in the drawer, the silicone gets easily cut.  The silicon then easily peels exposing the stainless wire inside which defeats the purpose.  I have been very careful, but this works out to probably $2 each time I used it</review_text>
I rate this negative five stars. I just purchased it, thinking, after reading all the reviews, that it was great. What a crock!!!! It's absolutely worthless. It DOES NOT clean the water. It's been plugged in for a whole day and the water is absolutely filthy. The water flows and the motor is running, the charcoal is in place but it doesn't clean the water. I'm better off with a bowl that I clean every day. This thing just swishes around dirty water. Don't waste your money</review_text>
I bought this board along with another brand.  This one falls off the sink and is constantly dumping my cuttings in the sink.  It also warped within one month of my purchasing it.  The wood has also splintered.  Not my idea of a good cutting board.  I would not recommend it to my friends, nor would I purchase it as a gift</review_text>
It works fine, but my cat won't use it.I was thrilled with the reviews I read about this fountain and happily set it up as soon as it arrived.  Unfortunately, I like it better than my cat does.  He largely ignores it and still prefers to drink out of the bathtub or a glass.  Oh well.Before you buy, make sure it's not the sound of the water that attracts your cat. This fountain has no water sound (pretty quite, actually).  I think that's why my cat ignores it</review_text>
I bought the previous model of this dehydrator.  I seriously would not even give this machine 1 star, but there is no lower rating.  I bought mine a year ago, used it once, and the bottom heating element burned every single tray that I rotated to the bottom, which you have to do in order to get anywhere.  The entire machine was worthless within a week of me owning it.  I did eat the beef jerky, but that was the most expensive jerky I will ever make!  I called immediately to complain, talked to a guy named Saul, who said the unit must be defective, DUH! and he would send me a new unit and a return authorization.  I have gotten neither, I am just out the money.  I have called back, faxed, mailed, waited on hold, and finally decided that Ronco products are CRAP.  I will never give him or his company another cent.  Buyers please research your purchases, I see from other reviews that I am not the only one with a complaint.  Buy a different machine</review_text>
I love the SANGO NOVA BROWN dishware and rate it 5 stars. This boxed set of bowls is just not padded enough for the weight. The slightest rough handling by a shipper is going to result in damage as can be seen in the prior reviewer's comments. Mine too arrived broken. Sure seems like Sango would put a bit more padding between those bowls in the box. Amazon could also do a better job of protecting this item when they pack it for shipping. I sure hope Amazon gets credit from Sango for all these broken pieces. Combined score +2</review_text>
This came broken the packaging was not good. Damage good don't make happy custome</review_text>
coffee warmer only keeps coffee lukewarm.  so i am still in the market for a coffee warmer</review_text>
I bought this pan and to my suprise I had to assemble the handles on the skillet and the lid.  The handles on the skillet were not bad at all but the lid....   Anyway, after I got it assembled, wash, and dried per the instruction manual I plugged it in a began cooking.  It was amazing-my chicken came out beautiful!  Two days later I was cooking and the thing went out on me!  It became cool to the touch. I left it alone for a while thinking maybe I did something wrong-but I was already cooking at a low temperature.  It did not come back on when I replugged it in.  Hence I had to give it back.  I was so disappointed.  I am just glad it did not happen while cooking the feast I had planned for the following week.  Save your mone</review_text>
You can hold this in both hands and your finger will only overlap a little.  18 oz's is a LOT of water</review_text>
Crystal D'Arques Longchamp Wine glass has10.25oz, 8.25oz,5.75oz, 4oz, 2oz, 5 different size.They are all look a like and can't tell by picture.I'm looking for my missing set of 5.75oz.I can't buy them without size information.</review_text>
I bought this item at my local Target the weekend I moved into my new apartment. The parts are quality chrome, and the wood top is certainly appealing to the eye.If only the pieces actually fit together to assemble a sturdy piece of furniture.One of the shelves doesn't fit properly over the four legs, and the finished product sways at the slightest touch. Judging by the glowing reviews on this page, at best, this product is a hit-or-miss venture.There's a reason it's priced at 30 dollars.  Buyer beware</review_text>
I received my Granos as a birthday present two years ago.  As had already been reported here, the machine is great--when it works.  I thought I was the only one who had leak problems but most everyone who wrote a review here reported the same problem. Leak from the bottom and leak from the water container.I called customer service to report the problem and they sounded like they've never heard of the problem.  They asked me to return the machine but I didn't bother.  A good customer service should have already heard the problem before customers call.A $600 espresso machine should last more than two years.  I can't believe a company like Bodum is not concerned about its product.  I'm buying another espresso machine and it's not going to be Bodum again</review_text>
I purchased this machine in November 2005. When working it is a wonderful but it started to leak within 6 weeks. I sent it back for repair or replacement, 3 weeks later I received a badly damaged box, not the shipping box but the Bodum box. The replacement had a manufactures date of 03/04, 2 years old. It had obviously been used, coffee and water stains were present several scratches, and parts were missing. I called customer service and the supervisor promised they would ship a new one immediately and I would receive it no later than 2/23/2006. Three days after I was promised I would receive the new machine it has yet to arrive.  I called customer service today and was informed they have no record of shipping a new unit and could I call back next week. The very used replacement machine was shipped back last week.I regret making this purchase</review_text>
These are not what you'd expect from Wusthof. The Wusthof symbol on the handle is a STICKER (!!!) which bleaches out after washing. Also, after 1 months use and washing, we're getting rust spots. While these knives are sharp, they are not holding up appearance wise. Very disappointed</review_text>
I say nearly useless because the ceramic pot is a nice size and weight for melting chocolate in the microwave (which is what you'll have to do), and the warmer makes a decent trivet...but, it does not ever get hot enough to actually melt the chocolate.We followed the directions, and allwed 1/2 hour for the chocolate to melt (putting chips in as we started dinner).  Half an hour later, some of the chocolate (on the outside of the crock, by the burner coil) had melted a bit.  An hour passed...still nothing much.  Now, given that cocoa butter melts at body temperature (which is why it is used in cosmetics), that's saying something.   The pot never reached 98 degrees!  If I'd put the chips in a zip-lock in my lap during dinner I would have had better results.Since this was a relatively inexpensive item, and I got it effectively for free during Amazon's recent Valentine's day promotion, I did not send it back (thinking it would be unfair to make them pay shipping both ways on an item which costs near as much to ship as it does to buy)...but, if you are actually paying for this- don't bother.  (or at least be advised that it will not actually melt the chocolate).  It does do a reasonable job of holding the temperature once you've melted the chocolate some other way.</review_text>
I was very hesitant to spend close to $160 on a single fry pan, but I had heard so many good things about All-Clad and thought it would be a wise investment.  For the first 6 months, the pan was great.  I loved the large size and used it often.  I was just about ready to invest in an entire set of All-Clad cookware when my pan warped.  I was using it on an electric stove as usual, and the pan just simply warped.  I was thoroughly disappointed that a $160 pan would warp during normal use.  I won't be spending this kind of money again.****Follow-up.  I contacted All-Clad regarding the warped pan-they had me send it in for evaluation, and yesterday a brand new one showed up at my door.  I'm impressed at their customer service and the fact that they stand behind their product.</review_text>
It seemed to work when I first got it, but I'm not really sure anymore. When I first got it, I changed the litter and put the Smellkiller right near it. Usually after I change the litter, I can still smell the litter, it just smells clean; this time, I couldn't smell anything. I keep the sponge moist and it still sits in the small area where the litter box is; for the most part, I don't notice any smells, but I'm not sure if that is due to the Smellkiller or because I use A&H Baking Soda Kitty Litter, a 2nd litter with crystals, AND the A&H litter box deodorizer powder.I suppose it works ok, but I wouldn't buy another one, and I don't think it works the miracles claimed in other reviews. Also, mine didn't stay on the wall either...came crashing down only 1 day after I put it up. Now it just sits on top of the litter box</review_text>
This french press made a delicious cup of coffee. The problem is that it is advertised as a "3 cup" coffeemaker. I returned it and will get a larger size</review_text>
Riedel's water glass and gourmet glass are both made in France of glass (not crystal).  The stem's too short for wine in my opinion, but you could always use them for water.  The water glasses are more suitable, though, as they have a wider mouth</review_text>
Although its description said it is a replacement carafe also for a different model, for which I bought it, it did not fit at all.  I felt it a nuisance to return it, so I did not return it.  But I certainly wasted the money I paid.  I was very unhappy</review_text>
Unless you are cleaning the fishbowl, this thing is useless</review_text>
This item is for serving only, it will not keep the liquid hot or cold more than 30 mins</review_text>
I ordered the product and thought I was getting the large size.  I called the shipper, no returned calls and I can't really use the item shipped as I needed the large item.How do I return, the shipper doesn't return the calls.  Not a happy customer of this product</review_text>
the fitted twin sheet when I used in my boy bed on corner to rip.....is the worse material use for childrens is SANDPAPER .The worse product...the only good thing is that my little sleep better with thomas and friends.I recommend thi sproduct only if your boy  is not easy to put it in bed....with thomas can sleep without mom or dad</review_text>
I was so excited to get this set in the mail for my son, but when I took it out of the package it felt like sandpaper. I have washed it several times but it is still very rough. Also the first time I washed it one seam ripped all the way down the side and frayed. It was very cheaply made, but my son does love it, purely because its Thomas I'm sure. I wouldn't buy this again</review_text>
I was really excited to try this cage out for my 6 lb male maltese.  It is a perfect size and it seemed really well made.  My dog doesn't really like cages and was able to chew right through the zipper seam.  He is NOT aggressive and does not chew things he shouldn't, so to my surprise about a week after my husband and I bought the cage, we found him out of it.  We were truly disappointed.  It is a cute cage and has a very sturdy frame.  If you are not planning on zippering the cage or your dog does not chew through zippered seams, it is a great cage.....but overall, i was disappointe</review_text>
I used an avocado smaller than the tool, so I had to uncomfortably squeeze the tool until it'd fit.  Then it kind of smooshed my avocado into slices that were not attractive, while leaving a layer of unused avocado in the shell.It made me realize that it's not *that* hard to slice an avocado with a paring knife... oh well</review_text>
After about a month, it started producing cool-mist that smelled funny, like something bad had rotted in the room. The filters are a nuisance. I think I'm much better off with a steam vaporizer</review_text>
I'm really upset with this item. I registered for it and when I got it the thing didn't work. I called the 800 number trying to see if I did everything right but couldn't get a live person on the phone. I went and exchange the item and the second one didn't work. Horrible Horrible product and business</review_text>
We got this as a gift &amp; used it.....its loud and spits out water.  We're not happy with it</review_text>
This looks like a good idea from Westinghouse, but if you read the warranty details, the krypton bulb is not covered under the 10-year warranty.  $10.00 for a bulb that is warranted for 10 years - but not really?  What is the point?  Extra tape isn't even included when the first strip fails.I suggest you use a flashlight</review_text>
Omie & Izzy are brother/sister kitties about 6 months old. They received this as a gift:"It's fun when someone plays with us with a chasing toy but we don't play in it much on our own. One of the wires broke already and we've had it less than one month."</review_text>
I hate to rate something so low, but my experience warrants a low score.The larger burner was defective from the onset - the knob turned but the burner remained on, and at full it seemed, regardless of the knob's setting.  I had to unplug and plug in the unit to turn it off and on.  The smaller burner worked!Amazon was nice enough to refund me in full and even paid for the return shipping as well.  Packing seemed fine too, guess it was a manufacturing defect.  Hopefully this doesn't happen to many others</review_text>
Did not work right out of the box. The heating elements did not get hot. So I had to return it otherwise I would be throwing money away.  Do not buy</review_text>
Ive had this vacumn for about 2 years. After about a year the spinning brush only goes on when the handle is tilted a certain way. Still has very good power. Bad news, it doesnt move around easy. It is like dragging an old tire around, hard to turn and direct, canister always rolls over. The only reason i am still using it is because i only have area rugs in a large apt, and dont vacumn that often, i guess because i dread using it. I am looking for a simipler unit with a bag because the hepa filter starts to smell after a while. But still like i said, lots of power if you keep the filter clean</review_text>
I was very, very disappointed with the performance of the Tribest blender. I bought it to blend breakfast smoothies....nothing fancy....just some protein powder and soy milk. I even bought the larger cup. The unit is very, very under powered. Did NOT mix the ingredients. Had to transfer everything to my larger, more "industrial" blender. Would not recommend this unit for any serious blending. Save your money or put it towards a better unit. This product is a rip off. Does not even do the most basic blending of a liquid and a powder</review_text>
The blender I received also smelled as if it was overheating and the tachometer did not work. I am sending it back and will be asking for a refund. This clearly is not a reliable blender</review_text>
These are NOT Riedel crystal!  After I returned them, I told Amazon that that need to update the description.  If you read the fine print, it does say "Manufactured to exact specifications of Riedel, Austria".  They are made by some other company, not in Austria, and the quality is very, very low.  You get what you pay for</review_text>
Will work fine if you only use a few light coats.  Not designed for a family of four in a colder region.  It's now proped up in the corner as it has lost two leggs and half it's hooks.  Now shopping for a new one.  Looked nice in the oak</review_text>
we ordered a cherry coat rack (keep in mind cherry is the only color option available on this site for that item) and it came as light oak.  i tried to get it exchanged, but they were going to make me pay for shipping cause "it wasnt their fault."  i dont know whose fault it is, but i ordered a cherry, i got something totally different, and their "customer service" didnt service me, and wasnt customer friendly.  never again</review_text>
Sure, it looks nice enough without anything on it.  But if you plan to actually hang coats and umbrellas on it, pick something else.  It's tippy and it doesn't hold very many coats without the pegs cracking and breaking off.  It's cheap, but you're getting less than what you pay for.  It couldn't last a winter when being used by only two people</review_text>
There isn't much to like about these sheets. They wrinkle like crazy when you wash them and the stitching leaves a lot to be desired - hanging threads are all over the place. I would not recommend these sheets at all</review_text>
While the pan handle stays cool, the lid handle heats up with the pan.  You need a pot holder to use the cover.  I didn't like that.</review_text>
I love the cookware set.  12 pans to do 12 different meals.  They are very durable and holds up well to the heat</review_text>
I was impressed with all the pieces, & liked the pots with short handles. But, when washing the lids, the handles on top get full of waterand have to be sat up for water to drain out... s l o w l e y, before putting them away. Also the metal on the handles has a tendency to get very warm when you're cooking. But, what do you want for 30 bucks?</review_text>
I HAVE TWO BATH SHEETS AND TWO HAND TOWELS. THEY DO NOT ABSORB WATER</review_text>
The piece seemed a little wobbly in the beginning. However, as time passed it seemed to be straining under its the weight of the 5 lamps.Now after 5 months, it just gave way, and the stand came apart. Extremely disappointed with the product</review_text>
Having had a Hoover in the past, I was excited to find this one at this price.   I've had it only a year and am now vacuum shopping once again - and WILL NOT be looking at Hoovers.  The parts are plastic and cheap and break easily.  It advertised a power hand tool. It is not. It works on air and when you put it to any material it stops spinning. The upright power tool for carpets also stopped working after about six months.  The hard wood floor tool worked fine - and suction was strong enough - but again the plastic pieces break and the attachments don't stay on like they should, so I spend most of my time with the vacuum re-attaching the pieces.I would recommend looking elsewhere if you want a vacuum to last</review_text>
I bought this lid in hopes it would fit on an old revere pot I have. I does not. It is a fine product, but it is too big for my needs. The main failing of this item is that nowhere in the description was a statement of the precise size of the item</review_text>
This coffeemaker's design is flawed. But my customer service experience on complaining about it was the best I've received from any company in years. They sent their new thermal carafe model, which appears to have the design flaw with the filter carrier taken care of. Give them a chance to make it right. Customer service is part of the equation with any purchase, and Mr. Coffee/Sunbeam has impressed me on that score</review_text>
Christmas morning and the slow, ongoing leak, which we worked around over the last year, finally gave way and voila! hot coffee and water and grounds all over the counter and floors. And yes, we clean our coffeemaker daily, and yes, we know how to properly run the thing too. (We gave up on the water filter soon after purchase--it kept falling into the coffee grounds.) Why the two stars? We wanted to love this machine! We wanted it to work! It is a handsome machine with a handsome pedigree (a Mr. Coffee!). The clock is nice. The thermal carafe is lovely. Until the BIG LEAK, we made do with its daily dribble and sputter. But really, after examining the unit carefully before its trip to the trash can, we realized how foolish we were in keeping this fire hazard going as long as we did. That's why I've bothered to write this review. It is not an inexpensive machine; the quality isn't there. Sorry.</review_text>
Had major problems with it leaking and ended up having to get another (different brand). I was shocked and a upset because of the mess it left in my kitchen.</review_text>
I almost threw this coffee maker across my living on more than one occasion due to it's extremely poor design.  Mr. Coffee really struck out on this one considering they are a company that only makes coffemakers.  First of all, the water filter device failed after a few uses and would no longer allow water to flow freely through it.  This could have been due to the hardness of the tap water in my area but regardless, it's a filter, it's supposed to be able to be subjected to not so perfect water.  So before i figured out the filter wasnt allowing water to flow I would let it brew and the water would never make it out of the resovoir and would basically just steam up and evaporate.  After the entire brewing cycle I would pull the carafe out and there would be NO coffee in the carafe.  After realizing it was the filter that was causing problems i just simply removed it and didnt use it.  The coffee maker worked for a few days but only if you place the paper coffee filter in perfectly.  Otherwise, the dripping water would cause the filter to collapse and then the grains would run out of the filter, clogging the drain and then voila, you get an overflowed grain basket with dirty, grainy water all over your counters.I do not recommend this coffee maker for any reason.  Get the hamilton beach Stay or Go 45234</review_text>
NO STARS!  I recently have come to find that not only does this coffee maker have all of the defects others have stated, but due to the "leaking" & issues w/ the filter basket overflowing, you may also notice that the water never completely drains-staying at the 2 cup line-causing MOLD & MILLDEW to grow (DESPITE proper cleaning & maintenance).  This is the reason for the "bad tasting coffee" & also the reason for my current various medical conditions...  I am interested in raising awareness so that other consumers avoid the health issues I am being faced with.  PLEASE DO NOT PURCHASE ANY MR. COFFEE/SUNBEAM PRODUCTS...  THIS IS THE EXACT MODEL I OWN, BUT NEARLY EVERY MODEL, HAS THE SAME DEFECTIVE CONSTRUCTION & consumer complaints...  Check the Better Business Bureau & Consumer Affairs...  You will be shocked at what you find about Mr. Coffee/Sunbeam.  They have almost gone bankrupt from Class Action Lawsuits, more than once.  If ANYONE has a similar situation with ANY Mr. Coffee brand coffee makers, please contact me ASAP...  My email address is angidougherty@yahoo.com  People are suffering because of this hazardous product & may not even know it...  Toxic Mold Poisoning is very serious & can be deadly.  Especially through drinking it in your morning coffee.  YUM</review_text>
DO NOT BUY THIS EXPECTING THE LID IN THE DESCRIPTION!I never recieved the lid described in the description section.They had a similar skillet in colors for less.Skillet is a quality weight anodized aluminum.It has what seems to be a high quality nonstick interior.The comfort handle has a good feel and is oven safe to 450 degrees.CONThe cushion handle means you CANNOT use in a broiler.No top browning your omelet in the broiler</review_text>
The slipcover barely covered my sofa, will not cover the lower front and it barely hangs over the backside.  It keeps sliding off, where I have to adjust it several times during the day, if I could I would get my money back</review_text>
This perch is a great size for a large cat or even two cats together.  It is soft and appears to be very comfortable.  However, the way it attaches is by affixing a strip of velcro to your window sill, which then mates with the matching velcro on the bottom of the shelf unit.  There are two adjustable legs that are supposed to give support as they brace against the wall.  My window ledges are not very deep and so the shelf does not sit level.  The legs are adjusted to fit as closely to the wall as possible, however, mine do not move close enough in so that the legs stay securely on the wall and therefore, do not support the shelf properly.  We have tried putting a piece of folded cardboard under the part that sits against the wall, but this hasn't worked either. So unless you have very deep window ledges, this may not work for you. We bought two of these, but plan on returning one.  On a positive note, my cats love the shelf and took to it right away.  It is a great idea, but this one needs a little better design</review_text>
The concept here is good "no tools needed" to install.  The product itself is well made, but the velcro tape does not adhere to the windowsil like it is suppose to, the perch keeps falling down and the cats are afraid to use it.  If there were clips or screws on the perch it would be much better.I prefer the cheaper window perches because even though they are not plush they do the job and do NOT fall down</review_text>
Bought this model. Would not brew a full cup of coffee no matter what I did. Called customer service and they sent me a new one. This one also did not work. All it did was flash blue lights and never brewed a cup. Tossed it out and bought a different model by Black and Decker. Have had it for months and never had a problem with the new model</review_text>
Short and not so sweet:First unit did not work at all,Second unit worked for about 3 months, then sporatically, then quit.I should have believed the other reviewers.Going to try the Senseo Supreme unit now</review_text>
I can put up with the weight, the noise, the poorly located on-off switch, the spinning brush that is cool but doesn't work. What I cannot put up with is how touchy it is to put the cannister back on. It will appear to be on correctly, but if not, the dust collects in the top part of the cannister and will block suction. This creates an unmanageable mess when you try to empty the cannister.Buy something else, I can't wait for this one to die</review_text>
Well after reading the reviews of this vacuum, I decided to give it a try.  I have had it a month now and I have to say that I am sorry I bought this behemoth.  Right out of the box and trying it for the first time I noticed things that I didn't like.  I thought I 'd give it some time though and hoped I could adjust.  Here is what I found:1.  The vacuum is very heavy as other reviewers have stated.2.  Worse than the vacuum being heavy, the darn thing is really hard to push.  Even on hard smooth surfaces it's hard to push.  I have not figured out yet what the heck would cause it to have so much drag.  For it to drag on hard surfaces, it must be a design flaw.3.  The on/off power switch is foot operated.  Not a terrible thing but Dirt Devil decided to put the darn thing out of view and hidden by the accessory carriage.  On my first time of vacuuming I accidentally ran over a sock and it got caught in the floor brush.  While the brush belt was smoking I fumbled around for the damn power switch.  I finally had to reach down and press the switch by hand because I couldn't find it by looking down.  It must have taking me eight to ten seconds to finally turn the thing off.  Unfortunately, the damage was done.  The belt snapped. How nice.  I really liked that.  First time out and the belt snapped. Another note about the switch; there have been times I have had to repeatedly press the switch because it would not lock off.  It takes a firm steady pressure to turn it off.  The fun part of this annoyance is that you think you have it turned off because the motor starts winding down and as soon as you let up on it the motor powers up. Couple that with not being able to really see the darn thing it's a real challenge.  Maybe Dirt Devil thinks we have eyes on our toes.  Hey Dirt Devil here is an idea.  How about putting the on/off switch on the push handle.  What a novel idea. Doh!4. The vacuum hose that detaches is really unwieldy.  It has a long plastic handle that you hold onto and that makes it really difficult to manipulate the hose.  The main reason being is that the hose it too short.  It's like you are fighting the hose all the time.  It gets tiring.5.  The detachable hose is really hard to re-install in it's port.  You have to wedge it in there really hard to get the thing to seat.6.  The vacuum is terrible on rugs, on any of the floor height settings. It bunches up the rugs and starts smoking baby.  My old vac was not much better but at least with the old one I could lift the vac and kind of drag it over the rug and it wouldn't get all caught up.  I tried the same thing with the Dirt Devil and forget about it.  It jammed up every time.7.  The vacuum is poor at getting dirt off of hard surface floors.  It just moves the dirt around or spits it out the back.  I have to use the hose attachment.8.  The vacuum is horrible on steps.  With my old vac I could drag the vac across each step whilst the vacuum is locked in the upright position.  Easy deal.  The Dirt Devil does not work that way.  When the vacuum is in the upright position the brush is too high off the carpet to do any good.  The only option is to disengage the lock and vacuum with the back slanted.  One little problem with that.  The weight of the vac cause the seal at the base of the dirt canister to open and air begins leaking.  You don't get a good positive suction.  So, you have to play with the position of the tilt to get the proper seal.  The problem is that the proper position you need is so close to where the vacuum locks into the upright position.  It often locks and so then you have to try and un-lock it while balancing this heavy behemoth.  It's a joke.  The only half easy way to do steps is if use the detachable hose and attach the power brush.  The only problem with that is you are fighting the ill designed hose and heavy vacuum, and not to mention that the brush attachment will only really get surface dirt.  If you try putting pressure for some deep cleaning the brush stops.Now for Pros:1.  The vacuum does seem to get the carpets pretty clean.  It has good suction and it raises the carpet fibers right up.  It almost makes my carpet look like new, and I do not see an excessive amount of carpet fibers in the dirt canister.  Some vacuums like to just tear up carpets.2.  The rotating brush attachment works pretty good for removing cat hair off of couches and bedding.All in all this vacuum was very very poorly designed.  I may just have to donate this thing and buy something else.  I can't imagine fighting this thing every week for years to come or until the motor dies.  Maybe I'll be lucky and the motor will die soon.  Then I'll just throw the darn thing out and buy something other than Dirt Devil.Steve</review_text>
The top doesn't seal so shaking and storing the dressing can only be done with tinkering. Also, the bottle being so narrow it's hard to clean.</review_text>
I'd think if I were Dyson, I would recall all of these.Big, Bulky Pricey, and worthless. I thought turbines were designed to spin?It certainly does not compare to the vacuum at all.Bought a real one for $17 (shiping included) Eureka Power Paw, Dyson should be ashamed</review_text>
For the Animal DC17 to be such a great vacuum, I thought I was using the turbine tool incorrectly.  After reading the reviews I realize that there isn't any error on my part, it is the tool that is inefficient.  I emailed Dyson to inquire as how to use the tool correctly and they have never responded.</review_text>
We have owned this machine for a little over two years. For the first 6 months it worked as expected with clothes coming out slightly damp due to the condensation method of drying. However, since then, it has stopped drying, such that 5 hours of drying (yes, 5 hours) yields wet clothes. This has persisted, despite 4 repairs, replacing almost every part on the machine except the control board, which I assume is next.Prior to this machine we owned an Equator brand washer/dryer combo which was a disaster: that broke after 3 years.Unfortunately, the LG is probably the best of a bunch of mediocre machines (Equator, Asko, Maber and other brands) available in the US..all have shortcomings as dryers as all use the ventless-condensation method which take much longer to dry and almost all are 115V. The Bosch combos available in Europe, but unfortunately not available in the US, are 220V and thus, dry more quickly. This is not a machine for a family, but rather ideal for an apartment or condo for 1 or 2 people at most. When it worked, it worked well. However, no one should invest $1300 to have it break in such a short time. And no one should have to spend over 5 hours to do 1 load of laundry. If you must purchase one of these machines (for reasons of space), buy an extended warranty</review_text>
This unit can only dry HALF of what it can wash, which is not that much.  It takes a total of 4 1/2 hours to do one load of laundry if you only put 11lbs of wash in.  I have a family of five and I am over-run with laudry because of this machine!!</review_text>
i am very disappointed with this humidifier and its filter. it consumes about 1 filter per month and if you keep the humidifier off for more than 2 days the filter dries up and you might as well throw it away</review_text>
Item worked for one year, three weeks.  Then had widely varing temperature readings, or indications that the oven had reached over maximum temperature (500+ degrees) when oven was set for 325 degrees.</review_text>
I bought this and one of their wooden pizza peels. I thought it would be ergonomically advantageous, which it may be.But on the first pizza I cut (on the Mountain Woods peel), the edge is now folded over a bit, rendering the edge much, much less sharp than out of the box.So, I would suggest you save your $3 and the out-sized shipping costs and buy yourself a cutter that may last for a while</review_text>
I bought this coffeemaker as a gift for my sister and was so embarrassed when she took it out of the box. First, the plastic top is extremely cheap and flimsy, and the whole thing broke off the first time we flipped it back. There was also a grey powder film over the whole appliance. Finally, it is just not good looking at all...extremely cheap in appearance. It did not even make it to the countertop before we had it back in the box and on its way back to Amazon. I went with the Bosch on their reputation for the greatest dishwashers. Evidently, another company designs and manufacturers their small appliances. DO NOT BUY THIS ITEM!!!! Get the Braun KF550-BK AromaDeluxe instead</review_text>
This is horrible at keeping coffee hot. It gets cold quick.Buy another brand. I bought this model and a larger Zojirushi 1.9 liter stainless steel model at the same time. They both are bad and leak heat vapor out like a hissing snake with no off switch. The 1.9 ltr one also leaks fluid out even before you press the open button.  Also it is the worst stainless steel I have ever seen. It stains instantly and for ever. I had another Zhjirushi for more than a decade and it was fantastic. But something has happened over the last 10 years, their quality has really gotten bad</review_text>
Not as addd says its just a sheet of material that comes it must be cut to fit and is not ehat one would maybe want to do!</review_text>
This vacuum worked the first time I used it, but that was the only time.  With the amount of noise it makes, you would hope that it would be removing dirt from the floor.  However, what it appears to be doing is using its rotating bristles to redistribute the dirt in a thinner more homogenous layer.If you are looking for a machine to use as a sound effect prop for a jet engine, this is the one for you</review_text>
I bought this coffee maker with great faith in the Krups name -- willing to order online without the "touch factor" -- I was sorely disappointed.  WHile the concept seems promising, the actual product is a failure.  The carafe is awkward and you have to fiddle with it every time to pour your coffee.  And, the handle simply came off after just 6 months of normal use (a.m. coffee only).  And there is no way to fix it as the bolts are lodged inside and can't be accessed.  An expensive mistake and to think I'd looked to Krups to solve my problem of having to replace coffee makers every six months or so.  Don't waste your money and I personally will avoid the Krups brand from now on.</review_text>
The fan does work fairly well as an intake fan.  However, in exhaust mode (the mode I need), I can barely feel a breeze from either side of the unit.  It simply doesn't work as an exhaust fan.  Therefore, to accurately describe the fan it may be a 2,470 cfm intake fan and it is about a 2 cfm exhaust fan.  I'm returning it.  By the way, the packing slip from "Air-n-Water" states that a 15% restocking fee that applies to all returns.  I am very unhappy with the fan and will be extremely unhappy with "Air-n-Water" if they try to hit me with a restocking fee</review_text>
Alas, this had no discernable effect on my cats.  However, the product arrived in good time and in good shape</review_text>
I WAS DISAPPOINTED WHEN IT ARRIVED IN PIECES.  THEY DIDN'T PACK THIS WELL AND I HAD TO SEND IT BACK.  I WAS IMPRESSED BY THE FREE RETURN POSTAGE. I DO WANT THIS ITEM AND HAVE REQUESTED ANOTHER.  HOPEFULLY IT WILL ARRIVE IN ONE PIECE THIS TIME.  THEN IT MIGHT BE WORTH MORE STARS</review_text>
After 6 weeks of waiting, customer service said it was going to be another 3 weeks!  Forget it!  Cancelled order</review_text>
I previously had a chrome wine stopper purchased from another store, but it was damaged by falling into an active garbage disposal, so I bought these as replacements.  The previous stopper had a thick rubber part that created the seal.  The rubber sections on these are so thin that they didn't even seal the wine bottle I first tried them on.  All three stoppers in the set had the same problem.Oxygen and leakage are death to a wine, so a stopper that doesn't seal is worse than just replacing the cork</review_text>
I was VERY disappointed in this item.  I own the Farberware 8 quart pot that this insert is supposed to fit inside, but when I set the insert into the pot, it didn't fit!  The insert handles - which are plastic - sit on the metal side of the 8 quart pot (that can't be good), and the little "feet" on the insert may or may not touch the bottom of the pot.  The ridge around the insert, which I assumed would hold the insert in place in the 8 quart pot, don't fit on any part of the Farberware 8 quart pot! Has Farberware changed the diameter of their Classic 8-quart pot? If I was trying to fit a non-Farberware item into my Farberware pot, I would have had no complaints.  But my 8-quart pot AND the 8-quart insert were both Farberware Classic pieces.  Believe it or not, I had a Cusinart pot which the insert fit, i.e., the ridge held the insert in place, so I'll use it with that pot, but the insert sits some three inches above the bottom of the Cuisinart pot, so when I cook, the boiling water seeps over.  Very very disappointing.  If I'd bought this item from a local store, I would definitely have returned it</review_text>
I received this blender for x-mas last year.  It has some nice design features (good heavy base to prevent tipping, measuring cup built into the cap).  However, I experienced the same problems that others here have -- the blender doesn't do well with anything thick like milkshakes.  It just shoves everything against the sides of the pitcher and spins helplessly, forcing you to stop and manual stir everything back towards the blades and restart.  While it worked OK for a while, the cutter unit mysteriously jammed after about 9 months</review_text>
2 years ago I purchased these dishes,  I was so happy with them  that I would of given them a 5 star....Until 6 months ago.  All of a sudden my dinner plates are breaking in half (these dishes are microwave safe, and no children) all have broken in the same place... 2 broke when picking up, 4 have broken while microwavingyet all my cups,bowls,salad,square plates are still in perfect condition.. But without my dinner plates, my set(s) are useless!!</review_text>
We've had this set for about 3 years and after about a year they began to chip and/or crack.  They are beautiful and affordable, but they just do not last.  I had two plates crack in half in the microwave.  A mug handle break off as I slowly turned it in the dishwasher rack.  It's too bad because I really liked this set</review_text>
One of the plate I bought broken during a 50 seconds medium heat  microwaving, so I doubt it is really good for microwave. When I called Lenox, their rep. simply asked if I want to order a replacement from them as if the bad quality was not their problem. Disguesting.The design pattern was nice though</review_text>
I have to admit that I love this set. Especially since I found it hard to find white flannel sheets. Most have some ridiculous pattern on it like snowflakes or snowmen! So when I found these and at this price I was quite happy. They feel great, not the best flannel but nice all the same. But after washing it 3 times within one month the fabric really weakened and the flat sheet tore. Later the fitted started getting holes. So since this was rather cheap I am not horribly sad about it. So if you are looking for comfy warm sheets for one season and then want a selection of rags for the rest of the year for housecleaning, this is the set for you</review_text>
I returned this item because it was too big for the Brother ES2000 sewing machine I bought.  It was very bulky and took up way too much room.  The machine rattled inside the case and slipped around. It would probably be better for a larger machine</review_text>
Do not bother to buy this sewing machine case.  It is crappy!  Don't be fooled by the "Universal" phrase of this product.  I have a Brother sewing machine so i bought this item. When i got it, i placed my sewing machine and i rattles around inside the case.  I don't see what is so "Universal" about this.  There is too much room inside and my machine tips over to its sides when i lift to carry the case.  It's terrible!!!  I'd give NO star but i don't have that choice on the selection.  I wanted to return it but it's not worth the shipping charge that will incure on my refund due to Amazon's policies.  By then i would probably only get at most $12.00 back in refunds</review_text>
I just don't like this item. Got it as a wedding gift and have hardly used it because it sucks, plain and simple. Don't buy. There are others out there that are better. NOT KitchenAid quality here!!!</review_text>
I find it hard to give this even a 1-star. Given the price, I really thought this would perform to the praise of the other reviewers. Here's why I am sorely disappointed:1) the &quot;stainless&quot; steel does in fact rust and corrode2) the rimmed bottom tray has no drains, no openings, so obviously no incline so water just sits and stagnates, and if you live in warm climates will in fact start to mildew3) check your water softness, because if your water is too hard it will leave calcium and other deposits which require DAILY cleaning otherwise it will be very unsightly</review_text>
I searched for what I thought would be a great dish rack.  This is without a doubt the worst product I have ever bought!  There is nothing stainless about this!  I have had it for only about 4 months and it is already rusting.  It was so not worth the money I paid for it.  I would not recommend buying this product</review_text>
We bought a well-reviewed carpet vacuum from Amazon last year, and absolutely love it. After that positive experience, we were looking for something for our kitchen, bathroom and hallway floors and came upon this cleaner.Starting with the dry vac part, that seems to get smallish pieces of dirt fine, but anything Cheerio sized or larger it pushes around on the floor unless you lean the vacuum back. Which would be fine, but if you lean it back too far, there is a suction filter thing (made for the wet vac part) that sticks and you have to turn off the vacuum and wait about 10 seconds for the suction to release that piece before you can continue. Anyway, the small dirt and dust are really picked up quite well, but if any of you have small children (we have 3 boys under 6), don't have any expectations of this getting up mealtime messes.Now, onto the wet vac part, which was the main reason we got this. Very disappointing. We used the included cleaner, warm tap water, etc as the directions indicated, and both my wife and I swear the floor is no cleaner than when we started. It doesn't look cleaner, shine more or even have a nice smell that we could even close our eyes and pretend it was clean. Spills or stains that normally take 1-3 passes with a mop are taking 8-12 passes with this machine. We bought this to save time and/or get cleaner floors, and I can honestly say that this machine did not do either.As briefly noted above, if you have children, do not expect clean floors out of this, and I can't recommend this at all. This product may be suitable for people who have no children, no pets and only small dust particles and light traffic; I just know this isn't our house</review_text>
Doesn't whistle as it is supposed to, handle get's very hot (I have a gas stove)</review_text>
I have been looking for a good cheese plane, and this one isn't it.  It works fine for rubbery semi-soft cheeses like swiss, but not for harder cheese like cheddar, which tend to crrumble before I can finish a slice.  The problem is that the plane it too thick and rigid.  It should be thin and flexible.Also, don't let the name fool you.  This utensil is made in China, a country which consumes very little cheese</review_text>
The heater works fine, but these heaters can leak oil all over your carpet. DeLonghi would not do anything because it was beyond the warranty period. I will not buy an oil-filled heater again</review_text>
I spent about 20 minutes trying to ascertain how much this item cost, but to no avail whatsoever!  I'm so frustrated after such a lengthy, yet futile search that I want to hurt someone!  Instead, I'm shutting down my browser.  You idiots should think about how many more sales you'd make if you just included a price, for God's sake!</review_text>
I have four 16-piece sets that I received for my wedding.  They are beautiful plates, but they have a tendency to split in half with normal use - like heating food up in the microwave, going through the dishwasher or serving hot food.Within 3 months, several plates cracked down the middle, making them unusable.  A large serving bowl also split in half when hot food was added.  I did a search on www.epinions.com and found I wasn't the only person having these problems.  EVERYONE is having these problems.Plus, it is impossible to find individual replacement pieces.  You have to buy another set.  What a racket.  The clincher is that they are located in Indonesia, so customer service and responsiveness is nonexistent.  I've gotten nothing but the international run-around</review_text>
I heard about the lids and hoped that they would be a good alternative to plastic wrap. I even bought two for gfts.  But they didn't live up to my expectations.  The large size didn't even fit on standard size bowls and the small one didn't fit on small bowls.  I would return them except that I threw out the original packaging.  I don't recommend this product</review_text>
I am not a coffee connoisseur, so my criteria for a good coffee maker is probably modest. I bought the KA Javastudio because I own several KA appliances and have always been pleased. Although, the KA 10-cup is pricey, I felt that buying a thermal carafe represented an upgrade from my previous glass carafe. I also figured that the wide spray mechanism might mean a richer cup of coffee. I did as much research as I could, reading reviews and looking at available coffee makers in my area. After trying out our new KA yesterday, my husband and I were both disappointed in its functionality and performance.  Here are some points to consider about this product:1.  The KA 10-cup makes 4 1/4 oz cups.  In other words, if you're looking for 8 ounce servings, the most this will make is about 5 real cups of coffee.2.  The thermal carafe is heavy.  If you're planning on keeping this on your counter - and possibly under a cabinet, it is a tug to pull it out each time you use it to pour water in the back.3.  There is no way to figure out the water level in the tank.  The directions say to use the optional white water filter insert.4.  For us at least, taste-wise, there is no discernible difference between what the KA brewed and what we've tolerated with our old coffee maker.Good luck with your search for a more perfect coffee maker.</review_text>
While cute, this little pan is difficult to use. There's no room to use a spatula, so you'd better like the eggs cooked through - you can't flip for over easy, and the egg white is too deep to do sunny-side up. Also the handle gets hot and the little plastic egg bit is not enough to grip, so you have to use a potholder. Plus, it's so small that it won't fit any normal-sized burner - another burn risk to your fingers</review_text>
I received the set in the mail, and immediately noticed that the contents inside were damaged.  I returned the item to Amazon, who issued a prompt refund.  It appears that the persons handling these fragile items aren't very cautious, so I would advise against buying this.  Amazon was great with a prompt refund, though</review_text>
THESE RINGS ARE MUCH TOO BIG  AND TOO LIGHTLY MADE FOR EGG MUFFINS AND THE EGGS SPILL OUT THE BOTTOM OF THE RINGS. TOTAL JUNK. DON'T WASTE YOUR MONEY ON THESE RING</review_text>
I have been very disappointed in this product.  If I could return them, I would.  I purchased this product because a friend of mine has some polycarbonate wine glasses which she has had for several years and that still look like new.  She even washes them in the dishwasher.  I have only had these for about 6 weeks and have only used them about 4-5 times.  Each time I have hand washed them, but they are very cloudy and I am embarrassed to use them.  I would not recommend them</review_text>
Never got it to work.  All i get when I hit the on/tare button is "- - - -"In the trash it goes</review_text>
sheets are full of wrinkles after being washed,not as soft as when new,and not the qualiy i anticipated</review_text>
The sewing machine, is built very cheaply, does not even sew correctly, I understand i didnot pay that much, but to feel you really are just ripping people off,its an item i ended up throwing out, for it just took up space</review_text>
This is not even a toy.  DO NOT waste your money on this item.  Amazon will charge you to send it back which is what most will do if you expect even the lowest standards in a "quick" machine.  Nothing about this machine functions well.  Never got an even stitch or a complete row of stitches.  Amazon should not carry this item, it has lowered the quality of Amazon's products in my view</review_text>
This is not a 2 quart sauce pan, it is 2.5 quarts, exactly the same as the one that comes with the se</review_text>
Worst product ever...don't know how it passed through initial testing.  When you turn the crank to dispense cereal, it crushes it and sprays it ALL OVER the room.  Awful, just awful.  Too embarrassed to even give it away so put it in the trash.  Waste of money and space.  And we tried dog food, which is too hard for it to crush so it just got stuck.  Really made me angry that I wasted the money.  False advertising.</review_text>
I purchased four of these shot glasses. Of the four, one has tiny bubbles throughout, one has black specs in the glass, one has a bulge in the glass, and the last is taller than the other three.The shape is beautiful, but with all the imperfections, I'd recommend something else.My most disappointing Bodum purchase ever</review_text>
I read the two other bad reviews here and just bought 9 of these anyway. I was stupid.  I had bought one in the past and have had it for a few months.  That one is great and has held up after multiple washings.  It is still so soft.  So I just didn't belive the two bad reviews.I WAS WRONG.  The bad reviews are correct.I took these new 9 out of the box yesterday.   They are not of the same quality of the one I already have.  They are packed at least 3 different ways.  I think maybe some of them are someone else's defective returns.I don't think these are first quality.  There are MANY snags.  There is at least one blue stain.  One looks like it was defective and then repaired sloppily. The quality of the construction is not good.  Some are soft, some are rough.I returned all 9.DO NOT BUY</review_text>
First off, this is available at the Ewins site for $30, should you decide to plunge.The construction of the wooden parts is pretty nice, better than what you'd expect for $50, but that's about the only positive thing. The hardware is terrible and they only ship as many as you "need", so you're kind of SOL when the crappy aluminum cams break. I'm sure they'd send some more if I asked, but for now my piece is hanging out, half way assembled because I'm scared of breaking any more of the hardware. Either way, I think I'm going to ditch the cam/bolt paradigm and use wood glue and screws to finish it up.The instructions consist of an exploded diagram that looks like it was blown up from an image on the web. If you've never built flat pack furniture before you will not be able to figure it out. Even if you have, you will put something together incorrectly and have to disassemble the piece</review_text>
It's a beautiful mug (we've bought 2) but it drips, doesn't keep the temperature, it's a nightmare to clean and it's not higienic - unbelievable bad product</review_text>
The concept was great. But after only a month or so, flaws started showing. The inserts started bending and warping, seperating at the edges and cracking. I purchased them for my Mother who gave them to my Daughter as a gift. She loved the idea, but will go back to the wooden boards because I don't think these will be around long. And they were not cheap either</review_text>
we had a heated pad for years that finally played out. it was wonderful. wanting to spend less this time than i did for the first one, i bought this item. i wish i had never put it on the bed so i could have returned it. i was suspect when i opened it. poor quality material. poor bed fit. very very warm on the lowest setting. after 3 sleepless nights of feeling the wires, which are quite large, in my ribs--it had to come off. i had rather be cold and i hate being cold</review_text>
It's fairly cheap looking, but it does the job. The razor holders cannot hold my Gillette Mach III Turbo razor, it slips out</review_text>
Ordered this at my wife's request.  She's tried cleaning silver earrings--run multiple cycles--added detergent as suggested.  It just doesn't clean.  An old toothbrush and toothpaste works much better.  A very disappointing piece of junk</review_text>
I loved this blender while it was working.  I mostly used it to make smoothies with frozen fruit.  I love that it has seamless buttons so food can't get caught in little cracks.  I rarely used the food processor.After about 11 months, mine also started to smell like it was catching fire - however, it was the black piece in the bottom of the blending jar, which was basically being "Shaved" by the base motor.  I had to order a replacement "blender cutting assembly" from the Cuisinart website for $15 with shipping, only to have it happen again.Plus, it was a pain to clean - the base threading didn't match up well with the jar and screwing and unscrewing the base was often difficult.  We've replaced the blender with another brand but I have kept the bottom motor part for the processor</review_text>
My mother-in-law and I both had this blender. Hers broke in a couple of months. I was lucky that mine lasted a couple of years. It is a great blender for crushing ice for smoothies/icees, etc., however it has a flaw that the piece that the pitcher sits on when it spins is made out of plastic. It eventually cracks from the heat/friction produced. I bought the Oster Beehive blender to replace it, and it has a metal piece beneath it and I have had it for a few years now with no problem. I am even happier with the Oster Beehive blender, as it is a much better quality blender which will last a lot longer than the Cuisinart one (it was also cheaper), and it crushes ice exactly as good if not better than the Cuisinart blender</review_text>
Poor workmanship, rusted inside of chrome cover (is it really chrome with rust on it), very poor construction of the rubber piece and is smells like rubber.I really don't want to smell rubber in my closet.</review_text>
Beware! On off switch broke machine would not cut off unless unplugged. The place they recommended based on my zip code still has my vacuum and it's been about 2 weeks. :-</review_text>
Heavy machine, looked durable, almost commercial. Put her together and began. Within 5 MINUTES of use the belt for the rotating brush burned up and the brush no longer rotated! Returned it the following day and bought a Bissel that has worked great, was cheaper and weighs less!</review_text>
The stool is great as far as it's ability to function.  It is quite thin which makes it easy to store.  It does have a safety issue!!!!! My 3 year old son got his finger pinched when we were adjusting it to push it together.  I almost got my finger pinched as well on more than one occassion.  My husband welded it together and now it remains in the open position thus, no more pinched fingers.  I would think twice before purchasing this one if you have toddlers around.  I was right there when  my son pinched his finger and it was difficult to open the stool back up to release his finger</review_text>
If this is in a jade or perhaps brick...other earth colors, let me know. why waste everyone's time with such a lame description</review_text>
We got this as a present and had high hopes to actually use it as a microwave. It takes over 7 minutes to warm something up and forget about making microwave popcorn it just doesn't pop the kernals. Overall lots of features but it's the worst microwave I've ever owned</review_text>
To us, typical Fiestaware pieces have great design, color, durability and functioning wrapped up all-in-one. We ordered a set of Turquoise Candlesticks and were disappointed because the candlestick openings are very disparate in size and shape and it was obvious if one chose to use candles it would be a task to insert them properly with &quot;straight candle&quot; results.  Even more disappointing was the quality of the color application to the product.  Specifically, the lack of even color application to the scrollwork and edges of the bases plus around the edges of the openings for the candles.  We were sent a replacement set which had even more color variation but the openings for the candles were shaped somewhat better.  We are returning both sets because they are not pleasing to view due to the shaping and color variations.  Fiestaware can have a color variation that is subtle and uniform, a kind of &quot;softer&quot; look in the color application around the rims on plates, for example, and the piece will still look beautiful.  We don't want to pay for a product that is not as pleasing to the eye as the rest of our Fiestaware products far exceed the quality of these pieces</review_text>
this item arrived with a broken tank, and 1 week later quit making mist at al</review_text>
Checked online comparing many models and purchased one two years ago, worked great all winter. Decided to purchase a second last year year, both worked great all winter last year. Unfortunatly this year neither works, despite cleaning and following all instructions. Guess the quality is put into them just enough to last though the warranty period. Junk, dont buy.</review_text>
I bought two of these humidifiers. One for work and one for home. They both broke in the first week</review_text>
I bought two of these and within 3 days of each other they both stopped putting out any moisture. What a waste of my time and effort</review_text>
my Holmes humidifer was broken (no mist) after 3 months.  I did send it with a check of $7 more than 2 months ago, and haven't receive information from Holmes.I emailed to ask my case and they tried to fool around.I am desperate!Very bad product and bad service!  I never buy Holmes product again</review_text>
This is a great idea, but I think it might need more tweaking. The reservoir holds a lot of water, which is good, but there is no filter. So any cat hair, stray food, or whatever your 18-month-old might be trying to throw will end up in the bowl. Then it sits there, usually after sinking to the bottom, until you dig it out. Also, with mine at least, you had to fiddle with it and fiddle with it to get any real bubbles to appear. A shame, since the cat really did like the few bubbles I was able to coax out.If this somehow filtered the water AND made bubbles, I'd be all over it (like cat hair on a pastel couch)</review_text>
I bought this unit because the humidity in my apartment on extremely dry days and nights was 15-20%.  The Air-O-Swiss 7135 was rated top by every web site I visisted and researced before buying this product.  It is also rated to work in rooms up to 600 square feet, and the biggest room in my apartment is less than 500.  Well to summerize:- hygrostat consistently says 25% even though my bedside hygo says 15%.  The best I can get out of this machine is 30% humidity according to my own hygostat, as the one built into the unit does not move past 25%.-  the above situation is in the smallest room in my home, which is 170 square feet, so the 600 square feet rating is totally not true.To close, please be ware that this unit does not work for extremely dry apartments and homes like mine.  The other reviews must be in homes that are already at 30-40% humidity.  This is not worth the money you pay for it.  I will try running it non-stop for a few days to see if it helps, but if not then this unti will be going back.</review_text>
I have several other pieces in this collection which I absolutely love. When I was able to find the salad server set at Amazon.com for a cheaper price, I couldn't wait to order it. When it came, I was more than disappointed. The set looked like it had either been 100 years old and was all tarnished (which it is not supposed to ever do), or someone had bought it, tried to clean it with a polish (again, something that is not supposed to be done) and it wore away the finish. I also bought the medium size bowl to go with the salad server set, and when that came, it was all scratched! Needless to say, I returned both for a full refund immediately. Obviously, the cheaper price meant cheaper quality in this case...and it wasn't dirt cheap to begin with, I still had paid $75.00 for it, compared to $150.00 that it is sold in stores for</review_text>
Wouldn't you think that the manufacturers of a wine rack would measure the bottles of wine before designing the rack ?Apparently not, in this case. After purchasing 3 of these racks, I discovered that about 10% of my 200 bottle collection doesn't fit in the grid holes. It was understood that magnums weren't going to fit, which was no big deal. But when over 20 bottles end up sitting on the floor because they are about 1/8" to 1/4" too large in diameter I get a little irritated, especially after paying over $300 including shipping.The overall quality of the product is average.  The racks were not straight along their length and had to be tie-wired together to keep them in alignment.</review_text>
I am SO disappointed with this vacuum!  I will say, it does wonderfully for picking up all that dust and little bits of dirt that get into your carpet, but don't expect it to pick up anything that is big enough to be visible to the human eye!  Also, I have a cat - so I have pet fur on my carpet... AND I lose a lot of hair myself, and this vacuum doesn't pick any of that up... I can vacuum, run my hand over the carpet afterwards and come up with a handful of human and cat hair.It would be useful if you are just looking for something to get the dust and such out of the carpet... it seems to do that very well, though you are having to constantly stop and empty the vacuum, shake the filter out, etc, because it gets clogged VERY fast</review_text>
I bought this item about 6 months ago. After 2 months the handle fell off. On phoning the company, they said plastic parts were only guaranteed for 1 month, hence they would not replace it. After another 2 months, the unit stopped working altogether. I then got in touch with the company and managed to speak to a very rude customer service representative, who said I would have to send it to the company and pay for shipping and handling myself, yet it says in the handbook that the company would pay for the shipping. I am truely disappointed with the lack of customer care and the appliance. I do believe I have a faulty appliance but the compnay is not at all bothered to keep its customers happy. I do not reccomend that anyone buy this item, save your money and all the hastle</review_text>
I bought this about  two years ago and it never worked very good for me. The handle doesn't stay together very good and it doesn't pick up much. I wouldn't recommend this sweeper to anyone. Don't waste your money on it</review_text>
This is a Lemon/Lime Press. The Oranges in China must be real small, so if your planning on pressing Oranges make sure they are small and forget about Grapefruit</review_text>
Gaggia used to be the cat's meow in espresso. They have lost the bubble in the last ten years. Many other machines do more, are easier to use, and produce better cups in an easier manner. i still have my old Gaggia, but now rely on a Saeko in my home. The difference is obvious</review_text>
It is best to invest a few more dollars and purchase a better itemLight and not providing the warmth expected from this price level.Feels incomplet</review_text>
I was so excited to receive such a beautiful pan for Xmas. However, if my experience today is representative of how this pan performs, I won't be using it often.The literature which comes with the pan describes it as pre-seasoned, and the recipe included instructs for the bread to be brushed with olive oil but mentions no prep for the pan except to heat it over low to medium heat. On the first try I had some cheese burn onto the pan and the bread seemed to cling stubbornly in spots, though I was able to get it to release with a pancake turner. The scorched cheese was very difficult to scrub off, even with soaking for awhile.On the second try I oiled the pan and the press and carefully oiled the bread, so as to not have any bare spots. I still had sticking! Ditto for clean up.This thing weighs a ton, too. It is awkward to transfer off the burner; the instructions warn "lift, do not slide" on a glass top stove.I think I'll continue to use my non-stick griddle with a cast iron pan on top for a press. That always works great!</review_text>
Sigh. Was so excited to receive this item and it arrived today via UPS in pieces. I should have heeded the previous reviewer's warning. Doh! Oh well. Live and learn. Live and learn. Refund, please</review_text>
When this fountain is freshly cleaned, the cats love it.  The water does stay cool.  But cat hair -- lots of THAT around here -- clogs the pump, and if the whole thing is not taken apart and completely cleaned with a toothbrush weekly, it grows slime.  Eeeeuuuw.  The first pump lasted about three months, then the replacement lasted about a month. Not really worth it, because the picky fussy cat would really rather drink from the toilet anyway.</review_text>
This appliance has several good features, but they are outweighted by the fact that it does not produce a decent piece of toast.  At the lowest setting one side of the toast comes out too brown, the other side barely toasted.  The inner side of the bread toasts faster than the outer side. We did manage to get a decent piece of toast by inserting the bread, setting a timer for 1 minute, pressing cancel, reversing the bread, and slowly counting to thirty before pressing cancel again.  Far too much work</review_text>
First of all the item is too small.  it is about 1/3 the lenght of a pair pants and 1/3 as wide.  So as you can see it is pretty small.  So it is a lot of moving around and adjusting which causes previously ironed parts to become wrinkled again.It does not make life easier.   good in principle but does not work.</review_text>
when i first put this on i thought hey i can't smell it anymore.  well that illusion only lasted a day and the odor came back.  i repeated it, letting it dry in between as directed, until the bottle was empty and it still smells.  this just wasted my time</review_text>
It doesn't zap the yap of our newly adopted Pomeranian mix.  Although we have seen her jump once or twice and it appeared to be the zap that did it, but it didn't slow her down much.  We did everything according to directions, and even shaved a spot on her neck to help make better contact.  We have used the shock trainer collar on our mastiff mix and it worked extremely well.  I'm disappointed with this bark collar though</review_text>
We bought the PetSafe collar for small dogs who bark entirely too much.  It is made of a rigid plastic in a round shape that will not conform to the neck of any of our 3 Maltese.  This particular collar is meant to stay on the voice box area or it won't work.  Unfortunately, because it's rigid, it slides up a dog's neck very easily.  I have worked with fabric and then with foam rubber trying to pad the sides so it can't slide.  Even when I can barely get a bit of fingertip between the prong and neck so that it feels too snug and is also snug on the sides, it only takes minutes for it to start sliding out of position.  A shrug, a shake, or simply walking a few steps is all it takes.  This is a one piece molded plastic unit and for our dogs, is not going to work.  It should also be noted that if you have a nuisance barker who barks at any sound or sight, it may be effective but if you have a dog that barks at a family member, this is NOT a good solution as a shock collar may well result in more problems.  The dog now has another negative association to the person.  Consult a trainer or behaviorist before buying.F. Quall</review_text>
I had one of the originals...with the vaneer look.  --Ugly yes, but it was actually very sturdy & well made.  Unfortunately, it got lost in a move.Then I purchased the newer one.  It just wasn't as good of quality & the latch section cracked on me on the fourth or fifth use!  Garbage!Pay more $ on a Cuisenart or Delongi...you'll be happier.</review_text>
This waterer is a great concept, but does have some drawbacks.  For starters, one of my dogs is scared to death of it and wont come near it because when the water level in the bowl gets low it gurgles just like a water cooler at work.  The first time it happened she was drinking out of it and it freaked her out and now wont go near it.  The other dog is just fine with it, but then again he's deaf, so the gurgle doesn't bother him. lol. The other issue i had with this is just like all water bowls, it gets dirty.  so you still have to clean it as often as you would any other water bowl, but it's a bit more cumbersome having to take the big jug off, clean the bowl and but the jug back on.  So, if your dog isn't afraid of the noise it makes and you don't mind the extra hassle cleaning it, it's great.  Otherwise, just get a large bowl; that's what i ended up having to do</review_text>
Disappointing at bestI was truly disappointed in this item. After purchasing it we followed the directions  for conditioning the non-stick grids both before using it for the first time as well as  before each use as listed in the "use and care guide."It sounds simple enough. Wait for the green indicator light to come on, add the batter close but do not latch the lid. The green light will go off, when it comes back on the waffle is ready. The only problem is the waffles were burnt and were stuck to the lid as though glued in place with epoxy glue. The waffles ripped into pieces when trying to get them loose from the maker and they also tasted like burnt toast crusts.We said  "Well, OK, maybe it just needs a couple of waffles cooked in it  before they start to come out right."  7 sheets of waffles later they were still coming out as bad as the first.The price is great, the design is nice, the over all appearances are wonderful but it simply does not work, at least not for us.I told my wife I would take it back to the store and exchange it. She said, "don't you dare bring another one of those things home with you."It's to bad too, we both love waffles.</review_text>
I bought this cleaner for use in between major vacuuming.  It clogs very quickly without having swept up very much.  It is probably fine for floors without carpet</review_text>
I returned the item because it fell apart as I was attempting to put it together - cheap, compressed wood by-products and card board.  Even though I did receive a full refund after it was returned, I would not recommend it to anyone else.  I was able to find a solid wood and better made shelf from another vendor</review_text>
The knife is constructed well - as pictured - does not cut very well.  It just was not very sharp.  I tried mincing some vegetables - it just didn't work as well as my $9.99 serrated TV info knife.  I was disappointed</review_text>
I am sure there is a lesson in my experience.  I fist purchased the salt and pepper grinding mill balls and found the  salt/pepper did not go where I wanted it.  I also found that in order to get a reasonable amount out of the grinder I had to select the maximum coarse setting and over a period of six months the efficiency became so bad I finally threw them away.  Based on a salesmans advise I purchased the dual grinder thinking my problems might be isolated to the shape of the feed tube.  I am sad to say that I again found it's performance to be a big disappointment</review_text>
This pan was a bargain that turned out to be overpriced. I have a number of Farberware pans that have served me well, but this one came out of the box warped. The first time I put it on the range top it was rocking like crazy, with only one strip through the center that made contact. I could return it, but for $10 it is not worth the argument with Amazon about restocking fees. So after one use it is now washed and packed up in the GoodWill box. I would never use it again.</review_text>
First of all, it's expensive ($60).  Kitchen Kaboodle sells the SAME EXACT one for $29.99.  I tried to return it to the company and found out they're located in Canada so it was going to cost me another $25.00 for shipping.  Due to shipping, I was forced to keep it.  HUGE RIP OFF!!  It is good quality but go to Kitchen Kaboodle for half the cost!</review_text>
I bought myself one of these and used it minimally and was happy.  I then bought one for my daughter.  She used it about 5 times in a little over a year and it quit.  The blade assembly as per other reviews.  It is going to cost about $50. to repair.  Now mine is smelling.  I am using my old 15 year old Oster and it is still working.  Also to my surprise it is doing a better job.  Just not as pretty.  I have KA stand mixer, hand blender, food processors large and small, emersion blender and attachments for all.  Love all of them.  Will buy other KA but not this again</review_text>
with an old coffee can.  True it doesn't have the "odor free" aspect, but if you are scooping a litter box there is going to be odor.  I just keep the can by the box and dump it in the trash when full.  Same deal.</review_text>
oversized is a big word for these towels and the quality of the cotton used is very low. I washed them once and they already shrank. What is worse is that they keep loosing pieces of cotton. After I dry with them, I have to spend 5 minutes getting rid of cotton bits stuck on my skin. Definitely a disappointing product even for its low pric</review_text>
This red-and-white cutting board looks attractive and helps brighten up the kitchen counter.  However, it arrived warped, so that I really can only use one side (the board slides around on the counter when I flip it over)</review_text>
I find it more than a bit ridiculous that Pur charges 40 dollars for their product and 20 - 25 dollars for their replacement filters.  I have owned 3 Pur sink mounted water filters and every one of them has ended up in the garbage within the first year of use.  Why?  Because they begin to leak at the faucet connection and this leak grows progressively worse over time.  Tightening the unit does not help and in fact may make the leak worse.  Removing and reinstalling the unit does not help.  I have become so frustrated by Pur water products that I will never again purchase anything made by them.  I just installed a Brita filter on my sink a couple of days ago and no problems yet and even if any do occur the Brita is more reasonably priced at up to 15 dollars cheaper for the sink mounted unit.  Do yourself a favor and avoid this over-priced piece of junk at all costs</review_text>
I am totally dissatisfy with this product and this is damn waste of money. Brita base was working for just 2 week initially and now I able to get a water from filter but there is no light glowing either green or red. The base was showing red flash light on end of first week for the first new filter which suppose to come upto atleast 2 months.I recommed you all... DONT BUY IT</review_text>
LOUSY!!!!  The handle design makes the Cuisipro grater extremely difficult to hold.  There is a BIG space between the drum and the hopper and big pieces of cheese fall through. I grate a lot of cheese, and I am sorry I bought THIS grater</review_text>
This tool is very poorly made. When grating cheese the handle tended to twist in the hand making it difficult to control and causing discomfort.With medium pressure during use, caused the drum to dent!Returned Cuisipro grater.Strongly dissatisified! Looks good, but a piece of junk</review_text>
If you're looking for a car harness that will keep your dog safe in an accident, keep looking...This harness might work to prevent your dog from bouncing around the car and possibly distracting the driver (although I'm not even confident it would hold up for that use with a big, strong dog) but I seriously doubt it would hold up even in a mild collision.The dog is held in place using a few plastic buckles/snaps which are not even very strong-looking-- I have seen stronger snaps on regular dog collars. Plastic snaps like these would not hold up to the forces created in a collision.If you want a safety harness that will protect your dog in an accident, look for one that has actually been tested/rated similar to human car safety devices</review_text>
It seems that there is always something crappy in a good design. The pot does a good job perking coffee, but the lid and the glass top are bad and enough to void the use of the pot. I think that Melitta should send out, for nothing the glass top. I am like the other reviews, I would not buy another Melitta product unless they make good on this pot. There is a danger of the top blowing out and Melitta could be in for law suits</review_text>
We got this rice cooker as a Christmas gift. We've tried cooking rice in it three times, and all three times the rice has burned. It simply gets too hot. Like some of the other reviewers, we added more and more water, but it didn't help. The cooker finally does kick into "warm" mode, but by then it's too late. We were thrilled when we realized it was non-stick, but what good is non-stick when the rice is scorched beyond edible</review_text>
My little 2 years boy is crazy about thomas & friends....his  bedroom was decorated with thomas....but the Drapes is very low quality material looks like drapes sold at dollar stores for $3.99 no soft is like when  you use ironing starch.... i left only 1 start because matching with the bedding!I used only one pair with denim drapes liner under to block-out light....because I opened- package the other set i send back to Amazon.I do not recommend this product ....and if your boy likes dark room to sleep do not buy!!!....I bought Pottery Barn THIN WALE Corduroy panels are excellent light material and block-out light</review_text>
We bought the scale for starting Weight watchers but it does not do  weights in fractions i.e. 1/4 lb etc. Also it was not as pictured. The look of the scale(in the photo)was appealing because of the retro look with the red dial, ours came with a black dial which is just plane boring.Average thought...its just an average scale and nothing more</review_text>
I loved this while it worked.  This worked great for the first 2 times we used it.  After that it wouldn't work.  It has a 6 month warranty so I am in the process of getting if fixed.</review_text>
I dont recoment you to buy this product. I dont under stand why they made i</review_text>
As others have stated the gears are plastic and will fail after 1 to 2 years, and no replacement parts to fix, so the can opener has to trashed</review_text>
its a throw. like a blanket. i would have been better off with a pretty cutain to think of it. it would be better than what i wasted my money on.  also dont wash this with anything else. the die leaks</review_text>
They sent me a BLUE Hudson Jacquard Diamond Love Seat Slipcover 3 times. I gave up after the 3rd time. What really sux is that they did send the Olive sofa cover!!! So now they don't match!!!</review_text>
I bought this for my mom and had it sent to her address.  It worked for two days and then it stopped.  On my last visit I fiddled with it for an hour, but it only worked intermittently.  She didn't keep the receipt so I'm writing it off as a waste of money.  When you think about it the inexpensive Softsoap brand push pump dispensers make more sense.  You can see when they are empty and you don't have to keep up with batteries.  I don't buy the argument that the hands-free dispenser is more sanitary than the hand pumps because after you touch the hand pump you wash your hands</review_text>
because just around the 60 day mark, the chime turned into a terrible noise like something dying.  I just turned that feature off and continued enjoying the dispenser, but a month later (3 months after original purchase), the thing is spewing soap non-stop.  Wasted lots of soap this way.  Changing the batteries didn't help.  Soap just flows out until there's none left.  To maintain some customer satisfaction, Sharper Image should consider backing their products with a better return policy or providing some better quality control</review_text>
This is the last item I will ever purchase from Sharper Image...it broke the second week I had it...spewing hand soap at will and not when I placed my hand under the infrared sensor.  It's pure crap.  Stay away!!</review_text>
I purchased this set of spoons because they are narrow and can fit into any number of spice jars.  I also wanted them because they are hinged and nest inside of each other & take up little space.  After first use, the pin fell out and the spoons became unhinged.  I tried to reassemble and the pin keeps falling out - wouldn't recommend</review_text>
The lower bowl part will last forever but the water tank lasts a month outside. Between the sun and cold air, the plastic get weak right away and the slightest touch will crack the top. I have gone through 3 of them. All with exactly the same results.</review_text>
A very impressive looking oven. The temperature dial did not reflect the actual internal temperature of the oven by 50 to 75 degrees. Once I got that sorted out, the oven worked well about 20 times. Then the motor started to sputter on and off. Burning electrical odor filled the air and an arcing sound could be heard. While it worked, it worked well. I do not know if the defect is common or rare. I tested only one oven</review_text>
I have been looking for one of these for a couple of weeks.  For the price, I thought it would work great.  First, It was the size of a salt shaker (did not read description well enough).  Second, upon first use while trying to apply a coating of powdered sugar on my funnel cake, I thought I was going to throw my shoulder out.  The sugar just will not come out of the fine mesh in the lid.  I had higher hopes for this.  Unfortunately, It is now packaged for a return journey back to Amazon and I am continuing my quest for the perfect funnel cake shaker</review_text>
Table came with chipped wood on one leg. When put together, the chip got even worse. The table is horribly unsteady. Would not recommend to anyone.</review_text>
Received set and tumblers are not good quality. The edges are quite sharp and the glass still sweats. Would not recommend</review_text>
I received the clock in good condition, but, even though I tried several batteries, it never worked. I did not return it because the shipping would have cost more than the clock! It ended up in the trash. I guess you really do get what you pay for</review_text>
I grind beans for my coffee every morning. I was using a Krups grinder and decided to switch to this quieter grinder...sold the old grinder in a garage sale. I do regret buying this grinder. It is loud and takes 30 seconds to grind instead of 10. My main complaint is that it is messy. The grounds stick to the sides and bottom and I have to smack it several times to get all the coffee out. I am tempted to purchase another Krups before I break this one by beating the grounds out of it. Also, coffee grounds are EVERYWHERE, I always have to use a cloth to clean up. Not a good buy</review_text>
When my Krups coffee grinder finally expired after several years of faithful service, I decided to order the Capresso because of its larger capacity and vaunted &quot;cool grind.&quot;  I wish I had ordered the  Krups instead.  The Capresso takes much longer to grind the coffee, and the  design ensures that no matter how careful you are, you will spill ground  coffee all over your counter.  In the time since I bought it another  reviewer has reported that his or her Capresso broke within six months.  Do  not buy this model</review_text>
We purchased this machine for our small coffee shop 2 months ago as in the discription it was said to be for light commercial use. We make probably 20-30 cups of coffee a day. Our problems began the first week after receiving it. The machine makes great froth for cappuccinoes but if you want to have steamed milk instead of frothed it either comes out of luke warm temperature allthough the setting is on high temperature or if you put the dial almost on the line between latte and cappuccino it gives you too much foam, which lattes shouldn't have. So customers complain about their lattes being either too cool or too foamy. We called the manufacturer's customer service and were rudely brushed off. For a small business like us it is hard to close for 2-3 weeks to send the machine for temperature adjustment service, so we had to deal with it.Another problem came up 3-4 weeks later, when the machine started shutting off by itself in the middle of steaming/frothing cycle or frother cleaning cycle. Sometimes we had to restart it up to 5 times to make 1 cup of hot chocolate, just to steam milk. At the customer service we were told to reset the computer by unplugging the machine for a couple of hours, which we did. It did not shut off for 1 day! The next day the problem started again...I perform every neccessary cleaning or maintenance procedure that machine prompts and cappuccino cleaning daily, so you can not say that the machine is being neglected.We are very disappointed with this machine. For the price that you pay you would think that at least customer service would be polite, understanding and helpful. Now we are looking for another machine, a back up one, to be able to send Impressa Z5 for service..</review_text>
After remodelling our kitchen, I wanted to upgrade the look of items that would be sitting out. When I saw the picture of the towel holder, I thought it unique with its scroll-work and wouldn't look like everything else I saw. When I received it, the first thing I noticed was that the base had ugly black smudge marks on the area that would be visible. I tried with no luck to remove the stains. The area where the short post attaches screws in crookedly because the threaded receiver was set at a tilt! All in all, I would not trust this company to have consistant quality in their workmanship</review_text>
I always buy products from amazon and I never have any complains about any of them. But about this product, I am so disappoint because the lids does'nt fit with the 32 oz. containers. I hope that they fix this problem because is a good way to keep your kitchen organized</review_text>
I bought this as my second fryer. The third time I used this fryer, the oil went up and came out of the fryer then the lid wouldn't close properly and that's the end of it.Prior to buying this fryer, I had the presto fry daddy for years and it worked fine.</review_text>
I made a mistake in buying this item thinking since I had one when I was little it would be similiar.It is not,the edges are stiff and strings are pulling out.The fuzz all over the blanket gets all over your sheets.It is a raggedy sorry substitute for my cozy soft one I remember</review_text>
I got them free with purchase of Wamsutta sheets. These blankets are of really cheap quality. Thin, mesh-like texture. Threads get loose at the ends. Leaving traces of fabric everywhere. I got rid of it cause I am afraid the loose ends and fabric may be swallowed by babies</review_text>
bad buyin two days it started to come aparti am sooo disappointed,looks good but quality is poradvice-dont buy i</review_text>
The humidifier worked great for 2 weeks but now leaks all over the floor during operation.  I would not recommend buying this product</review_text>
This product is OK - it's just a larger version of the upholstery tool that you probably already have with the vacuum.  The head is eight inches wide with two little strips of lint-catching fabric.  The extra width lets you vacuum areas twice as fast, but for what it is, this attachment is ridiculously overpriced</review_text>
Corrected review:On September 1st, after using it five times to stir soft ice cream,  I used this spatula to stir flour into oil and it broke with the steel stem sticking out.Amazon emailed the promise to refund this product but I haven't seen the refund yet.</review_text>
well, i have a toy poodle, and he goes crazy when he hears someone at our door.  We live in a tiny studio in nyc, so if he hears someone going into their apt in the middle of the night, he goes crazy and wakes everyone up.  After a lack of sleep and total frustration i got this collar.  It work until one night i woke up to horrible noises when i saw that my dog had attempted to slip the collar off, and because of all his fur the collar was able to slide partially off but not all the way, leaving the electric part IN HIS MOUTH, and when he whined, it electrocuted HIS MOUTH....so i quick unhooked it and couldnt stop freaking out...so my boyfriend said that its not a bad shock, its just a quick pinched...so i tryed it on my neck, and my god, was it POWERFUL, it burned and paralyzed your whole area.  I made my boyfriend try it to just so he couldnt say i was being a p*ssy. We threw it right out after that.  I didnt even want to resell it or get my money back, because i would feel too guilty giving it to anyone else.  My suggestion is that you get JUST A SOUND CORRECTION device, with no electric correction, because i learned first hand its really not humane.  OR A SPRAY collar that shoots out a spray of citranella or something.</review_text>
This bread box had to be "fixed" by the time I received it.  It was a minor thing, and works well, however I would not have bothered buying the box had I known that there would be problems with it</review_text>
I thought this breadbox was beautiful in the picture and unique because of the two compartments.  The construction, however, is horrible.  The wood was split at the screw locations on the lid.  I returned the box and received another one.  The wood was split at the screw sites on the bottow of the second box.  It is very poorly put together and the material is cheap.  This certainly is not worth the price</review_text>
I purchased this high-end toaster oven because I wanted /needed a proficient smaller oven for smaller baking needs.  After 5 months of moderate usage, however, the middle knob has malfunctioned and it will no longer bake.  Other than that I was satisfied with the product.  I called their customer service and to get it repaired under warranty, will have to ship it at least 250 miles away, at my expense.  What a hassle.  I may just go buy a cheap toaster oven to replace it instead of spending the time and money on postage.  Live and learn....just because a product costs more doesn't mean it's better.</review_text>
We had a rude awaking today, our Delonghi toaster was on fire. I will never again buy any Delonghi product. The defective design is in the toast switch. It is mechanical. When it finishes toasting, it sometimes continues to the "Always On" position thus leaving the toaster oven on toast: very, very hot. We literally had a house full of smoke & a toaster full of flames. You were warned.Funny thing is, Delonghi makes an attractive product.Sad thing is, they can cost you your house or worse</review_text>
I purchased this toaster oven because I loved its exterior design and thought it would look great in my kitchen.  It did... until the middle knob came off after less than 6 months of use.  I've been using a pair of pliers to turn it on for the last 5 months while I await my replacement part.  I have followed-up on my request with DeLonghi customer service on a number of occassions and they offer no solution other than to continue to wait.  I even left a message with a supervisor and received no response whatsoever.  I vow to never buy a DeLonghi product again.  Still waiting for that knob..</review_text>
OK...this is quite possibly the most retarded device ever crafted. It barely picks up even simple dirt and debris, and when it does it fills the filter up and gets clogged in seconds, not minutes.Also, it is about as easy to return the device to its charging stand as it is to hack into Bank of America and swipe a few mil. Really, its like cracking a safe to lock in back into place to charge. Stupid....stupid...stupid design. The same goes for returning the filter to the device and putting it back together...its like a rubics cube.A true waste of 40 bucks. Don't buy this! It doesn't even look very cool</review_text>
will not last long only a few months old and getting weak alread</review_text>
I bought three of these mugs based on a recommendation by Mens Health Magazine. None of the mugs works correctly and the chrome ring on the cover has come off of each one. Initially this looks like a great idea but if the slots don't line up just right the mug will not work.  I have three of these mugs and each set of slots lines up differently. Stay away from this product if you wish to avoid agravation</review_text>
Great coffee, and a convenient size, but the carafes keep breaking on me! I used the original carafe just a few times before it broke. I ordered a replacement, and was extra careful when handling it (especially when washing it). I used the carafe maybe five times before it broke. These things just seem to spontaneously combust. The carafes are $12 a piece, so it's not worth replacing again. ARGH</review_text>
As you can see in the picture, the pestle (the part you hold in your hand) has quite a wide bottom.  Unfortunately, this spreads out the force that you can apply to any single location, making it practically impossible to grind seeds (e.g., cumin) to dust.I tried it once on cumin seeds, and gave up</review_text>
I liked this when it arrived.  However after a few uses the pestle broke in two.  The pestle is hollow and apparently quite fragile, making it of little use</review_text>
The quality of the workmanship is awful! I didn't even get to use it - the top had chips in it and the bottom of the pestle had a huge crack that looks like it happened during the firing process</review_text>
I have owned this unit for 2 years.  The water seems OK and definitely better than from the tap.  However, every 4 months or so we have to change the filter because we start to have a chlorine taste coming back.  The replacement cartridges are very expensive.  There is a little knob on the faucet that you pull to switch from tap to filter, and this knob recently has broken off.  We cannot seem to access the company's website to get a replacement part.  I am thinking to get a different water filter system altogether.  I would not buy again.  (Also, I have had lots of problems with their water bottles...leakage, breaking, etc.  I won't buy any product from this company again.</review_text>
The price seemed great and I really liked the modern look. When I took it out of the box got disappointed by how cheap everything looked. Assembly was very easy - it took my boyfriend about 15 minutes (the most). The design is really great - it's very compact, perfect for small spaces and would look awesome if materials were a little bit better. Great idea - poorly executed. Would gladly pay a lil more for this futon if it was a better quality product. My main concern is that the construction seems like it wouldn't last too long. I feel like I should attach "sit carefully" tag to it before anybody comes over</review_text>
I've had my futon a little over two months and was very happy with it initially until one day two of the wooden slats which are all held in place with plastic fell apart (and I only weigh 100lbs).  I tried everything to fix the problem to no avail.  So considering it only lasted a few months, it really is not worth the money at all.  The price is cheap but so is the quality.  For what it will cost me to replace this one, I could've bought a much better quality futon without the disappointment and aggravation</review_text>
I have the same problem as Sillygal00 - "The spout doesn't pour cleanly and water ends up all over the stove!". I'm returning it</review_text>
This "Tea Cattle" is absolutely adorable.  It is not practical for daily use.  The spout doesn't pour cleanly and water ends up all over the stove.  The lid doesn't remove easily and more often then not knuckles will be knocked on the handle that does not move.</review_text>
This is not made in France -- most of the Le Creuset line is from a centuries-old factory in France; this pot is not.  When I saw where it was made, I returned it.  Buyer beware</review_text>
Other than the look, which has now been duplicate  by other companies, there is absolutely no reason to buy this incredibly expensive toaster. It does not toast evenly. It does not accomodate bagels unless you flatten the bagel into a pancake with a hole in it. Everything is manual, and has to be reset every time, including how long the toast cooks, and whether you heat the elements for one slice or two. The idea that the toaster keeps your toast warmafter it's done toasting is false. The toast is barely warm, and as you'd expect once you think about it, dried out. The Dual Lit is all hype, no better functioning than a $30 toaster from Sears (or Amazon,which is the BEST place to do business in the world.</review_text>
I also had a problem with the coating flaking off... within the first week of using it. The only reason I still use it is because I'm a poor college student that got it as a gift in the first place and can't afford a new one. After scrubbing the inside bottom of the wok furiously, I managed to get all the flakes off and then some. The lid is made of thin aluminum and has bent almost completely out of shape. Awful product. DO NOT BUY THIS WOK</review_text>
Moved into a new home. Wanted a brand new vacuum for my brand new carpets, decided to try a bagless model. This thing is a total waste of money. It has barely any suction whatsoever, especially when trying to use the hose, so for now after running this thing I have resorted to getting down on my hands and knees and raking my hand in a circular motion one square foot at a time across the carpets, to pick up lint and people hairs and fuzz from a brand new carpet that this thing just couldn't suck up. It's ridiculous,it's a brand new vacuum! I have never had to do this with any other vacuum. I had my husband make sure it was working right and it is, it just has a very weak suction. This thing is going back to the store and I am getting my money back and using it to buy a better vacuum. DON"T WASTE YOUR MONEY! Also, I have always vacuumed my bare floors instead of sweeping, and this thing is supposed to work on bare floors (well, they all pretty much do that job, but for some reason this has a bare floor setting, whoop de do!)it wont even pick up a little dust on my bathroom floor, nor can it suck up a cobweb! DON'T BUY</review_text>
Poor suction, Air filter cloggs every time and it shuts down after 15 min use. DONT BUY...</review_text>
If you want your wife mad at you buy this vacumn. A total waste of money and time!!! Poor suction, air filter is clogging constantly, filthy when you have to empty it, shuts down when it picked up a small piece of paper, have to unplug for 30 minutes. They lost their marbles when they designed this vacumn!Could not even give this THING one star, it is that bad!!!</review_text>
I have used Tendskin since college and while I can't say that I like it, it does work.  My girlfriend introduced me to the Min Solution2 and I gave it a try.  It works much better and I think the roller ball applicator is genius!  It smells really clean too and a bit minty.</review_text>
Take a look at the ingredient list. Alcohol is first, then water. This product doesn't do anything more than plain old rubbing alcohol does--except for make you about twenty bucks poorer.Regarding some of these reviews: Smells like rubbing alcohol? Why yes, that's because it is. Stings? Yes, it's rubbing alcohol. Someone recommended a spray bottle for easier application? Well, yes, (and duh) what a better way to fly through an expensive product that would last much longer if you used cotton balls.Unless you've got money to burn, it's just nonsense to buy this. I used it and noticed no difference between it and rubbing alcohol. Except the price</review_text>
I ordered this machine for my wife after reading dozens of reviews and and positive feedback. We followed the instructions explicitly and created one cup of coffee. After that the machine said "ventilate". We followed the proceedures for ventilating the machine and it seemed to correct itself. Went to make another cup of coffee and it said "ventilate". This time it would not fix itself. I tried to perform the ventilate process and it would simply spray hot water out into the tray. Turn off the knob and "ventilate" comes back up on the screen. Turn the machine off and turn it back on, "ventilate" came up on the screen.We called Amazon and they sent us a replacement a few days later (thank you Amazon). Unfortunately, this one I did not get cup one out of the machine. It read "ventilate" as soon as I turned it on. The difference is with this one no water would come out at all.Gaggia provides no customer support so you are on your own with this unit</review_text>
I purchased this toy for a friend's dog a while back. The dog loved it, he played with it non-stop (quack! quack!). When he finally destroyed it though we were shocked. Inside of this toy in addition to the stuffing we found a rubber band and parts of a plastic bag. My friend was fortunate enough to get the toy away from the dog before he could consume these items. We did complain to the manufacturer who said they'd look into it, but I would still be wary of this toy.I think this would be a great toy for a dog that loves it's toys, but doesn't rip them to shreds! There is no guarantee that what you find inside will be safe!</review_text>
I received the first topper and it was not satisfactory so I called and was sent another one which was worse than the first discolored etc. I have since returned both pads in the same box</review_text>
Some how my previous review text got a little glitched up.  But suffice it to say the only thing going for these knives is that the probably cut.  The manufacture of these knives is well below the quality I expected ....  It's the first time I;ve been TOTALLY disappointed ....  We're returning the knives because they are not worth the money.  Really, they look great in the picutre, but they are very poor quality.  Why else would a four hundred dollar set be selling for twentysix dollars</review_text>
Ditto the other's observations... The thermostat seems to register the temperature of the unit itself rather than the room... I had the thing in a 63 degree room, had it set to 85 degrees. It would register 90 after 30 seconds of running, turn off, slowly ramp back down to 84 degrees over a 2 minute time period, and then repeat. The temperature of the room never got above 64 degrees....</review_text>
The thermometer of this heater is completely messed up. It does not measure the room temperature, but the temperature of the air that has just been heated up. In other words, if your room temperature is 60 degrees and you program it to heat up the room to 70 degrees it will do so (according to the thermometer reading) in less 2 minutes and stop. If you do not use this functionality, but instead let the heater run for some time (5-10 minutes) the thermometer will want to make you believe that the room temperature has gone up to 90 degrees. The thermometer is probably in the wrong location. Did Honeywell do any kind of testing before putting this model on the market ?</review_text>
